<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88906-0023 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-06-88.f2.A1022</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register </T4>/ Vol. 53, No. 172 / Tuesday, September 6, 1988/ Rules and Regulations <ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Assistant Secretary for Community Planning and Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="62">24 CFR Part 570 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-85-1204; FR-1895] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Community Development Block Grants </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Assistant Secretary for Community Planningand Development, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Department is amending substantial portions of itsCommunity Development Block Grants (CDBG) regulation at 24 CFR Part 570.This final rule updates and makes more efficient the CDBG program. In addition,it incorporates legislative changes to Title I of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1974 contained in the Housing and Urban-Rural RecoveryAct of 1983 and the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>Under section 7(o)(3) of the Department of Housingand Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(o)(3)), this final rule cannotbecome effective until after the first period of 30 calendar days of continuoussession of Congress which occurs after the date of the rule's publication.HUD will publish a notice of the effective date of this rule followingexpiration of the 30-session day waiting period. Whether or not the statutorywaiting period has expired, this rule will not become effective until HUD'sseparate notice is published announcing a specific effective date.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>James R. Broughman, Director,Entitlement Cities Division, Office of Block Grant Assistance, Room 7280,Department of Housing and Urban Development, 451 Seventh Street SW., Washington,DC 20410-5000, (202) 755-5977. (This is not a toll-free number.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>The information collection requirementscontained in this rule have been submitted to the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB) for review under the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 andhave been assigned OMB control numbers 2506-0077, 2529-0008, and 2506-0066.Public reporting burden for each of these collections of information isestimated to include the time for reviewing the instructions, searchingexisting data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completingand reviewing the collection of information. Information on the estimatedpublic reporting burden is provided under the Preamble heading, <T3>Other Matters. </T3>Send comments regarding this burden estimate orany other aspect of this collection of information, including suggestionsfor reducing this burden, to Department of Housing and Urban Development,Rules Docket Clerk, 451 Seventh Street SW., Room 10276, Washington, DC20410; and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Officeof Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503. <ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>On October 31, 1984, the Department published a proposed rule for the CommunityDevelopment Block Grant (CDBG) program entitled ``Amendments to CommunityDevelopment Block Grant Regulations'' (49 FR 43852). The proposed ruleamended substantial portions of 24 CFR Part 570, including provisions containedin Subparts A, C, D, J, K, M and O. [Subpart I, which governs the StateCDBG program, will be amended in a separate rulemaking.] A large number of the amendments to the CDBG regulations reflect legislativeamendments to Title I of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974(the Act), contained in sections 101 through 110 of the Housing and Urban-RuralRecovery Act of 1983 (1983 Act) and legislative amendments in the Housingand Community Development Act of 1987 (the 1987 Act). The changes in theregulations which implement the 1987 Act reflect solely those provisionsof the 1987 Act which can be implemented without public comment becausethey require little or no regulatory elaboration, e.g., the requirementthat the grantee certify that at least 51 percent of its CDBG funds willbe used for activities which benefit low and moderate income persons hasbeen changed to 60 percent to reflect this amendment in the 1987 Act. Otherchanges to the regulations needed to implement the 1987 Act will be publishedin the near future as a proposed rule. Revisions reflected in this final rule also update and clarify existingHUD policies governing the CDBG program, and make various miscellaneoustechnical corrections. Some revisions reflect substantive determinationsbased upon the Department's own policy initiatives. The Department of Justice (DOJ) has reviewed this regulation. DOJ has theresponsibility under Executive Order 12250 to coordinate the implementationand enforcement of various nondiscrimination laws, including Title VI ofthe Civil Rights Act of 1964 and similar statutes such as section 109 ofthe Act. All issues have been resolved. As a result of DOJ review, a number of changes were made in HUD's proposedregulation. Clarifying language has been added to the preamble in severalcases, even where no change was made in the text of the regulation. Asa general matter, these revisions reflect interpretations of the holdingsin recent Supreme Court decisions, describe the nature of actions whichare discriminatory, and define the extent of permissible affirmative action.In addition, at the request of DOJ, language has been added to the ruleto clarify the meaning of fair housing under Title VIII of the Civil RightsAct of 1968 (42 U.S.C. 3601-3619) and the requirements for affirmativelyfurthering fair housing in the Community Development Block Grant Program.The affected sections of the regulation are: Sections 570.201(k), 570.205,570.206, 570.506, 570.601, 570.602, and 570.904. Two hundred and seventy comments were received in response to the proposedrule. The large majority were filed on behalf of entitlement cities andcounties. However, a significant number were submitted by private associationsand organizations, such as privately operated fair housing centers, thatparticipate in or are affected by CDBG funded activities. A recurrent theme in the comments from entitlement cities is that the Departmentshould interpret CDBG legislation in a manner that affords grantees thegreatest amount of flexibility and discretion in administering their programs.Where uniform standards are necessary, they should be reasonable in scope,unambiguous and readily susceptible to compliance. In fact, the Department'svery objective in formulating the final CDBG regulations is to carry outboth the letter and spirit of the Act in a manner that results in the mostefficient expenditure of Federal funds, and also provides persons involvedin the grant program with wide latitude in achieving local goals. In the preamble to the proposed rule, the Department independently discussedeach of the subparts of Part 570 proposed for revision. The same organizationalapproach will be used in this preamble to address significant public andDOJ comments and to explain the Department's basis for changing any ofthe revisions proposed in regulations published in 1984.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Subpart A_General Provisions </ITAG>Section 570.1 Purpose. Two commenters indicated that the rule was unclear with respect to whatsubparts of Part 570, (other than Subpart I), pertain to the State-administeredCDBG program. Because Subpart I will be revised in a separate rulemaking,no change is made in the applicability of the other subparts to SubpartI in this rulemaking. Section 570.2 Primary Objective. Specific reference to Subpart M of Part 570, Loan Guarantees, has beenadded to this section to clarify that the requirements of the Act and Part570 related to carrying out the primary objective of the Act are applicableto funds received by a grantee as a result of loan guarantees. Section 570.3 Definitions. In response to a commenter's request for further clarification of the definitionof ``identifiable segment of the total group of lower income persons inthe community,'' at andSection; 570.3(n), the Department has elected insteadto delete the term. Over recent years, this term (that generally identifiesvarious minority groups as well as female-headed households) has fallenout of use under the CDBG program, in favor of the term ``minority.'' Becauseof this deletion, the terms defined in this section beginning with andSection;570.3(o) have been relettered. Another commenter took issue with how HUD proposed to define the terms``metropolitan area'' and ``metropolitan city'' now found at andSection;570.3 (u) and (v), because each definition indicates that the involvedterm is defined in light of related criteria established by the Officeof Management and Budget, but fails to spell out the criteria. The Departmentfinds it necessary to use the approach proposed, since OMB, and not HUD,is responsible for establishing and periodically revising the involvedcriteria (that are rather lengthy and complex). Information about the criteria,which can have a direct effect on CDBG entitlement grantee status, is madeavailable to interested persons by OMB. The definition of ``city'' for purposes of the Urban Development ActionGrant program has been revised to reflect statutory changes. The definitionof ``metropolitan city'' has also been changed to reflect the revised definitionin the 1987 Act. The Department received a large number of comments on the proposed definitionsof ``low and moderate income household'' and ``low and moderate incomeperson'' now found at andSection; 570.3 (q) and (r); ``low income household''and ``low income person'' at andSection; 570.3 (s) and (t); and ``moderateincome household'' and ``moderate income person'' at andSection; 570.3 (w)and (x). The majority of commenters objected to the reference in these provisionsto 24 CFR Part 813 for the Section 8 Housing Assistance Payment program,because they concluded that grantees would be required to calculate incomeeligibility for the CDBG program in exactly the same manner as for theSection 8 program. Several commenters pointed out that use of the Section8 methodology would make many low and moderate income homeowners ineligiblefor rehabilitation activities and for jobs created by economic developmentprojects. This was the case, commenters said, because under Section 8 proceduresreal property assets are considered in determining income levels. HUD's proposed definitions were intended to reflect the requirements ofsection 102(a)(20) of the Act, a new section added by the 1983 Act andmodified by a technical amendments act to the 1983 Act. Under the definitionsin section 102(a)(20), the term ``low and moderate income'' under the CDBGprogram is equivalent to ``lower income'' under the Section 8 program (i.e.,80% of median income for the area or below); ``low income'' is equivalentto ``very low income'' (50% of median area income); and ``moderate income''means any income equal to or less than the Section 8 ``lower income'' limitand greater than the ``very low income'' limit (i.e., between 50 and 80%of area median). Section 102(a)(20) also specifies that, for purposes ofthese terms, ``the area involved shall be determined in the same manneras such area is determined for purposes of assistance under section 8 ofthe United States Housing Act of 1937.'' Therefore, <T3>income limits </T3>established for CDBG purposes must be equivalentto those used in the Section 8 program. However, the statute does <T3>not </T3>require CDBG grantees to use the section 8 program's definitionof income to calculate incomes of individual families to be applied againstsuch income limits. The Department agrees with the commenters that the section 8 definitionof income may not be appropriate for use in all cases under the CDBG program.Therefore, these regulations do not require grantees to use any specificdefinition of income in determining whether program beneficiaries are lowand moderate income persons or households. However, the Department doesbelieve that the development of such a definition is important to assureuniform program administration. Since the effects of any definition ofincome to be used in the programs affected by this final rule would becomplex and controversial, the Department intends to develop such a definitionand publish it for comment in a separate proposed rule. This rule does,however, contain definitions of the terms ``family'' and ``household''to improve clarity. Finally, the definition of ``urban county'' has been changed to reflectthe revised definition in the 1987 Act.  <ITAG tagnum="84">III. Subpart C_Eligible Activities  </ITAG>Section 570.200 General Policies.The Department proposed that the word ``assisted'' which is used in theeligible activities section of the Act, be substituted for ``financed''in andSection; 570.200(a), in order to clarify that the activity must meetone of the national objectives where CDBG funds are used for an activity,even where the CDBG funds are not expended for the actual construction,acquisition or other execution costs.A number of commenters argued that the word ``assisted'' is too broad aterm and could impose an undue burden on entities that receive nonfinancialassistance. Concern was expressed that ``assisted'' could be interpretedto apply even to other activities that occur as an indirect result of theCDBG financed activity. This is not HUD's intention. An assisted activityfor this purpose is the activity for which the CDBG funds are used, butsuch use may take various forms, including loan guarantees for financingprovided for the activity from other sources, whether or not the CDBG fundsare disbursed from the letter of credit. Another commenter was concerned that the language change in this sectionmight require wage rates established under the Davis-Bacon Act to be appliedto all CDBG-assisted construction activities. The purpose of this sectionis to describe the primary objective and eligibility requirements for anactivity under this statute. The applicability of other requirements dependson the language of the applicable statute, Executive Order or regulation.The applicability of Davis-Bacon wage rates, for example, is set forthin Subpart K and is limited to certain construction work ``financed'' withCDBG funds. In order to more clearly limit this section to requirementsimposed by this Act, HUD is eliminating paragraph (6), ``other requirements,''since they are described under other subparts of the regulations, and thisparagraph is unnecessary.Seven comments addressed the requirement at andSection; 570.200(a)(3), thatat least 51 percent of funds expended be for the benefit of low and moderateincome persons. Four of these commenters asked HUD to establish a higherstandard than the 51 percent required by statute. The basis of these commentswas the fact that HUD previously had a review standard that set 75 percentas a target, before the Congress enacted legislation that set the minimumstatutory percentage of 51 percent. The 1987 Act changes the percent to60. HUD does not believe that it is appropriate to limit grantees' flexibilitybeyond the statutory requirement. Another commenter suggested that a recipient could avoid compliance withthe primary objective of the Act by undertaking substantial section 108activities that are designed for the prevention or elimination of slumsor blight. He suggested the repayments of section 108 guaranteed loansmade after the effective date of the regulations be included in the calculationfor determining compliance with the primary objective. This comment suggeststhat loan guarantee funds are not included in that determination at thetime they are expended. This is not the case. The computation describedat andSection; 570.200(a)(3) to determine that at least 60 percent of thefunds are expended for the benefit of low and moderate income persons refersto ``CDBG funds,'' which are defined at andSection; 570.3(e) to include guaranteedloan funds. To also include in that computation the repayment of such loanswould result in double counting, and no change to the rule is required.One commenter, while agreeing that it is important to emphasize the primaryobjective by discussing it prominently in the ``General policies'' section,contended that the overall benefit calculation instructions would be moreuseful as part of andSection; 570.208, ``Criteria for national objectives.''The Department believes that it is appropriate to include an explanationon how overall benefit is calculated under andSection; 570.200(a)(3). However,HUD has put in a note after andSection; 570.208(a) to reference the informationon the overall benefit calculation at andSection; 570.200(a)(3). The provisionat andSection; 570.200(a)(3) has been revised, however, to reflect a modifiedapproach to limiting the credit a recipient is to receive for CDBG-assistedhousing activities. Instead of reducing the credit for every case wherenot all of the housing units are occupied by low and moderate income households,the reduction will now only apply where the CDBG assistance representsa percentage of the total activity cost that is greater than the percentageof housing units that are occupied by low and moderate income persons.One commenter believed that the requirement for counting lower income benefitfor housing based on occupancy after completion at andSection; 570.200(a)(3)de-emphasizes the importance and effect of neighborhood treatment, andcauses problems in relation to recordkeeping and income verification. Thismethod of counting lower income benefit for housing after completion isbased on statutory requirements at section 105(c)(3) of the Act, whichlimit the degree to which funds spent on housing activities can be consideredto benefit low and moderate income persons. The Department received a number of comments concerning the limitationsproposed, at andSection; 570.200(c), on when a grant recipient could makea special assessment against property owners to recover costs. One commenterargued that grantees should be allowed to assess property owners who werenot low and moderate income households for capital improvements even ifthe improvements were funded with CDBG funds. The prohibition against recoveringcapital costs of public improvements funded with CDBG funds has been inthe regulations since March 1978. However, in recent years, HUD has receivedinquiries on this subject from grantees who believe that with resourcesbecoming more scarce, persons that are not of low and moderate income shouldbe required to contribute toward paying for improvements that benefit themdirectly. The Department has decided that these arguments have merit. Becausethere is no statutory prohibition against such an assessment, HUD has revisedandSection; 570.200(c)(2)(i) to allow the recovery of CDBG funds used topay for public improvements through special assessments imposed only onproperties owned and occupied by persons not of low and moderate income,where allowed under State and local law. Another commenter questioned whether CDBG funds could be used to pay for``impact fees'' charged as a condition of obtaining access to public improvements.The Department construes the Act to permit the use of CDBG funds to payonly those fees which represent the recovery of the capital costs of aneligible public improvement. Conversely, the Department construes the certificationon assessments to be applicable only to the recovery of the capital costsof an eligible public improvement. The definition of ``special assessments''has been modified to make clear that it only covers the recovery of thecapital costs of the public improvement. One commenter suggested specific references be included in the specialassessment section of the regulations, indicating that if CDBG funds wereused to pay the special assessment of low income persons, the improvementwould have to comply with Federal requirements such as Davis-Bacon. TheDepartment believes the statement made in andSection; 570.200(c)(3)(i) hasbeen modified accordingly. Another commenter inquired whether the prohibition on the assessments oflow and moderate income persons could be waived if the person elects topay the assessment. Insofar as the special assessment rules reflect provisionsmandated by the statute, they cannot be waived. In relation to those provisionsprescribed by the Department, but not mandated by statute, the Departmentbelieves that a waiver could not be given, as the criteria for a waiverin andSection; 570.5 could not be met. The primary objective of the CDBGprogram is to benefit low and moderate income persons. HUD believes thatif such an election were allowed it would be contrary to the primary objectiveof the Act. Finally, in order to provide grantees with maximum flexibility, HUD hasrevised andSection; 570.200(c)(3). The Department will allow grantees topay special assessments for non-low and moderate income persons as wellas low and moderate income persons out of CDBG funds connected with a publicimprovement not paid for with CDBG funds, provided that the improvementmeets all the CDBG requirements applicable to the activity, including environmentaland citizen participation requirements. The improvement must also meetthe criterion in either andSection; 570.208(a)(1) for benefit to low andmoderate income persons (because such an improvement serves an area generally),or andSection; 570.208(b) for elimination of slum or blight, or andSection;570.208(c) for urgent needs. (It should be noted that a recent statutorychange now authorizes payments to be considered to benefit low and moderateincome persons if the payments are limited to low and moderate income personswhere the improvement does not meet the requirements currently stated inandSection; 570.208(a)(1). This will be reflected in subsequent rulemaking.)At andSection; 570.200(f)(1)(iii), language added on carrying out an activitythrough designating one or more public agencies is derived from section102(c) of the Act. Similar language was formerly contained in the CDBGregulations at andSection; 570.500.Two changes have been made in andSection; 570.200(g), the section that describeshow the limitation on planning and administrative costs is calculated.One of the changes is closely related to the definition of administrativecosts and is, therefore, explained in a later part of this preamble whichdescribes changes in that definition. The second change is the additionof a phrase qualifying the words ``program income'' in the first sentenceof andSection; 570.200(g). Language has been added to clarify that, underthe HUD-administered Small Cities program, program income from a grantthat has been closed out but which income is received while the communityhas <T3>another </T3>active small cities grant is <T3>not </T3>to be considered in determining the 20% limitation on theclosed out grant. However, such program income must be considered in calculatingthe 20% limitation on the active HUD-administered Small Cities grant. One change has been made in andSection; 570.200(h) regarding the descriptionof pre-agreement costs for which reimbursement may be made. The descriptionof relocation and acquisition activities has been revised to clarify thatacquisition costs for which reimbursement may be made <T3>are limited. </T3>Reimbursement may be made for costs incurred in complyingwith the procedural requirements of andSection; 570.606, such as obtainingthe required appraisals, but not for the cost of the real property itself.A large number of comments addressed the new provision at andSection; 570.200(j),related to the constitutional prohibition on the use of CDBG funds forreligious structures to be used for religious purposes. As indicated inthe preamble to the proposed rule, that addition to the regulations reflecteda long-standing Departmental policy which prohibited the use of CDBG fundsfor activities to assist active churches or other religious structuresused for religious purposes or to otherwise promote religious interests.The First Amendment of the Constitution provides that ``Congress shallmake no law respecting an establishment of religion.'' In accordance withthis constitutional mandate, the United States Supreme Court has adoptedcertain principles, in the form of three oft stated prongs, to be usedwhen passing on the constitutionality of Federal assistance. First, thestatute under which the assistance is to be provided must reflect a clearlysecular purpose. Second, the statute must have a primary effect that neitheradvances nor inhibits religion. Third, the statute and its administrationmust avoid excessive governmental entanglement with religion. <T3>Lemon </T3>v. <T3>Kurtzman, </T3>403 U.S. 602 (1971). Working out case applications ofthese principles has been extraordinarily difficult. Chief Justice Burgernoted in the majority opinion in the <T3>Lemon </T3>case that the language in the First Amendment is ``at bestopaque.'' 403 U.S. 612. The first prong, that the statute reflect a clearly secular purpose, isnot generally problematic and does not pose a problem here. The primaryobjective of the CDBG program is the development of viable urban communities,by providing decent housing and a suitable living environment and expandingeconomic opportunities, principally for persons of low and moderate income.This clearly reflects a secular purpose. In constructing the reach of the second prong of the <T3>Lemon </T3>test, the Court in <T3>Hunt </T3>v. <T3>McNair, </T3>413 U.S. 734 (1973), stated:<ITAG tagnum="21">Aid normally may be thought to have a primary effect of advancingreligion when it flows to an institution in which religion is so pervasivethat a substantial portion of its functions are subsumed in the religiousmission or when it funds a specifically religious activity in an otherwisesubstantially secular setting.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T3>Id. </T3>at 742. Government assistance to a pervasively sectarian organizationfor any purpose, <T3>secular or religious, </T3>or the funding of a religious activity insecular surroundings, is thus viewed as ``advancing religion'' in violationof First Amendment principles. In considering the nature of pervasively sectarian organizations, JusticeBlackmun, speaking for the majority in <T3>Roemer v. Maryland Board of Public Works, </T3>426 U.S. 736 (1976),declared: ``To answer the question whether an institution is so `pervasivelysectarian' that it may receive <T3>no</T3> direct State aid of any kind, it is necessary to paint a generalpicture of the institution.'' Id. at 758. Unquestionably, churches are pervasively sectarian. Additionally, thereare other fundamentally religious organizations which conform to the profileof a sectarian or substantially religious institution. Having stated the above, the Department is of the opinion that direct assistanceunder the CDBG program to churches or other primarily religious organizationsto acquire, construct, or rehabilitate buildings would be constitutionallyimpermissible under the second test of <T3>Lemon, </T3>notwithstanding the secular use to which such buildingswould be put. Finally, even if this were not the case, the administrative oversight whichwould be necessary to assure avoidance of impermissible religious influencesin the use of such buildings would almost certainly involve an ``excessivegovernment entanglement'' with religion in violation of the third prongof the test. As the Court states in <T3>Walz </T3>v. <T3>Tax Commission, </T3>397 U.S. 664 (1970), ``a direct money subsidywould be a relationship pregnant with involvement and, as with most governmentalgrant programs, could encompass sustained and detailed administrative relationshipsfor enforcement of statutory or administrative standards * * *.'' 397 U.S.at 675. In 1983, in order to confirm the Department's understanding with respectto constitutional limitations (particularly with respect to the secondand third prongs of the <T3>Lemon </T3>test), the Department requested guidance from the DOJ concerningthe effect of Supreme Court Church/State decisions on HUD programs, specificallythe section 202 Direct Loan program and the CDBG program.Under section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959, 12 U.S.C. 1701q, loans aremade to private nonprofit corporations, limited profit sponsors, consumercooperatives, public bodies or agencies to develop housing for the elderlyor handicapped. To allow religious organizations to participate as sponsorsof 202 projects, HUD requirements provide that religious sponsors mustestablish private, secular nonprofit borrower corporations to obtain theloan and execute the mortgage as legal owner of the project. The questionposed to DOJ was whether the HUD requirements in this regard were constitutionallymandated. It is important to note that the section 202 housing programis an entirely secular activity in nature and purpose. The DOJ ruled that the creation of a separate secular borrowing entityin the section 202 program is constitutionally required. In reaching thisresult DOJ concluded that if separate secular borrower entities were notestablished, direct and substantial aid would flow to churches, in violationof the Establishment Clause. The opinion states, ``where section 202 loansgiven directly to churches or other fundamentally religious organizations,the principle `that no aid at all go to institutions that are so ``pervasivelysectarian'' that secular activities cannot be separate from sectarian ones,[']<T3>see Roemer </T3>v. <T3>Maryland Public Works, Bd., </T3>426 U.S. at 755, would by definitionbe violated.'' Over the course of the CDBG program, questions have been presented as towhether churches or church-owned property could be rehabilitated with CDBGfunds. Departmental advice was that such assistance could not be provided.This conclusion is based in part on <T3>Committee for Public Education </T3>v. <T3>Nyquist, </T3>413 U.S. 756, 777 (1973), which states that ``if theState may not erect buildings in which religious activities are to takeplace, it may not maintain such buildings or renovate them when they fallinto disrepair.'' The DOJ opinion concluded that HUD's longstanding policy of prohibitingCDBG funds to rehabilitate, maintain or restore churches reflects constitutionalrequirements and, further, that ``<T3>any </T3>structure used to promote religious interests, regardlesswhether constructed for educational, charitable or whatever purposes, maynot * * * receive federal assistance.'' A subsequent DOJ opinion also confirmedthe HUD position that the prohibition applies notwithstanding the factthat the structure has historic significance. In accordance with these First Amendment principles, the final rule proscribesthe use of CDBG funds for the acquisition of property or the constructionor rehabilitation of structures for religious purposes or which will otherwisepromote religious interests. This limitation includes the acquisition ofproperty for ownership by primarily religious entities and the constructionor rehabilitation (except as noted hereunder) of structures owned by suchentities, regardless of the use made of the property or structure. As usedin the final rule, the term ``primarily religious'' is meant to be synonymouswith the term ``pervasively sectarian'' as that term has been used by theSupreme Court in its First Amendment Church/State decisions. Having stated the above, the Department is aware of and sensitive to theunique and vital role religious organizations play in the delivery of servicesand other assistance to lower income persons. In view of this, every attempthas been made to explore mechanisms to facilitate that role within theframework of First Amendment Church/State principles. After a thorough consideration of all the issues involved, the Departmentis of the opinion that it would be in accord with Church/State principlesto permit CDBG funds for the rehabilitation of buildings owned by primarilyreligious organizations to be used for wholly secular purposes under thefollowing circumstances: a. The building (or portion thereof) that is to be improved with CDBG fundshas been leased to an existing or newly established wholly secular entity(which may be an entity established by the religious entity): b. The CDBG assistance is provided to the lessee (and not the lessor) tomake the improvements; c. The leased premises will be used exclusively for secular purposes availableto all persons regardless of religion; d. The lease payments do not exceed the fair market rent of the premisesas they were before improvements are made; e. The portion of the cost of any improvements that also serve a non-leasedpart of the building will be allocated to and paid for by the lessor; f. The lessor enters into a binding agreement, that unless the lessee,or a qualified successor lessee, retains the use of the leased premisesfor a wholly secular purpose for at least the useful life of the improvements,the lessor will pay to the lessee an amount equal to the residual valueof the improvements; and g. The lessee must remit the amount received from the lessor under (f)above to the original recipient from which the CDBG funds were derived.The lessee may also enter into a management contract authorizing the lessorreligious entity to use the building for its intended secular purpose.In such case, the religious entity must agree in the management contractto carry out the secular purpose in accordance with principles prescribedby HUD.While allowing CDBG assistance to be used to rehabilitate buildings ownedby primarily religious organizations, these requirements have been carefullytailored to ensure that constitutionally impermissible assistance to religiousentities is avoided. Thus, the religious entity conveys control of thepremises to be assisted during the life of the improvements and the provisionof assistance is to a secular lessee for a secular purpose. Under suchan agreement, in accordance with the constitutional mandate, religiousorganizations will derive no direct benefit from improvements to the premisesmade with CDBG assistance. The final rule also permits CDBG funds to be used for public services otherwiseeligible to be provided through a primarily religious entity, where thereligious entity enters into an agreement with the recipient that in connectionwith the provision of such services: a. It will not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employmenton the basis of religion and will not limit employment or give preferencein employment to persons on the basis of religion; b. It will not discriminate against any person applying for such publicservices on the basis of religion and will not limit such services or givepreference to persons on the basis of religion; c. It will provide no religious instruction or counselling, conduct noreligious workshop or services, engage in no religious proselytizing, andexert no other religious influence in the provision of such public services;and d. The portion of a facility used to provide the public services shallcontain no sectarian or religious symbols or decorations (other than thosepermanently affixed to or part of the structure). Where public services provided under the above provisions are carried outon property owned by the primarily religious entity, CDBG funds may alsobe used for minor repairs to such property which are directly related tocarrying out the public services, where the cost constitutes in dollarterms only an incidental portion of the CDBG expenditures for the publicservices. In allowing primarily religious entities to serve as public service providers,the Department considers the provision of assistance as flowing <T3>through </T3>such entities <T3>to </T3>the intended beneficiaries of the particular program. Numerous comments addressed andSection; 570.200 (k) of the rule, which giveseffect to the displacement provisions at section 104(k) of the Act. Severalcommenters found it confusing to have responsibilities concerning displacementlocated in several different parts of the rules (separate references todisplacement were contained in proposed Subparts C, D, J, and K). The requirementsrelating to displacement, relocation benefits, including those under theUniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Actof 1970, and new requirements for replacement housing added to the Actby the 1987 Act have been consolidated and have been recently publishedas an interim rule. (53 FR 31234, August 17, 1988) The regulations whichare included in the interim rule have been reprinted in this final rulewithout change except for andSection; 570.900, as explained in the preamblecovering Subpart O, below. The provisions dealing with restrictions on the change of use of real property(andSection; 570.200 (1) of the proposed rule) have been modified and combinedwith provisions on disposition of real property. The combined provisionsnow appear in Subpart J, at andSection; 570.505, ``Use of real property.''Section 570.201 Basic eligible activities. At andSection; 570.201(a), The Department has clarified that only ``long-term'',i.e., 15 or more year, leases are considered to constitute acquisitionfor the purpose of CDBG eligibility. A commenter recommended that activities identified at andSection; 570.201(c),concerning public facilities and improvements, should only be eligibleif they occur in conjunction with other CDBG funded activities. The Actdoes not establish such a limitation, and HUD will not do so because itdoes not wish to curtail a grantee's flexibility in this area. A number of commenters had suggestions concerning facilities designed foruse in providing shelter for persons having special needs. These typesof facilities include, but are not limited to, shelters for the homeless;convalescent homes; hospitals; nursing homes; battered spouse shelters;halfway houses for runaway children, drug offenders or parolees; grouphomes for mentally retarded persons; and temporary housing for disastervictims. The thrust of the comments was that the structures should be viewedas public facilities and, therefore, not subject to the longstanding regulatoryprohibitions at andSection; 570.207 regarding the construction of new permanentresidential structures. Some of the types of shelters described above arespecifically identified as eligible for CDBG assistance in the regulations.Because, however, statutory changes since 1980 have substantially broadenedthe eligibility of public facilities, andSection; 570.201(c) has been revisedto specify the eligibility of the new construction of various types oftemporary shelters. The shelters listed above are included as examplesin the final regulation. Several comments on andSection; 570.201(e), ``public services,'' addressedmatters outside any particular rule change proposed. HUD has adopted acommenter's suggestion that since fair housing counseling is eligible asa public service, it should be listed among the examples of eligible servicescontained in the section. Another commenter felt that public service activities should only be allowedin conjunction with other eligible CDBG activities, and that the increasein the allowable percentage of funds for public services would detractfrom housing activities. HUD is committed to allowing grantees to exercisethe maximum discretion possible, subject to the limits set out in the statuteand rules. The Department is not inclined to place greater restrictionson public service activities than the Act itself imposes.One commenter suggested that the 15 percent of grant limitation on expendituresfor public services should be calculated based on the grant amount plusall program income, rather than the grant amount alone. The Departmentdisagrees, since it is generally agreed that the CDBG program is intendedprimarily to address physical development needs. The Department does authorizeprogram income to be counted in the base against which the 20 percent limiton planning and program administration is calculated, but there is justificationfor this policy. Program income increases the size of the local CDBG programwhich must be administered. Also, basing the 15 percent limit only on thegrant amount allows grantees, and HUD, to determine precisely the dollarlimit on public services before a program year begins. While the Department proposed no change to andSection; 570.201(k), one commenterrecommended that the removal of architectural barriers related to mobilehomes should be eligible regardless of whether a mobile home is classifiedunder State law as real property or personal property. The Department hasamended andSection; 570.202 to clarify that CDBG funds may be used to rehabilitatemanufactured housing where such housing constitutes part of the community'spermanent housing stock. CDBG funds may be used to remove architecturalbarriers of such housing. HUD published on June 2, 1988 (53 FR 20215), its final regulation implementingsection 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, for HUD's Federally-assistedprograms. That regulation establishes specific accessibility requirementsfor new construction and alterations. Section 570.202 Eligible rehabilitation and preservation activities. The Department received several comments opposing its proposal to delete,from the kinds of buildings and improvements eligible for rehabilitationand preservation activities under andSection; 570.202, the rehabilitationof privately owned non-residential structures. These commenters contendedthat only allowing the rehabilitation of commercial or industrial buildingsunder andSection; 570.203, special economic development activities, wouldbe unreasonable, since it would require grantees to make ``necessary orappropriate'' determinations even in cases where the rehabilitation wasundertaken to improve the appearance of the area or to protect the publicfrom safety hazards. HUD agrees that in such situations, the rehabilitationof commercial or industrial buildings should be permitted under andSection;570.202. Therefore, paragraph (a) has been revised by adding a subparagraph(3) to include the rehabilitation of publicly or privately owned commercialor industrial buildings, but where the building is owned by a private for-profitbusiness, the rehabilitation is limited to improvements to the exteriorof the building and the correction of code violations. Other types of rehabilitationof such buildings could only be eligible under andSection; 570.203(b). (Therehabilitation of public facilities continues to be eligible under andSection;570.201(c).) The final rule clarifies that CDBG funds may be used to rehabilitate manufacturedhousing. Such housing must constitute part of the community's permanenthousing stock. The 1983 Act amended Sections 105(a)(2) and 105(a)(14) of the Act, to makeineligible the use of CDBG funds for buildings for the general conductof government. Under these amendments, the historic preservation of suchbuildings is ineligible, and HUD has modified both andSection; 570.202(d)and andSection; 570.207(a)(1) accordingly. However, the removal of architecturalbarriers (which, unlike historic preservation, is specifically made eligibleby the Act) will be unaffected by the amendments. Section 570.202(b)(7)(iv) was previously amended (52 FR 4870) in conjunctionwith changes for lead-based paint requirements and is included in thisrulemaking without further change. Section 570.203 Special economic development activities. Many commenters expressed concern about being required under andSection;570.203(b) to consider, in every instance, the extent of need of the for-profitbusiness for CDBG assistance, and the amount of the assistance providedin relation to the anticipated public benefit that would result. HUD wasasked to define ``need'' and ``benefit'' for this purpose. HUD recognizesthe difficulty in using terms such as ``need'' and ``benefit'' withoutproviding additional guidance. However, it appears infeasible to provideguidance that would be applicable to all situations. Instead, HUD has revisedandSection; 570.203(b) to require the grantee, in making its ``necessaryor appropriate'' determination, to conduct an analysis to determine thatthe extent of any financial assistance to be provided is not excessive,taking into account the actual needs of the business in making the projectfinancially feasible and the extent of public benefits expected to be derivedfrom the project. HUD's review of the recipient's documentation would beaimed at identifying any case where the amount of assistance provided wasclearly unreasonable. The final rule also makes clear that such a determinationis required to be made even if the assistance is provided to a for-profitbusiness through a subrecipient. Section 570.204 Special activities by subrecipients. A commenter suggested that since there is increasingly more competitionfor scarce resources, grantees should have the option of making loans tosubrecipients identified in andSection; 570.204(c), rather than being limitedto making grants. The 1987 Act amended the Act to authorize assistanceof any kind to such entities, and the final rule reflects this change.The final rule has been changed to clarify current policy that certainactivities carried out by these special subrecipients are subject to thesame restrictions as when the recipient carries them out itself. Theserestrictions are: the dollar limitation and non-substitution requirementson public services; the requirement for a necessary/appropriate determinationwhen CDBG assistance is provided to a for-profit business; and the dollarlimitation on planning and program administration activities.Section 570.205 Eligible planning, urban environmental design and policy-planning-management-capacitybuilding activities.Two commenters requested a revision to andSection; 570.205 that would allowcharging environmental assessments to general planning costs. Because somegrantees may find it burdensome to separate project-specific environmentalassessments, andSection; 570.205(a)(4)(iv) has been revised to provide thealternative of including such costs under eligible planning activities.Where grantees choose to consider such costs as planning, however, thecosts will then be subject to the 20 percent limitation on planning andprogram administration costs described in andSection; 570.200(g).Language has been added to the regulation to make clear that planning activitiesinclude identification of actions to implement the plans, but not the implementingactions. Actions to implement the plan must be eligible under andSection;andSection;570.201-570.204, or 570.206 to be assisted with CDBG funds.Several commenters have requested that HUD restore language to andSection;570.205(a)(4)(iv)_language deleted in 1983 for the purpose of simplificationonly_that identifies urban environmental design plans as an eligible planningactivity. This has been done.One commenter suggested that since proposed andSection; 570.904(c)(1) wouldinvolve recipients' undertaking an analysis of impediments to fair housingchoice, the cost of undertaking this analysis should be shown as an eligibleplanning expense under andSection; 570.205(a). While andSection; 570.904(c)(1)is a review criterion and not a requirement, HUD agrees that it would beuseful for this expenditure to be specifically identified as an eligiblecost, and a new andSection; 570.205(a)(4)(vii) has been added to so describethis kind of expenditure.Section 570.205(a)(4)(vii) has been added to clarify that the analysisof impediments to fair housing choice provided for in andSection; 570.904(c)(1)may be considered an e1igible planning activity. ``Fair housing choice''means the ability of persons regardless of race, color, religion, sex ornational origin of similar income levels to have available to them thesame housing choices. ``Impediments to such housing choices'' are any actions,omissions or decisions taken because of race, color, religion, sex or nationalorigin which restrict housing choices or the availability of housing choices.The 1987 amendments to the Act simplified the provision for energy usestrategies. The amendment did not narrow or otherwise change the eligibilityof activities necessary for the development of energy use strategies relatedto a recipient's community development goals. Therefore, no change hasbeen made to the language in andSection; 570.205(a)(3)(v) identifying thedevelopment of energy use and conservation strategies as an eligible planningactivity. Section 570.206 Program administration costs.Under the proposed rule, the definition of administrative costs subjectto the 20 percent limitation was proposed to be expanded to include thecosts of any staff principally engaged in managing or supervising otherstaff, irrespective of whether and to what extent they also engaged inactivity delivery functions. More than 150 comments were received on thisproposal, with virtually all commenters vigorously opposing it. After consideringthe public comments and a subsequent report that addressed the subjectby the Surveys and Investigations Staff, entitled ``A Report to the Committeeon Appropriations, U.S. House of Representatives on the CDBG Program''(March 1985), the Department has decided not to adopt the proposed change.Commenters offered many arguments against the proposed change. A frequentcomment was that it is unreasonable not to consider the management andsupervision of staff engaged in activity delivery functions as an essentialelement of activity delivery. Another argument frequently offered was thatthe rule would skew the local activity-selection process away from thetypes of activities often carried out by subrecipients. Especially affectedwould be staff intensive activities, such as public services and housingrehabilitation. There was widespread concern that transfer of supervisorycosts from activity accounts to the program administration account wouldresult in many grantees exceeding the 20 percent cap and, therefore, wouldforce them to make undesirable changes in locally determined priorities.It was also contended by many commenters that the rule would be administrativelyburdensome, significantly increasing recordkeeping requirements.Most commenters recommended maintaining the previous rule, under whichthe 20 percent cap applies to overall program administration, but not toproject administration. However, as confirmed by the Surveys and InvestigationsStaff report, the distinction between program and project administrationremains vague and subject to various local interpretations. Therefore,in this final rule, the Department is clarifying which expenses fall underprogram administration, without expanding the scope of that category beyondthe boundaries currently observed by most communities. Accordingly, thefinal rule describes the types of assignments involved in overall programadministration. The rule also describes two alternatives for charging salaries,wages, and related costs to the program administration category. Underthe first alternative, the grantee would identify each person whose <T3>primary </T3>responsibilities with regard to the program involve thesetypes of assignments. The entire salary, wages, and related costs allocableto the program of such persons could then be charged to the program administrationcategory. This approach should simplify recordkeeping. Under the secondalternative, the grantee would identify each person whose responsibilitiesinvolve <T3>any </T3>of these types of assignments. The percentage of time eachperson spends on such assignments would then be applied to his or her salary,wages, and related costs to determine the amount to be charged to the programadministration category. This pro rata approach would require more detailedrecordkeeping, but might be preferred by smaller communities where thesame staffs carrying out program administration assignments also spendsubstantial time in the execution of activities eligible under andSection;570.201 through andSection; 570.204.The final rule also contains a conforming amendment to andSection; 570.200(g),limiting the application of the 20 percent cap to planning activities underandSection; 570.205 and to administrative costs under andSection; 570.206.The proposed specific reference to subrecipients in andSection; 570.200(g)has been deleted because, as a general rule, subrecipients do not carryout overall program management functions. It should be noted, however,that if a grantee delegates overall program management functions, as describedin andSection; 570.206(a), to a subrecipient, the costs of carrying out thosefunctions must be charged to the program administration account and aresubject to the 20 percent cap. Many commenters argued that fair housing counseling should be removed fromunder the 20 percent cap and designated as an eligible activity under andSection;570.201. Since it would require a legislative change to make such an activityeligible in its own right, the commenters' goal could only be accomplishedin these regulations by highlighting that such counseling can be carriedout as a public service under andSection; 570.201(e). However, with the exceptionof planning and program administration, grantees must be able to demonstratehow each activity addresses at least one of the three national objectives.Because this requirement constrains a grantee's ability to take fair housingactions which address all income ranges, and to effectively meet its affirmativelyfurthering fair housing certification, fair housing activities have beenretained as eligible, but subject to the 20 percent cap provision. It shouldbe noted that to the extent fair housing counseling is directed to lowand moderate income persons, it would also be eligible as a public serviceunder andSection; 570.201(e) if at least 51% of the persons assisted areof low and moderate income. Based on comments by DOJ the Department has changed the heading of andSection;570.206(c) from ``Fair housing counseling'' to ``Fair housing activities''and provided more examples of eligible activities. The purpose of TitleVIII enforcement is to eliminate discrimination in housing transactions.It does not include discrimination in housing on the basis of race, color,religion, sex or national origin for the purpose of attaining or maintaininga particular statistical measure. The elimination of discrimination widenshousing choices. As one of the eligible fair housing activities which canbe funded with CDBG funds, the provision of fair housing counseling, i.e.,making persons of all races, colors, religions, sexes, and national originsaware of housing opportunities and related resources such as access totransportation, in all parts of a community, facilitates such widened housingchoices. Because andSection; 570.206 cannot provide an absolute answer in every casewhere a grantee may need to classify a particular expenditure as eitheran activity delivery cost or a general administrative cost, the Departmentencourages any grantee with a particular problem in applying this regulationto a specific circumstance to write to HUD (1) describing the particularexpenditure in question, (2) explaining the reasons the grantee believesthe expenditure to be an activity delivery cost or a program administrationcost, and (3) requesting clarification of the Department's policy as itapplies to the situation in question. Section 570.206(a)(4) has been modified in order to clarify that eligibleadministrative costs include rental payments (including payment of depreciationor use allowances), but not purchases of office space for the administrationof the CDBG program. Such costs would be allowable as rent or through depreciationor use allowances in accordance with OMB Circular A-87. Based upon questionsfrom grantees, HUD wants to make clear that the regulations do not authorizethe acquisition by purchase of real property for this purpose, becauseof the indefinite period of the program's authorization. Paragraph (d) under andSection; 570.206 has been deleted and the paragraphis reserved. This paragraph made eligible the provision of assistance tofacilitate performance and payment bonding. The provision was deleted asunnecessary since such costs would be eligible under the provisions whichmake eligible the activity upon which the contractor(s) would be performing.The Department believes it is important that the eligibility of assistancefor this purpose should not fall under andSection; 570.206 because activitieseligible under that provision are not subject to scrutiny for compliancewith the national objectives. Section 570.208 Criteria for national objectives. The proposed section at andSection; 570.208(a), describing the criteria thatwould be used to determine whether an activity meets the national objectiveof benefitting low and moderate income persons, drew a large number ofcomments. The majority of these comments addressed the use of CDBG fundsfor economic development and jobs. However, a wide range of issues wereraised, and this entire section of the rule has been revised as a result.The major changes are: (a) Amplification of the point that, notwithstanding that an activity meetsone of the stated criteria, substantial evidence that the activity doesnot benefit low and moderate income persons will rebut the presumptionthat the activity meets the national objective; (b) Rule revisions to reflect amendments to the 1983 Act enacted in theHousing and Community Development Technical Amendments Act of 1984, concerningactivities that serve an area generally; (c) Expansion of the groups for which a presumption of low/moderate incomebenefit will be given; (d) Combining of the proposed criteria for rehabilitation and acquisition/constructionof property for housing into a single criterion;(e) Substantial revision of the criterion for activities designed to createor retain jobs; and(f) Deletion of the criterion related to activities that are a prerequisiteto or an integral part of another activity.A more detailed discussion of the comments received and the changes madefollows.In the past, standards used in the program for determining whether an activitymeets one of the national objectives have been conditioned, so that suchdeterminations would be rebuttable where there was substantial evidenceto the contrary. The applicable regulation, at andSection; 570.901(b)(1),stated that ``the following activities, in the absence of substantial evidenceto the contrary, will be considered to benefit low and moderate incomepersons.'' It further conditioned the standards by stating that ``in determiningwhether an activity will actually benefit low and moderate income persons,the net effect of the completed activity shall be considered.'' Therefore,the location of an activity, although a significant consideration, wouldnot alone demonstrate its benefit to low and moderate income persons. Underthe proposed rule, the references to the ``net effect'' and ``location''of the activity would have been deleted, and the ``evidence to the contrary''reference would have been retained without further elaboration.In considering various criteria that could be employed in the final rule,HUD has determined that some elaboration would be helpful for making judgmentsabout activities that, in addition to benefitting low and moderate incomepersons, provide substantial benefits to other persons as well, or actuallyinvolve negative effects on low and moderate income persons that tend tooffset the benefits to such persons. Accordingly, the final rule containsthe qualification that, in determining whether there is substantial evidenceto the contrary, the full range of direct effects of the assisted activitywill be considered.Section 570.208(a)(1) of the proposed rule related to area benefit activities.In the proposed rule, HUD indicated that assistance to businesses or commercialestablishments could qualify as benefitting low and moderate income personswhere the area served by the business(es) is one containing a sufficientlylarge (generally 51 percent or more) proportion of low and moderate incomepersons. In defining such service areas, the proposed rule emphasized ensuringthat the <T3>entire area served </T3>by an activity be considered. An example wasgiven in the discussion of this proposal of a case where a commercial stripis located on the boundaries of two neighborhoods and serves both of them.The proposal would have required that the income characteristics of bothneighborhoods be combined in determining whether there is a sufficientproportion of low and moderate income persons in the service area to qualifyunder that national objective. Commenters were concerned about the difficultyof determining the service area of an activity involving assistance tobusinesses. It was noted that, in a commercial strip or district, differentstores would very likely serve somewhat different areas. The final ruleretains the requirement that the area served by the activity must be theentire area served. This is considered necessary in order to avoid coveringcases where there may be one or more relatively small areas that are predominantlylower income included in the total area served by an activity. However,the example of the commercial strip has been dropped in recognition ofthe difficulty of determining the precise area it would serve. It is recognizedthat grantees will have to make common sense judgments about the area servedby a business strip or district for which public improvements or facadetreatment is contemplated_perhaps even making a distinction between primaryand secondary service areas. In providing assistance directly to a particularcommercial establishment based on the area it serves, a grantee would beexpected to conduct surveys or analyses, as appropriate, to determine thearea it serves or the income characteristics of its clientele, wheneverthere is reason to question that the business serves an area other thanthe neighborhood in which it is located. The proposed rule stated thatan activity need not be located in its service area. Upon review, it wasdetermined that this could occur only in very remote circumstances andit would be unnecessarily confusing to provide for it specifically in therule. It was therefore deleted in the final rule.The proposed rule at andSection; 570.208(a)(2) reflected a 1983 Act amendmentto section 105(c)(2) of the Act. This proposed change limited the exceptionto the general rule that area benefit activities must serve areas of 51percent or more low and moderate income persons to those grantees having<T3>no </T3>areas containing that high a percentage of such persons. Inthe rule preamble, however, it was also noted that this statutory provisionhad been modified by the Technical Amendment Act shortly before publicationof the proposed rule, and that the final rule would have to be amendedto conform to the new provision. Accordingly, the rule has been modified,at andSection; 570.208(a)(1)(ii), to indicate the following:(a) The exception is limited to metropolitan cities and urban counties;and(b) It applies to any such community in which less than one-quarter ofall of the areas in the community have concentrations of low and moderateincome persons exceeding 51 percent.As specifically required by the statutory amendment, the Department issueddetailed instructions to all entitlement grantees on January 4, 1985, outlininghow this exception was to be implemented. HUD elected to use Census BlockGroups as the common denominator for determining both whether a communityqualifies to use the exception and the minimum level of concentration oflow and moderate income persons that would qualify for such a community.In order to provide maximum flexibility, HUD will recognize service areasthat are located anywhere in the community's jurisdiction, if it can bedemonstrated that the concentration of low and moderate income personsin that area is at least as high as the percentage established using theprocedure outlined in the regulations.A paragraph has been added at andSection; 570.208(a)(1)(iv) to reflect currentpolicy that decennial census data is to be used for determining the incomecharacteristics of service areas for this purpose, and certain exceptionsto such usage. Proposed paragraph andSection; 570.208(d) has been repositionedat andSection; 570.208(a)(1)(iii) to improve clarity.In relation to the criterion for benefit to low and moderate income personsat andSection; 570.208(a)(3) in the proposed rule entitled Limited Clientele,and now at andSection; 570.208(a)(2), HUD proposed to expand the provisionto cover not only facilities, but also services, that do not serve an areagenerally but which, because of their specialized nature, serve a limitedclientele that constitutes a particular segment of the low and moderateincome population. Facilities or services designed for and used by seniorcitizens or handicapped persons were presumed to meet this proposed criterion.One commenter asked that the concept be broadened to include the homeless.HUD agrees, and has broadened the presumption to include other segmentsof the population for which it is reasonable to assume that most will fallwithin the definition of low and moderate income persons. These additionsinclude abused children, battered spouses, homeless persons, illiteratepersons and migrant farm workers. The effect of broadening this presumptionis to reduce the need for income information to be collected and maintainedto document that a facility or service benefits low and moderate incomepersons. Concerns that occasionally such a presumption may be incorrectwill be addressed through the general provision in andSection; 570.208(a),and where there is substantial evidence that the presumption is incorrect,the grantee would be required to provide the usual documentation supportinga claim of principal benefit to low and moderate income persons. One commenter suggested that HUD require 100 percent benefit to low andmoderate income persons for such specialized facilities and services. However,the effect of imposing such a requirement could be to create severe feasibilityproblems in providing facilities and services for low and moderate incomepersons. Finally, the criterion has been re-worded in the final rule tomore clearly distinguish it from the other criteria used for this nationalobjective; to clarify that certain kinds of activities may not qualifyunder this criterion but instead must meet another criterion to qualifyas meeting the national objective of benefiting low and moderate incomepersons; and to indicate various ways in which the recipient may demonstratethat an activity qualifying under this criterion principally benefits lowand moderate income persons. It is recognized that the distinction between an activity that serves anarea generally (and thus is to be judged under the Area Benefit criteria)and one that serves a somewhat limited population in a particular area(to be reviewed under the Limited Clientele criteria) can be problematic.However, it is important to make the distinction for two reasons. An areabenefit activity can qualify under the ``upper quartile'' percentage oflower income beneficiaries whereas a limited clientele activity must alwaysprincipally benefit such persons. Moreover, the recordkeeping requirementsand property use restrictions differ. Where an activity serves an areaand benefits all the residents in that area, the grantee need only demonstratethat, at the time the CDBG assistance was provided, the most currentlyavailable information (usually census data) indicates that a sufficientlylarge percentage of those residents were low and moderate income. Sincethe grantee cannot generally be held accountable for future changes inthe demographic makeup of the service area, it has no continuing responsibilityto ensure that the assisted activity benefits lower income persons. A facilitythat serves a limited clientele, however, carries with it the responsibilitynot only to document that the beneficiaries were primarily lower incomefollowing its completion but that it continues to serve such a population.Most public improvements benefit an area generally. These include streets,sidewalks, curbs, gutters, trees, street lights, waterlines, sewers, drainageimprovements, parks and playgrounds. Many public buildings similarly meetthis test, including public schools, libraries, and fire stations. Commercialestablishments usually serve a particular residential area and could alsobe considered to benefit an area generally. Other public buildings needto be examined on an individual basis to determine whether they will beused for only a certain segment of the population in an area. Facilitiesto be used as a center for senior citizens or handicapped persons or forsheltering the homeless would be considered to serve a limited clientele.A multipurpose community center could qualify as either serving an areagenerally or a limited clientele depending on how the grantee designs anduses the facility. Under the proposed rule, at andSection; 570.208(a)(6), the standard for assistingthe new construction of multifamily, non-elderly housing would have beenexpanded by including the acquisition of property for housing. This proposalreflected section 105(c)(3) of the Act. One commenter contended that theproposed paragraph was difficult to follow, and requested that it be rewrittenfor greater clarity. In reviewing the provision for that purpose, HUD concludedthat since all activities involving housing are treated the same undersection 105(c)(3), the proposed standards for judging acquisition or newconstruction of housing should be combined with the standard used for rehabilitationof housing. The final rule contains a single criterion for this purposeat andSection; 570.208(a)(3). Under this provision, the previous rule, whichrequired that occupancy of rehabilitated rental units by low and moderateincome persons be at <T3>rents affordable to such persons, </T3>is extended to properties acquiredor newly constructed for housing considered as benefitting low and moderateincome persons. HUD believes that the unit should be affordable to suchpersons without regard to whether the unit has been newly built or acquiredwith or without rehabilitation in order to meet this national objective.As under previous rules, grantees will establish and make public theirown criteria for determining what is affordable. The final rule also clarifiesthat where two or more buildings being assisted with CDBG funds are locatedon the same or contiguous properties and are under common ownership andmanagement, HUD will consider them to comprise a single structure for purposesof this criterion. This is necessary since rental housing is often partof a complex that consists of more than one building. In such circumstances,occupancy of a unit by low and moderate income persons will be creditedwithout regard to the particular building in which the unit is located.Section 570.208(a)(4), related to activities that create or retain jobs,has been substantially modified in response to the 75 comments received.The preamble to the proposed rule explained the 1983 Act amendment to theAct requiring that an activity, to qualify based on jobs, must ``involveemployment of persons, the majority of whom are persons of low- and moderate-income.''Public comment was invited on a number of specific issues being consideredin order to implement the statutory change. Most comments addressed whetherHUD should require businesses receiving CDBG assistance to ensure thatthe majority of jobs be <T3>actually taken </T3>by persons from low and moderate income households.Most commenters urged HUD to retain the regulatory standard that jobs bemade <T3>available </T3>to low and moderate income persons. They claimed thatrequiring businesses to ensure jobs were actually taken by persons fromlow and moderate income households would make it more difficult, if notimpossible, to involve businesses; would require employers to survey jobapplicants to verify household income, living arrangements, marital statusand children; create additional recordkeeping and administrative burdens;and leave the eligibility of CDBG expenditures in doubt until all jobswere filled. A few grantees indicated that they did not feel an ``actuallytaken by'' requirement would be a hardship. Several interest groups believedthat the language of the law required something more than making jobs ``availableto'' low and moderate income persons.In light of the comments, the rule has been revised. For created jobs,grantees will have the alternative of documenting either that at least51 percent of the jobs were actually taken by low and moderate income persons,or were available to such persons. To qualify as being available, however,special skills or education may not be a barrier to obtaining the job,and first consideration for filling the job must be accorded to low andmoderate income persons. It is expected that most grantees will elect tofulfill the requirement for first consideration of low and moderate incomepersons through use of existing referral systems such as the Job TrainingPartnership Act (JTPA) program. Based upon discussions with the U.S. Departmentof Labor, HUD has determined that almost all of the participants in JTPAprograms meet HUD's definition of low and moderate income persons. Therefore,HUD will presume that any jobs for which first consideration is accordedto JTPA participants will meet this component of the criterion, exceptfor participants in the dislocated workers portion of that program. For <T3>retained </T3>jobs, the relationship between the CDBG assistance andbenefit to low and moderate income persons is more difficult to define.Job retention may not create any new benefit for low and moderate incomepersons, since it maintains the status quo. For created jobs, HUD requiresthat the jobs will be available to persons who are members of low and moderateincome households at the time they are hired. After being hired, with theadditional income from the job being added to the income of their household,they might no longer meet the definition of a low and moderate income person.Whether they continue to meet that definition or not, the benefit to thelow and moderate income person is clear. For retained jobs, the benefitto low and moderate income persons is evident for those employees who,at the time the CDBG assistance is provided, are members of low and moderateincome households and whose jobs would clearly be lost were the assistancenot provided. A benefit can also be assumed for those jobs that are notoccupied by low and moderate income persons at the time the assistanceis provided, but which can reasonably be expected to become vacant withina specified period of time as a result of turnover, and which would thenmeet the ``available to'' criteria described above, and which clearly wouldbe lost were the assistance not provided. HUD has determined that the statutoryobjective would be met where the jobs actually held by low and moderateincome persons at the time the assistance is provided, or jobs that throughturnover are expected to become available to such persons within two years,or any combination of the two categories, constitutes at least 51 percentof the jobs to be retained. For example, a grantee might consider assisting a business which had publiclyannounced its intention to close with a resultant loss of 100 jobs. Ofthe 100 jobs, the grantee determines that 35 are held by low and moderateincome persons. Of the other 65 jobs, the grantee determines that 20 jobsrequire skills, education and experience that eliminates their being consideredavailable to low and moderate income persons. For the 45 remaining jobs,the grantee determines that, based upon previous records of turnover, only17 could be expected to turnover and be available to low and moderate incomepersons during the next two years. In this example, a total of 52 of the100 jobs would be calculated to benefit low and moderate income personstwo years after the assistance had been provided. This total would meetthe ``at least 51 percent'' criterion, and thus would qualify under therules as benefitting low and moderate income persons. The final rule clarifies policy concerning when jobs created or retainedby more than one business may be aggregated in order to demonstrate thatthe majority of jobs are for low and moderate income persons. Public comment was requested on whether an upper limit should be imposedon the amount of CDBG assistance per job that could be provided, takinginto consideration the distinctions between created and retained jobs,full-time versus part-time jobs, and the type of business being assisted.Most commenters suggested that HUD not establish a limit and not includethe distinctions in the regulations, but rather leave those determinationsup to the grantee. Most of those commenting on the full-time versus part-timeissue indicated that, should HUD decide to address that issue in the regulations,it could easily be accomplished through the use of full-time equivalents.After considering the comments, HUD has decided not to establish a specificlimitation on the amount of assistance per job. While there would be nospecific upper limit on the amount of assistance per job, a high amountof CDBG assistance per job created or retained could constitute ``substantialevidence to the contrary'' as that phrase is used at the beginning of andSection;570.208(a). Such evidence would permit HUD to examine the full range ofdirect effects of the assisted activity in order to determine whether itis reasonable to characterize the activity as principally benefitting lowand moderate income persons. This examination could be made even thoughthe activity conforms with a literal reading of the criteria in andSection;570.208(a)(4). HUD would examine the extent to which the activity, in additionto benefitting low and moderate income persons, provides benefits to otherpersons as well. In order to properly account for part-time positions in determining thenumber and percentage of jobs available to or held by low and moderateincome persons, HUD will require the use of full-time equivalents, e.g.,two half-time jobs would be equivalent to one full-time job. Under proposed andSection; 570.208(a)(8), an activity that would not on itsown be considered to benefit low and moderate income persons could be soconsidered if it were determined to be a prerequisite to or an integralpart of another activity that does meet one of the criteria in paragraphs(1)-(8) of andSection; 570.208(a). The proposal required that the total publiccontribution not be unreasonable in relation to the low and moderate incomebenefit to be provided. The proposed provisions also would have droppedan example contained in the previous rule's version of this criterion.Several comments objected to having to consider any funding other thanCDBG funding in considering whether the cost is reasonable in view of thelow-mod benefit. Others sought further clarification, or examples of activitiesthat could qualify under such a criterion, especially concerning publicfacilities supporting economic development. In considering this matter in light of the comments and in the contextof the other criteria, HUD has decided to drop this criterion as unnecessary.Where an activity constitutes an integral part of another activity, HUDwill consider the beneficiaries of both the assisted activity and the otheractivity of which it is an integral part. (This is consistent with andSection;570.208(a), where the ``full range of direct affects'' are to be consideredin determining whether an activity actually benefits low and moderate incomepersons.) It should be noted, however, that where the activity proposedto be assisted with CDBG funds serves the general population of an area(in addition to those persons who would benefit from the other activityintended to be supported), the activity could not qualify for CDBG assistanceunder this national objective unless the area served met the criteria underandSection; 570.208(a)(1). The proposed rule contained a separate provision for considering, as benefittinglow and moderate income persons, certain projects for the removal of architecturalbarriers. The final rule contains this same provision, but incorporatesit under the criteria for limited clientele activities at andSection; 570.208(a)(2),and clarifies the buildings that may qualify for this purpose.The final rule contains a provision at andSection; 570.208(d)(3) reflectingthe Department's interpretation of section 105(c) of the Act concerningcertain activities that must meet two criteria in order to qualify as meetingthe national objective of benefitting low and moderate income persons.Proposed andSection; 570.208(b) set out criteria for determining whetheran activity meets the national objective of aiding in the prevention orelimination of slums or blight. Paragraph (b)(1) indicated how an activitywould qualify on an ``area basis,'' and included a provision that, throughoutthe area, there must be a substantial number of deteriorated or deteriorating``buildings.'' Previously, HUD also considered deteriorated or deteriorating``improvements'' under this criterion. HUD proposed to delete the term``improvements'' because of confusion among grantees over what it comprised.Several commenters objected to this proposed deletion, claiming that intheir communities there are areas in which buildings are structurally sound,but where public improvements are badly deteriorated. These commentersargued that they should be able to remedy deteriorated improvements withouthaving to wait until the blighting conditions cause the buildings to deteriorateas well. HUD's longstanding concern has been that CDBG funds not be usedfor the treatment of areas that would be widely regarded as attractive,rather than blighted. HUD recognizes, however, that there may be areaswhere public improvements are so deteriorated that they constitute a genuinethreat to the continued viability of an area by discouraging private investmentnecessary to maintain the buildings in the area. For this reason, the finalrule allows improvements to be considered, provided the improvements arepublic improvements and that the general state of most public improvementsthroughout the area is one of clear deterioration. The proposed criterion at andSection; 570.208(b)(1)(iv) would also have extendedthe special limitations related to the rehabilitation of residential structuresin an area to nonresidential structures. Under these limitations, a structurecan only be rehabilitated if it is first determined to be substandard (underlocal definition), and the rehabilitation is limited to treating the specificconditions that render the structure substandard before any less criticalwork can be undertaken. Several objections were raised to this proposal,mainly because of perceived difficulties in establishing criteria to beused for determining whether non-residential structures are substandard,given the broad array of non-residential buildings. As a result, the finalrule does <T3>not </T3>extend the limitations under the criterion to non-residentialbuildings. The final rule at andSection; 570.208(b)(2), related to the treatment ofslums and blight on a ``spot basis,'' has been revised to clarify thatthe rehabilitation authorized under this criterion is limited to buildings.Recent experience indicates that the term may be misread to cover publicimprovements as well. A broader application of that regulatory provisionwas not intended, and the rule now makes this clear. The final rule at andSection; 570.208(b)(3), concerning the treatment ofslums or blight in an urban renewal area, has been revised to clarify thatthis category is intended to permit completion of the redevelopment ofareas in which activities were begun with funds received under the FederalUrban Renewal and Neighborhood Development programs and for which areasthe urban renewal plan remains in effect. This provision also clarifiesthat once a property has been developed or redeveloped in accordance withthe plan, any future redevelopment of the same property is not consideredas necessary to complete the plan. Finally, the final rule now contains a provision at andSection; 570.208(d)(1)designed to clarify how the acquisition of real property must be viewedin determining if the acquisition addresses a national objective. Similarly,andSection; 570.208(d)(2) has been added to clarify how relocation activitiesmust be viewed in determining if the relocation meets a national objective.<ITAG tagnum="84">IV. Subpart D_Entitlement Grants </ITAG>Section 570.301 Presubmission requirements. This section reflects 1983 Act amendments to the Act, including expandedcitizen participation requirements in connection with a grantee's preparationof the final statement submitted to HUD. Two commenters offered suggestionsfor expanding citizen participation requirements beyond those specificallydescribed in the statute. Since then, the statute was amended by the 1987Act to again expand citizen participation requirements. A proposed rulereflecting the latest statutory amendment will be published soon for publiccomment. Many comments addressed the new requirements, at andSection; 570.301(a)(3)and (4) of the proposed rule, that grantees include in their statementsa description and assessment of their past use of CDBG funds. Commenterscomplained that this requirement adds an unnecessary administrative responsibilityand expense, since the grantee performance and evaluation report providesessentially the same information but in greater detail. The requirementsat issue reflected the specific provisions of section 104 of the Act, asamended by the 1983 Act. However, these requirements do not appear in thisfinal rule because they were deleted by the 1987 Act amendments to theAct. HUD invited specific comment on the requirement, at andSection; 570.301(b),that citizen participation procedures (including the furnishing of informationand conduct of public hearings) be carried out in a ``timely manner'' (asspecified in the Act), rather than within a ``specific minimum time period.''Most commenters responding to this issue favored the general approach proposed,as it affords grantees needed flexibility in carrying out the requirements.Accordingly, the proposed rule provisions have been retained. Six comments were received regarding publication of the proposed statement,although the Department had not proposed a change to this requirement.Five commenters wanted grantees to be able to publish a notice of availabilityof the proposed statement rather than publishing the actual statement.The primary reason offered was to reduce publication costs. The point wasalso made that the publication requirement tends to result in granteesproviding less comprehensive statements to the public. The Department hasnot adopted this suggestion because section 104(a)(2)(B) of the Act specificallyrequires publication of the proposed statement. However, it should be notedthat grantees may choose to publish community-wide an amount of informationon the items listed in andSection; 570.301(a) that is sufficient to satisfythe regulation, and then provide more detail to interested citizens byother means. Similarly, the final statement submitted to HUD and made availableto the public may provide greater detail than the proposed statement thatis published community-wide. Section 570.303 Certifications. Section 570.303(f) requires a grantee to certify that at least 60 percentof all CDBG funds expended by the grantee over the one, two or three yearperiod selected (under section 104(b)(3) of the Act) will principally benefitlow and moderate income persons. Several commenters argued that the ruledoes not afford a grantee needed flexibility if the grantee wishes to amendthe one, two or three year period originally selected. For the reasonsdescribed in the preamble to the proposed rule, the Department believesthat an amendment provision would have to be lengthy and complex. On theother hand, the apparent flexibility problem can be overcome by the Department'sability to exercise the waiver authority in andSection; 570.5. HUD will considerrequests for waivers for this purpose when the grantee can show that hardshipwould otherwise result, that application of the rule would adversely affectthe purposes of the Act, and that necessary actions will be taken to informcitizens and to adjust the period covered by the community developmentplan.Section 570.303(d) requires that a recipient certify that it will affirmativelyfurther fair housing. Actions taken for this purpose must further the policiesof Title VIII, and include activities to assure nondiscrimination in housingtransactions. The certifications required under andSection; 570.303 (g) and (h) have alreadybeen published in separate rulemaking actions. The first of these coverscompliance with lead-based paint hazard elimination requirements and thesecond covers compliance with relocation, displacement and acquisitionrequirements. These two certifications are included in this final rulewithout further change. With regard to the certification required under andSection; 570.303(i) (thatthe grantee has developed a community development plan), a commenter requestedclarification concerning the degree to which the final statement must beconsistent with the plan. The Act is silent on the relationship betweenthe final statement and the plan, except with respect to the period eachcovers. For this reason, and because the plan should be a locally developeddocument serving local needs, the Department has decided not to elaborateon the plan requirement in the regulations. Section 570.304 Making of grants. Section 570.304(d) indicates when and how a conditional grant may be madeby the Department. Under this provision, a grantee must execute and returnto HUD the conditional grant agreement within 60 days of the date of itstransmittal. Two commenters argued that 60 days is insufficient time fora governing body, which meets periodically, to consider any special conditions.However, it is the practice of the Department to impose a special conditiononly after a grantee has been provided ample notice of, and opportunityto correct, any performance problems that would give rise to a conditionalgrant. Accordingly, the grantee's governing body should be familiar withthe situation long before a grant agreement with special conditions istendered. Therefore, the Department believes the 60-day limit is adequateand it has been adopted in the final rule. If an exceptional case arises,a grantee could immediately petition the Department for a waiver of therule, under andSection; 570.5, and an extension of the time period required.Section 570.305 Amendments. The 1983 Act added section 104(a)(2)(E) to the Act, requiring a granteeto provide citizens with notice and opportunity to comment on any <T3>substantial changes </T3>it proposes to make to its final statementof activities before amending the final statement. The proposed rule, atandSection; 570.305, described the kinds of changes that would constitutea substantial change under the statute, and many commenters found the standardsin this section to be too rigid. Most objections focused on the standardwhich would have required an amendment whenever the amount to be expendedfor an activity was proposed to be increased or decreased by more than25 percent. A number of commenters argued that it is not uncommon for expenditureestimates to be over or under actual costs by more than 25 percent, eventhough there has been no change in activity scope, location, design orbeneficiaries. As a result, the time and expense of the amendment processcould be triggered unnecessarily. It was further argued that the 25-percentthreshold would have the anomalous result of requiring an amendment fora $1,001 cost overrun in a $4,000 activity, while not requiring an amendmentfor a $250,000 change in a $1,000,000 activity. Another point made is thatthe proposed standard failed to indicate whether an amendment would berequired when an accumulation of smaller changes to an activity finallyexceeded 25 percent. Commenters also objected to the standard that would have required an amendmentwhenever the location of an activity was changed. While the commentersagreed that location changes affecting <T3>who </T3>will benefit from the activity should trigger an amendment,they argued that many other location changes are not significant enoughto warrant final statement amendments. HUD has decided to revise the rule in a manner that should eliminate theseproblems by providing grantees with added discretion in achieving the purposeof section 104(a)(2)(E) of the Act. The final rule requires the granteeto amend its final statement whenever it decides to drop or add an activity,or to change substantially the purpose, scope, location or beneficiariesof an activity. The grantee is also required to develop and make publicits criteria for what constitutes a substantial change for this purpose.The Department is relying on each grantee to develop criteria which willensure that citizens are kept informed of proposed changes in the localCDBG program that may significantly affect them. If experience should showthat this objective is not being met, the Department will propose a rulerevision to require grantees to observe public participation requirementsunder specified circumstances. Comments were also received concerning (1) whether the rule should specifywhat constitutes <T3>reasonable </T3>notice of a proposed amendment to citizens, and (2)the need for submitting an SF 424 and certifications to HUD each time anamendment to the final statement is made. What constitutes reasonable noticewill vary, depending upon the nature and significance of proposed changes.For this reason, it would be inappropriate for the Department to promulgatea uniform rule governing what is reasonable. Rather, it is for local governmentsto assure that their citizens receive sufficient notice of, and opportunityto comment on, substantial changes to their programs. Under the final rule,HUD will also <T3>not </T3>require grantees to submit an SF 424 and certifications eachtime an amendment is made. This is because amendments will not alter thetotal grant amount received from HUD, and certifications submitted withthe original final statement apply to all funds covered by the grant agreement.However, a letter transmitting any amendment to HUD must be signed by thegrantee's official representative for the CDBG program. Section 570.306 Housing assistance plan. HUD proposed two changes to the requirements for housing assistance plans(HAPs). Public comments addressed other aspects of the HAP section as well.Initially, HUD proposed that a grantee must identify, in its descriptionof its housing stock, the number of abandoned housing units. This additionto the rule at andSection; 570.306(e)(1) reflected a 1983 Act amendment tosection 104(c)(1)(A) of the Act. Commenters indicated that many communitiesdo not have information on housing units that have been abandoned, andthat such data would be very difficult and costly to acquire. However,the statute requires that the HAP contain the number of such units. While no changes were proposed on the HAP requirements for setting goals,several commenters pointed out difficulties in establishing and meetinggoals because of diminishing resources. Particular concern was expressedover the requirement for maintaining goals for various household typesproportionate to the needs of each. It was noted that a grantee may findmore units are actually proposed to be provided for one household typethan it targeted, while insufficient units are available for other householdtypes as a result of the kind of resources made available during the HAPperiod. Under previous rules, HUD would not approve a proposal for housingassistance that would result in exceeding the grantee's three-year goalfor a household type by more than 20 percent, unless the HAP was duly amended.The final rule, however, contains a provision (andSection; 570.306(e)(3)(vi))that allows certain HAP amendments to be approved where goals are not proportionateto needs. This authority applies only to the second or third years of athree-year HAP, and then only where (1) the amendment is needed to accommodatean otherwise acceptable proposal for housing assistance from HUD; (2) resourcesare not available to support commensurate increases in the goals of theother household types; and (3) HUD determines that the grantee has takenall reasonable steps to meet its three-year goals for the other householdtypes, and has taken no actions designed to block the provision of housingassistance. Other commenters questioned the wisdom of requiring grantees to establishthree-year goals at all, given that the future availability of particularresources is so uncertain. It is largely because of the uncertainty relatedto resource availability that long-term planning is so necessary if granteesare to maximize the benefit of housing assistance. HUD proposed no change to andSection; 570.306(e)(2)(ii), the narrative statementaccompanying the housing assistance needs assessment which identifies totalminority households and the special housing needs and/or conditions ofindividual minority groups. While assistance must be delivered in a nondiscriminatorymanner, the section does not imply that grantees must establish goals andprovide assistance that is proportional to the percentage of minority householdsor groups with identified needs. HUD intends no such implication. No granteeis required by this section to attain or maintain any particular levelof participation in its HAP activities by groups or households based onrace, ethnicity or gender.HUD proposed, under andSection; 570.306(e)(5)(iii), to require grantees thatidentify general locations for new construction or substantial rehabilitationto also identify at least one specific site that meets the applicable siteand neighborhood standards within each general location. Commenters arguedthat this would be an unreasonable burden, since the continued availabilityof a particular site cannot be guaranteed, and since grantees do not knowwhich property a developer might propose using. HUD agrees with this assessment,and the final rule does not contain the specific site identification requirement.Finally, commenters objected to the requirement, at andSection; 570.306(e)(3)(iv),that in order for the rehabilitation of dwelling units to assist lowerincome households, the units, if rental units, must be at<T3> affordable rents.</T3> Commenters alleged that this requirement hasimposed an undue monitoring burden on grantees, given the amount of resourcesavailable for program administration. Section 104(c)(1)(B) of the Act requiresthe HAP to contain provisions adequate to assure that a preponderance ofpersons assisted by subsidized rehabilitation should be of low and moderateincome. The statute does not impose the affordable rent requirement. Formost entitlement grantees, the majority of rehabilitation assistance goesto homeowners. Also, programs most often used for assisting rehabilitationof rental units (Rental Rehab, CDBG, and Section 8 Moderate Rehab) eachcontain requirements related to rent levels charged to low and moderateincome persons. For all of these reasons, HUD has decided that the affordablerent requirement need not be separately imposed for HAP purposes, and thefinal rule reflects this decision.The final rule regarding the HAP also reflects several changes from the1987 Act amendments to the Act. All references to ``lower income'' personsand households have been replaced by the terms ``low and moderate incomepersons'' and ``low and moderate income households.'' This change was madeto achieve consistency of terminology throughout the CDBG rules and hasno substantive effect. Additionally, the final rule at andSection; 570.306(e)(3)(v)and andSection; 570.306(e)(4)(ii) incorporates the new statutory requirementthat the HAP specify those actions that will be undertaken to minimizedisplacement of low income persons and of moderate income persons, specifiedseparately; and those actions that will be undertaken to preserve or expandthe availability of housing for low income persons and for moderate incomepersons, specified separately.Section 570.307 Displacement.The proposed rule described requirements for a statement of local policyon displacement. All requirements related to displacement have been consolidatedin andSection; 570.606 which was recently published as an interim rule (53FR 31234) and includes 1987 Act requirements. (The provisions on urbancounties and joint requests, set out in the proposed rule at andSection;andSection;570.308 and 570.309, have been redesignated andSection;andSection; 570.307and 570.308.)Section 570.307 Urban counties.One comment was received on the proposed provision at andSection; 570.308(b)(2)(now redesignated 570.307(b)(2)) which would allow the Department, underdelineated circumstances, to refuse to accept the cooperation agreementbetween a unit of general local government and an urban county. Becauseof the potentially serious effect that such an action may have, the commentersuggested the inclusion of safeguards to ensure that the urban county willbe provided opportunities to challenge HUD's intended action before itis taken. The Department agrees, and safeguards have been added equivalentto those set out under andSection; 570.911 that apply in the case of a proposedgrant reduction, withdrawal or adjustment. In essence, the county and unitof local government will be given advance notice and opportunity to contestHUD's finding. The commenter also suggested including a cross-referenceto andSection; 570.307 in andSection; 570.906 ``Review of urban counties,''which describes an urban county's accountability for the actions or omissionsof any of the units of general local government participating in the urbancounty. Such a cross-reference has been added at andSection; 570.906.Additionally, andSection; 570.307 has been modified to reflect the changesto section 102 of the Act made by section 503 of the 1987 Act.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart J_Grant Administration</ITAG>Subpart J was published as a final rule on March 11, 1988 (53 FR 8034)as part of the changes to the CDBG program regulations to implement thegovernment-wide regulations on the Uniform Administrative Requirementsfor Grants and Cooperative Agreements to State and Local Governments (the``common rule''). Therefore, Subpart J is not being amended by this rulemakingexcept for andSection; 570.506 covering records and andSection; 570.507 coveringreports.Section 570.506 Records to be maintained.This section was reserved in the common rule because the records whichthe Department intended to specify included civil rights records. Pendingresolution of the issues raised by DOJ, the recordkeeping requirementswere not changed and remained in Subpart O. This final rule now specifiesrecordkeeping requirements, including those for civil rights requirements.The proposed rule indicated that the recipient must maintain sufficientrecords to enable the Secretary to determine whether the recipient hasmet program requirements. Comment was specifically solicited on whetherthe regulations should contain a more detailed treatment of records tobe maintained. Three-quarters of those who commented on this issue favoredgreater detail. More specificity, they said, would help avoid conflictsbetween HUD and recipients over whether sufficient records have been maintained.Commenters also pointed out that more detail would help avoid findingsarising out of HUD reviews and audits. Based on these comments, and recognizingthe critical need for maintenance of adequate records in the entitlementprogram because reliance is placed almost exclusively on post-approvalmonitoring, the Department has revised andSection; 570.506 to provide a moredetailed treatment of recordkeeping requirements.The description of these records is somewhat different than the descriptionthat appeared in the preamble to the proposed rule. These changes are duealmost entirely to changes in the basic rules on the subject matter aboutwhich records are maintained_especially the rules on meeting the nationalobjectives of the program. However, one change results from a commenter'ssuggestion. The commenter recommended that where information on familysize and income is required, HUD should recognize, as an acceptable substitute,evidence that the person assisted qualifies under another program havingincome qualification criteria at least as stringent as under the CDBG program.In addition to including this concept in the final rule, the Departmenthas provided another acceptable substitute. The recipient may also substitutea copy of a certification from the assisted person that his or her familyincome does not exceed the applicable income limit. The form used for thispurpose must, however, indicate that the certification is subject to verificationby the grantee and HUD.Section 570.506 (g)(2) and (g)(4) have been modified to indicate that theinformation provided shall be used only as a basis for further inquiryas to compliance with nondiscrimination requirements, and that no recipientis required to attain or maintain any particular statistical level of participationbased on race, ethnicity or gender.Section 570.506(g)(6) has been modified so that recordkeeping documentsthe recipient's affirmative steps to assure that minority and women's businessenterprises have an equal opportunity to obtain or compete for contracts.Examples of affirmative steps are included; they may not include a preferenceto a business in contract awards based on race or gender.Section 570.507 Reports.When this section was published as part of the common rule, the sectiondid not consolidate the reports that were then required under Subpart O.All report requirements are now found in andSection; 570.507.Several commenters were concerned that the proposed deadline for submissionof the performance and evaluation report by entitlement recipients wastoo tight, given the statutory change made by the 1983 Act requiring recipientsto make the report available to citizens for comment before submittingit to HUD. The proposed rule would have required the report to be submitted75 days after the completion of the most recent program year. Based onthe comment record, and in order to be consistent with the reporting deadlineestablished for annual reports in 24 CFR 85.40, andSection; 570.507(a)(2)(i)of the final rule establishes the deadline as 90 days after completionof the most recent program year.With respect to the timing of the performance and evaluation reports requiredfrom recipients of HUD-administered small cities grants, one minor changehas been made. A provision has been added to andSection; 570.507(a)(2)(ii)(B)stating that if HUD determines that the previous report adequately describesproject results, HUD will notify the recipient that a final report is notnecessary.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart K_Other Program Requirements  </ITAG><T3>Section 570.601 Pub. L. 88-352 and Pub. L. 90-284; affirmatively furtheringfair housing; Executive Order 11063.  </T3>This section describes generally the contents of Title VI, Title VIII,Executive Order 11063, and the section 104(b)(2) requirement that the granteewill affirmatively further fair housing here, and whenever the term ``affirmativelyfurther[ing] fair housing'' is used in this regulation.  Clarifying word changes in andSection;570.601(b) have been adopted to moreaccurately reflect the conduct made unlawful under Title VIII and to indicatethat the actions taken to affirmatively further fair housing required inthe administration of programs must further the policies of Title VIII.In this respect these actions include activities to assure nondiscriminationin housing transactions. Activities involving educational programs to makepersons involved in the housing market, such as real estate brokers andapartment managers aware of their responsibilities under Title VIII wouldbe appropriate. However, activities undertaken to attain or maintain particularstatistical measures of participation for persons on the basis of race,color, religion, sex or national origin would not be permissible.  The fair housing requirements of Title VIII are expectd to be amended bythe Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 which has been passed by Congressand is expected to be signed by the President in early September. The amendmentswould be effective in March 1989. Implementing regulations would be publishedin 1989. Thereafter, the CDBG regulations will be amended to reflect thestatutory changes that affect CDBG recipients.  <T3>Section 570.602 Section 109 of the Act.  </T3>No changes had been proposed by HUD to this section which deals with thenondiscrimination requirements contained in section 109. As a result ofDOJ review, a number of changes were made. The changes that are substantivereflect existing law.  In andSection;570.602(b)(4)(i), the phrase ``or if there is sufficient evidenceto conclude that such discrimination existed'' has been added, and theword ``remedial'' has been added before ``affirmative action.'' This emphasizesthat measures taken to address discriminatory practices (past or present)should be tailored to the particular practices involved. (See <T3>Wygant v. Jackson Board of Education</T3>, 476 U.S. 267, (1986).) The word ``nondiscriminatory'' has been added before ``affirmative action''in andSection;570.602(b)(4)(ii) and the second paragraph has been eliminated.This underscores limitations on affirmative action measures in the absenceof a finding of discrimination or a situation where there is evidence toconclude that discrimination has occured (which are addressed in (b)(4)(i)and (b)(4)(iii)). Several word changes have been made in andSection;570.602(b)(4)(iii)for clarification.  The Department has made no change in Part 570 with respect to the definitionsof ``program or activity'' or ``funded in whole or in part with communitydevelopment funds,'' which define the coverage of section 109. It appearsthat the present coverage is not inconsistent with the definition of ``programor activity'' contained in the Civil Rights Restoration Act of 1987. Inasmuchas the Restoration Act is applicable to Title VI, but not to section 109,this issue can be revisited if DOJ revises the government-wide Title VIregulation (28 CFR 42.401 et seq.) or issues other guidance to implementchanges required by that Act.  No change has been made to andSection;570.602(b)(2), which prohibits theuse of criteria or methods of administration that have the effect of discriminatingagainst individuals of a particular race, color, national origin, or sex.It should be noted that not all instances of disparate impact constituteillegal discrimination. If a neutral policy that causes a disparate impactis manifestly related to the accomplishment of a program objective, theneutral policy does not violate this provision.  Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, is applicableto CDBG activities both by its own terms and through incorporation in section109 of the Act. The Department's final section 504 regulation, publishedon June 2, 1988 (53 FR 20215) spells out in more detail the applicationof section 504 to the CDBG program.  The Department plans, in the future, to publish a separate section 109compliance regulation. That regulation will contain specific provisionswith respect to complaint processing and compliance reviews. In the interimthe Department will follow the compliance procedures as they are set forthin the section 504 regulation, andSection;andSection;8.56-8.71 (53 FR 20243-50).   Section 570.603 Labor standards.This regulation has been amended to reflect the change to section 110 ofthe Act made by section 523 of the 1987 Act. The requirements of section110 now apply to the rehabilitation of residential property that ``containsnot less than 8 units,'' rather than to property ``designed for residentialuse of eight or more families.''One commenter suggested that the project threshold for payment of prevailingwages under the Davis-Bacon Act at andSection; 570.603 be increased to $25,000.The $2,000 threshold, however, is a statutory requirement (Davis-BaconAct, 40 U.S.C. 276a(a)).Another commenter felt that the word ``structure'' should be substitutedfor ``property'' in the third sentence of andSection; 570.603. Since section110 of the Act uses the word ``property,'' the suggested change has notbeen made.Section 570.606 Relocation, displacement and acquisition.This section was published as an interim regulation on August 17, 1988(53 FR 31234). The interim regulation sets forth the displacement, relocation,replacement housing, and real property acquisition requirements, includingnew requirements added to the Act by section 509 of the 1987 Act. The sectionis included in this final rule without additional change.Section 570.607 Employment and contracting opportunities.One commenter asked whether the provision at andSection; 570.607(b) allowsgrantees to select either the area of its unit of local government, orthe metropolitan area, in carrying out its responsibilities under section3 to provide employment and contracting opportunities to low income residentsof the project area. The commenter also asked whether grantees could makethis selection on a project-by-project basis.Section 3 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1968 (12 U.S.C.1701u) states that areas for section 3 compliance are ``determined by theSecretary.'' A grantee may not select the area or areas in which it willcarry out section 3 responsibilities for its overall program. A granteemay recommend to HUD the area it believes should apply, along with thereasons for the choice, in order to receive HUD's determination.Section 570.608 Lead-based paint.The final regulation implementing the requirements concerning lead-basedpaint was published February 17, 1987 (52 FR 4870) with additional changespublished June 6, 1988 (53 FR 20790). This section is included in thisfinal rule without additional change.Section 570.610 Uniform Administrative Requirements and Cost Principlesand andSection; 570.611(a) (1) and (2) Conflict of Interest.These sections were included in the final rulemaking of March 11, 1988(53 FR 8034) which implemented uniform requirements for grants and cooperativeagreements. These sections are included in this rulemaking without additionalchange.Section 570.612 Executive Order 12372.This provision, proposed as andSection; 570.613 but now redesignated andSection;570.612, identifies circumstances under which Executive Order 12372 onIntergovernmental Review of Federal Programs applies. It applies to theCDBG Entitlement program only where an Entitlement grantee proposes touse funds for the planning or construction of water or sewer facilities.However, under the UDAG program, it applies to <T3>all</T3> activities proposed to be assisted. The rule has been revisedto more clearly reflect this point.One commenter questioned whether the ``construction'' of water and sewerfacilities should include ``reconstruction, rehabilitation, or installation,''as stated in paragraph (b). The commenter objected in particular to theapplicability of the Executive Order to minor rehabilitation work on waterand sewer facilities. Consistent with the notice identifying programs subjectto 24 CFR Part 52 (52 FR 4755, February 13, 1987), the Department has deletedthe word ``rehabilitation'' from this provision.The same commenter also recommended that the Department limit the applicabilityof E.O. 12372 to projects over a certain dollar amount. In order not tolimit the flexibility of the State process, the Department has not establishedthreshold levels for activities subject to review.<ITAG tagnum="84">VII. Subpart M_Loan Guarantees</ITAG>Section 570.700 Eligible applicants.A commenter recommended that HUD set forth some examples of loan guaranteesin the regulation, to clarify who may receive such assistance. Examplesare unnecessary for this purpose. The only kind of loan guarantee availableunder this subpart is the Department's guarantee of notes or other obligationsissued by metropolitan cities and urban counties or their public agencydesignees. (Loan guarantee assistance provided by the Department to recipientsunder Subpart M should not be confused with loan guarantee assistance providedby a recipient to another party, e.g., to a private property owner underandSection; 570.202.)The same commenter asked whether andSection; 570.700 also applies to subrecipientsinvolved in revolving loan funds. Section 570.700 only applies to unitsof general local government and their designated public agencies whichare borrowers of loans guaranteed by HUD under Subpart M.Section 570.701 Eligible Activities.A provision has been added to the introductory language in andSection; 570.701to specify that guaranteed loan funds may not be used to reimburse a programaccount or letter of credit, for costs incurred by the recipient or itsdesignated public agency and paid with other CDBG funds. This amendmentwill preclude any interim financing of guaranteed loan activities withinterest free grant funds, a practice that would result in the inappropriateshifting of interest expense to the Federal government.Additional eligible activities have been added to andSection; 570.701 whichimplement the changes to section 108 of the Act made by section 514 ofthe 1987 Act. Section 108 now permits the guaranteed loan funds to be usedfor ``housing rehabilitation'' and ``economic development activities permittedunder paragraphs (14), (15), and (17) of section 105(a) [of the Act].''Accordingly, andSection; 570.701(h) makes eligible housing rehabilitationeligible under andSection; 570.202, subsection (i) makes eligible activitieseligible under andSection; 570.203, subsection (j) makes eligible communityeconomic development projects eligible under andSection; 570.204, and subsection(k) makes eligible other economic development activities permitted undersection 105(a)(14) of the Act which are not covered under andSection; 570.203.Subsection (g) was added to the regulations on March 2, 1987 (52 FR 6140)and is included in this rulemaking without further change.In addition, subparagraphs (1) and (2) under subsection (a) are being deletedas unnecessary. These examples of acquisition were intended to facilitatethe use of guaranteed loan funds for economic development. Guaranteed loanfunds may now be used directly for economic development activities.One commenter asked the Department to clarify whether leasebacks allowedunder andSection; 570.701(a) are also allowed under andSection; 570.701(b),which authorizes the use of guaranteed loan funds to rehabilitate realproperty owned or acquired by the recipient or its public agency designee.The use of guaranteed loan funds for rehabilitation under andSection; 570.701(b)does not affect the authority currently possessed by a recipient or publicagency designee to dispose of real property it owns or acquires by lease.However, it should be noted that the Use of Real Property standards specifiedin andSection; 570.505 would apply to publicly owned real property rehabilitatedunder andSection; 570.701(b).A commenter suggested that andSection; 570.701(b) should be amended to specifythe kinds of funding that could be used by a recipient or its designeeto acquire real property to be rehabilitated, and to clarify whether suchfunding is limited to guaranteed loan funds. Because rehabilitation canbe carried out in relation to real property acquired with public fundsfrom numerous other sources, including donation, the suggested change wouldresult in less clarity and is not being adopted.One commenter recommended that andSection; 570.701 be revised to indicatethat when the loan guarantee assistance is for economic development purposes,the guaranteed loan may have a term of 20 years, and the applicant willnot be required to establish a loan loss reserve. An unrestricted authorizationof a 20-year term for economic development would be inconsistent with theprogram design that requires repayment within six years except where anextended period is necessary to achieve the purposes of the Act. With respectto the recommendation that a loss reserve not be required, the Departmentbelieves that it would be prudent to retain the option to impose such additionalsecurity requirements. Accordingly, neither recommendation has been accepted.Section 570.702 Application requirements.Section 570.702(d)(3)(vi) provides that HUD may disapprove an applicationif activities to be undertaken with the guaranteed loan funds do not meetcriteria at andSection; 570.208 for compliance with one of the national objectivesof the Act. A commenter suggested that HUD should either make this determinationafter the funds have been expended, or revise the rule to allow for disapprovalof an application if it appears that proposed activities would not meetany andSection; 570.208 criteria. It is necessary for the Department to makethe determination at issue in advance of approving an application. Moreover,the Department has sufficient information before it when reviewing an applicationto make the decision. It also should be noted that HUD will monitor activitiesto ensure that national objectives are actually met, after an applicationhas been approved.A provision on amendments has been added to this section. Paragraph (d)(5)provides that amendments to the loan guarantee application must complywith the requirements of andSection; 570.305. If the applicant wishes tocarry out an activity not previously described in its final statement,or to change substantially the purpose, scope, location or beneficiariesof an activity, HUD approval must be obtained.Section 570.702(f) was published as an interim rule on August 17, 1988(53 FR 31234) as part of the rulemaking implementing the requirements foracquisition, displacement and relocation. This subsection is included inthis final rule without additional change.Section 570.703 Loan requirements.A commenter described the maximum loan amount authorized by andSection; 570.703(a),equal to three times the applicant's entitlement grant, as a burden onentitlement funds and recommended that it be reduced. The Department believesthat the permissible amount_the maximum allowable under section 108(b)of the Act_provides communities with needed flexibility in carrying outlarge projects, particularly when the guaranteed loan is to be repaid fromsources other than CDBG funds. Consequently, this provision has not beenrevised.One commenter suggested that either Subpart J or Subpart M should containa policy statement on the investment of guaranteed loans funds on a short-termbasis. Guaranteed loan funds may be invested pending disbursement for authorizedpurposes, and the investment income constitutes program income. However,to provide the Department with sufficient flexibility to protect the FederalGovernment's security interest with respect to each loan guarantee, theDepartment believes investment policy should be governed by the contractrequired under andSection; 570.703(b)(1). Accordingly, the contract for loanguarantee assistance has been modified to provide guidance on this issue,but the regulations are not being revised.Section 570.703 (d) and (h) were published as final rules (52 FR 6140)since publication of the proposed changes for this final rule. These subsectionsimplemented section 3002 of the Consolidate Omnibus Budget ReconciliationAct of 1985 (Pub. L. 99-272, approved April 7, 1986) which prohibited thepurchase of the guaranteed loans by the Federal Financing Bank and whichrequired HUD to take actions to provide private sector financing of theguaranteed loans. Subsections (d) and (h) are included in this final rulemakingwithout additional change except that (h) has been redesignated as (g).Section 570.703(g) was also published as a final rule (50 FR 5750). Thissubsection imposed a loan guarantee fee to defray costs incurred by HUDto process applications and service the guaranteed loans. Section 514 ofthe 1987 Act amended section 108 of the Act and prohibits such fees. Therefore,this subsection has been removed.Section 570.706 Sanctions.This section has been added to clarify that the performance review proceduredescribed in Subpart O for entitlement recipients applies to loan guaranteeassistance. Performance deficiencies in the use of guaranteed loan fundsmay result in the imposition of a sanction against the pledged entitlementgrants.<ITAG tagnum="84">VIII. Subpart O_Performance Reviews</ITAG>Before discussing sections in Subpart O on an individual basis, an issueof general applicability warrants discussion. A number of commenters expressedconcern that the criteria described throughout Subpart O would constituteperformance requirements and that failure to meet any of them would likelyresult in sanctions being imposed upon grantees. HUD has established thecriteria so that grantees will know what HUD considers to be satisfactoryperformance and will be able to manage their programs with greater assurancethat they will be judged by HUD to be performing satisfactorily. The criteriaalso enable HUD to identify grantees that may be experiencing difficultiesin performing adequately. A grantee that has been found by HUD not to havemet the civil rights review criteria will be provided an opportunity todemonstrate that it has nonetheless met the civil rights requirements.A grantee whose performance is found not to meet the performance criteria(other than civil rights criteria) will be given ample opportunity to presentinformation that contests the validity of the finding. If a grantee isunsuccessful in contesting that finding, HUD may require the grantee toundertake appropriate corrective or remedial action. HUD could then imposea sanction affecting the grantee's funding only after the grantee has failedto undertake corrective or remedial action that satisfactorily resolvesthe deficiency and has been given an opportunity for informal consultationregarding the sanction. HUD believes that this approach will lead to afair and more uniform performance review, and thus will constitute a significantimprovement in this aspect of the program's administration.Section 570.900 General.On August 17, 1988, HUD published an interim rule to implement requirementsfor acquisition, displacement and relocation. (53 FR 31234). That ruleincluded the revision of andSection; 570.900(a). That subsection of the interimregulation is now being superseded by this final rule.Two commenters requested that HUD give advance public notice of when itwill review an entitlement grantee's performance under andSection; 570.900,so that citizens can comment on or participate in the reviews. However,HUD's review of the performance of entitlement grantees is a continualprocess involving evaluation of Grantee Performance Reports, on-site monitoring,and in-house reviews throughout the year. Citizens may comment to HUD atany time concerning any perceived failures by a grantee to meet programrequirements. Moreover, section 508 of the 1987 Act amends section 104(a)of the Act to add the requirement for a citizen participation plan withspecific elements. HUD plans to publish in the near future a proposed ruleto implement the new citizen participation requirements.Commenters also requested that HUD describe all of the documentation thatgrantees are required to keep to fulfill the needs of the Department inconducting the performance reviews described in Subpart O. Because of thewide variety of activities carried out by CDBG entitlement recipients andthe differing circumstances affecting how those activities are implemented,it is not possible to produce a description of all required documentation.Recordkeeping requirements are identified in some detail at andSection; 570.506.Grantees may contact their local HUD Field Office if they need furtherguidance regarding specific records to be kept on particular activities.Section 570.902 Review to determine if CDBG funded activities are beingcarried out in a timely manner.Some commenters stated that the review threshold at andSection; 570.902(a)(1)(i)for identifying grantees that are making too-slow progress in implementingtheir programs should be greater than 1.25 years of unexpended funds inthe letter of credit (<T3>i.e.</T3>, there should be a more lenient criterion). Other commentersrecommended that HUD use a lesser threshold (<T3>i.e.</T3>, a stricter criterion). In considering these comments, HUDupdated its evaluation of the effect of a 1.25 year standard on granteesby analyzing more current drawdown patterns of entitlement grantees. Theresults indicated that using the 1.25 standard would produce untimely performancefindings for approximately one-third of the entitlement grantees. Sincethe Department's intent in establishing this review criterion is to identifygrant recipients experiencing substantial difficulties in timely implementationof their CDBG activities, an appropriate criterion should be more selective.Therefore, for this criterion, the Department has decided to employ a 1.5year standard.Several commenters expressed concern that HUD would impose sanctions ongrantees that did not meet the performance standard. While this could happen,the Department wishes to make clear that a grantee will only be subjectto a grant reduction for untimely program progress after it has been (1)provided an opportunity to contest the finding, (2) given an opportunityto improve its performance, and substantially failed to do so, (3) notifiedof the proposed grant reduction, and (4) given an opportunity for an informalconsultation.Several commenters recommended that HUD should find a grantee to be carryingout its activities in a timely manner if the grantee met either, as opposedto both, of the criteria set out at andSection; 570.902(a)(1)(i) and andSection;570.902(a)(1)(ii). Under the latter provision, the grantee (of at leasttwo consecutive CDBG grants) is considered to be performing in a timelymanner if the amount of funds disbursed to it during the previous 12-monthperiod is equal to or greater than one-half of the CDBG funds made availablefor the grantee's current program year. Under this approach, however, grantrecipients having large amounts in their letters of credit could meet thesecond test and still be accumulating increasingly larger amounts (andpercentages) of undisbursed funds. The purpose of the review criterionat andSection; 570.902(a)(1)(ii) is to provide a means of quickly identifyingrecipients that may be developing a program progress problem. In any suchinstance, the Department will work with the grantee to avoid the need forany funding sanction.Several commenters recommended that HUD review amounts obligated by granteesinstead of actual disbursements from the letters of credit. This is notfeasible, however, since definitions of ``obligations'' and ``encumbrances''at the local level vary, and because of the relative inaccessibility ofsuch data to HUD. Moreover, requiring grantees to submit data on ``obligations''at the time that a subsequent grant award is being considered would significantlyincrease grantee reporting requirements_a result that is neither desirableor warranted. However, if HUD identifies a progress problem under the performancecriteria at andSection; 570.902, it will consider the amount of funds obligatedbut not yet drawn down as part of its further review of the grantee's performance.Several commenters recommended that the Department include a statementin the regulations indicating that factors such as the accumulation oflarge and unanticipated amounts of program income, lawsuits, strikes, andshort construction seasons will be considered by HUD in conducting progressreviews. Where unpredictable events are the cause of slow performance,they will be considered by HUD in determining whether there is any needfor corrective actions. HUD would caution grantees, however, that predictableevents should be handled as a normal responsibility of a grantee in managingits activities, and will not justify continual slow program progress.One commenter objected to the review being conducted 60 days before theend of the program year. Although tests of program progress may also beconducted at other times during the program year, a review must be conductedsufficiently in advance of the end of the program year to provide HUD withadequate time further to investigate apparent performance problems in sufficientdetail before funding decisions are made on the next annual grant. HUDwill not base its funding actions solely on the drawdown rates of grantees.There is evidence that a growing number of grantees are using CDBG fundsas an interim financing tool. In such cases, large sums are drawn downfrom the letter of credit, used for a relatively short period, and thenrepaid to the grantees. Such funds are then held as program income by thegrantees, and could escape consideration under the timeliness criteriain the proposed rule. HUD believes that grantees that have large amountsof program income on hand should not be given an automatic presumptionof carrying out their CDBG activities in a timely way, based only on theamount of funds currently in their letter of credit or the amounts recentlydrawn down from it. Therefore, a provision has been added to the reviewcriterion at andSection; 570.902(a)(2) that will enable HUD to consider programincome amounts and, where appropriate, to override the determination oftimeliness that would result under the criteria at andSection; 570.902(a)(1).Section 570.903 Review to determine if the Housing Assistance Plan (HAP)is being carried out in a timely manner.Three commenters addressed andSection; 570.903. Two city officials supportedlimiting reviews of HAP performance to Federal housing assistance madeavailable. One public interest group recommended that CDBG funds be specificallyidentified as available resources for housing rehabilitation, both in HAPdevelopment and in HAP performance reviews.HAP performance reviews are designed to measure the recipients' progressin providing all types of assistance proposed in the approved HAPs. Sincegrantees are required to base goals on State, local, and Federal resourcesexpected to be made available, it follows logically that performance reviewsshould cover the same resources.The Department recognizes CDBG funds as available assistance for HAP goalsand performance when the grantee elects to use some of its funds for thatpurpose. However, HUD will not require the use of CDBG funds for meetinghousing assistance needs when they are not described in a grantee's HAP.No revision to andSection; 570.903 is required.Section 570.904 Equal opportunity and fair housing review criteria.Comments received in relation to andSection; 570.904 generally fell withintwo basic categories: those that favored more stringent review criteriaand those that favored more lenient criteria. Before addressing specificissues raised by commenters, it would be helpful to outline again the generalframework within which the review criteria will be employed.The criteria used for review in this section of Subpart O do not constitute<T3>performance requirements.</T3> Instead, these criteria are designedto provide grantees with the criteria HUD will use to monitor their performance,so that they can manage their programs with greater assurance that HUDwill judge them to be performing satisfactorily. This is so because HUDwill use these review criteria to identify those grantees where it cannotbe presumed that the performance is adequate. Barring evidence to the contraryreceived from outside sources or resulting from HUD performance reviews,a grantee will be presumed to be in compliance with civil rights certificationsand requirements of the Act if these review criteria are met. Where thecriteria are not met, HUD will examine the policies, procedures and practicesof the grantee to determine whether they comply with civil rights requirementsof the Act.It is appropriate to design the review criteria in this fashion as a resultof program size, complexity and flexibility. Because of the size and complexityof the CDBG program, and the flexibility afforded grantees in carryingout eligible activities, the Department cannot monitor every policy, practiceand procedure of every grantee each year to determine the effect each ishaving on the provision of services, benefits participation and employmentto each racial and ethnic group in a grantee's population. Therefore, thereview process provides a method by which the Department can separate outpotential problem situations from those that do not appear to present aproblem. The Department can then focus its limited monitoring and enforcementresources on the former situations. Although the initial problem is thefailure to meet a review criterion, the emphasis immediately shifts tothe task of determining the <T3>reasons</T3> for why the situation exists.Finally, because the CDBG program provides great flexibility to granteesin the selection and administration of funded activities, the Departmentbelieves grantees should know the parameters within which they may operateand assume that HUD will find their performance acceptable. Without thisguidance, grantees may not know, until it is too late, that a problem isoccurring. HUD believes that this approach will lead to a fair and moreuniform performance review, and thus constitute a significant improvementin this aspect of the program's administration.Section 570.904(b) sets out criteria governing HUD's review for ``equalopportunity.'' Paragraph (b)(1) of this section specifically addresses<T3>equal employment opportunity.</T3> Included in the comments that addressedthis provision were suggestions that (1) labor force should be definedmore narrowly; (2) the entire workforce should be ``tested'' and not justnew hires; (3) compliance reviews in connection with minority and femaleemployment should be based on characteristics of the grantee's jurisdiction,rather than of the labor market area; (4) HUD should define ``operatingunit''; and (5) HUD should require grantee affirmative action even in theabsence of any formal finding of discrimination by the grantee.This subsection has been substantially rewritten as a result of commentsby DOJ. Use of proportional representation as a ``safe harbor'' was objectionable.In fact, a lack of proportional representation by race does not, itself,constitute a violation of section 109, and the existence of proportionalrepresentation by race does not insulate a recipient from a charge of actualdiscrimination. Nor is proportional employment, or beneficiary participation,the touchstone of section 109's nondiscrimination requirements; nondiscrimination,i.e., the treatment of persons without regard to race, ethnicity, or gender,is. Therefore, the focus has been changed to a ``totality of circumstances''test. Unless the totality of circumstances indicates that persons protectedby section 109 are deprived of employment, promotion and training activitiesbecause of race, ethnicity, or gender in those administrative units fundedin whole or in part with CDBG funds, then the recipient will have met thisreview criterion.The Department does not believe that section 109 requires affirmative actionunless there is an earlier formal finding of discrimination by HUD or acourt of law or the existence of factors from which the recipient has afirm basis for concluding that discrimination has occurred. Absent thesecircumstances, the requirement is that grantees avoid discrimination, notthat they must take affirmative action to provide equal opportunity inservices, benefits and participation. The review criterion does not changethe Department's ability under the compliance regulations to require granteesto take affirmative action to overcome the effects of past discrimination.Otherwise, the Department cannot dictate that local governments expendmoney for a specific activity. Grantees may, however, <T3>voluntarily </T3>take nondiscriminatory affirmative action measuresand andSection; 570.602 encourages them to do so.Section 570.904(b)(2) addresses <T3>equal opportunity in services, benefits and participation.</T3> Amongthe comments received in response to this proposed provision were suggestionsthat: (1) the standard should obligate local governments to affirmativelyuse Community Development Block Grant funds to overcome the effects ofpast discrimination; (2) the three-year time span leaves open the possibilityof poor performance during the most recent one or two-year period; (3)the ``percentage standard'' used overstates minority need; and (4) documentationof proportions of benefit to minority groups in each activity will ``createhorrendous paperwork requirements.''Where discrimination has occurred, the obligation of a recipient is describedin andSection; 570.602(b)(4)(i).Regarding the three-year time span and the ``percentage standard,'' bothof these concepts are absent from the final regulation. As in andSection;570.904(b)(1), the regulation has been substantially revised in light ofDOJ comments, and now embodies a ``totality of circumstances'' test asdoes the employment review criterion. Unless the totality of circumstanceindicates that persons protected by section 109 have been deprived of fullaccess to any CDBG funded program or activity because of their race, creed,or ethnicity, then the recipient will have met this review criterion.Concerning the paperwork burden, it should be noted that the Grantee PerformanceReports submitted by Entitlement CDBG recipients over the past 10 yearshave required data on benefits going to minorities from each direct benefitactivity. The review approach HUD will use will not require any significantchange with respect to the report of minority benefit. Moreover, it isalso noteworthy that section 562 of the 1987 Act requires HUD to collectdata on the racial and ethnic characteristics of persons eligible for,assisted, or otherwise benefiting under each community development andhousing assistance program administered by HUD. Nothing in this regulationrequires a recipient to attain or maintain any particular statistical levelof participation based on race, ethnicity, or gender.Section 570.904(c) addresses review criteria for the <T3>furtherance of fair housing </T3>by a grantee. Essentially, a granteewould be considered to be in compliance with its certification to furtherfair housing if it (1) conducted an analysis of fair housing impedimentsin accordance with andSection; 570.904(c) (1), and (2) took action designedto address the conditions identified as limiting fair housing choice, suchas those delineated in andSection; 570.904(c)(2).A commenter objected to requiring fair housing analysis as part of thereview standard, believing it would place an administrative, staff-intensive,and costly responsibility on local governments, thereby restricting administrativediscretion and reducing both total and administrative funds. Further, itis alleged that such an analysis cannot be easily or quickly done, norare data generally available. The Department disagrees. Only a reasonableamount of analysis should be necessary for this purpose, and administrativefunds should be adequate for this function. Affirmatively furthering fairhousing was a part of the regulations even before the 1983 Act amendedthe Act to specifically require grantees to certify that they will affirmativelyfurther fair housing. Therefore, grantees should already have a data base.It is important to note that the analysis should describe in broad termsactions already taken, as well as those planned, in order to be flexiblein addressing a variety of impediments to fair housing choice within arecipient's community. Another commenter stated that the Department should establish standardsfor ``testing'' for housing discrimination and for what constitutes a localfair housing center. However, the Department believes that the CDBG regulationis not an appropriate place to establish a definition for testing. Also,the Department believes that each locality should have its own definitionof a local fair housing center because the organization should serve theunique needs of the locality. Interested communities may contact theirlocal HUD office for information on such centers operating in nearby communities.One commenter stated that the Department should leave the selection offair housing centers and testing methods to the local jurisdiction. TheDepartment agrees, and would note only that the approaches used by localitiesmust conform to applicable laws. The Department also agrees with the comment that the conduct of a fairhousing analysis cannot be used as justification for delaying actions affirmativelyto further fair housing. Carrying out an analysis would not be consideredto constitute a fair housing action in and of itself; actions must be undertakento address the impediments to fair housing choice identified in the analysis.Several commenters stated that grantees that support fair housing initiativescarried out by recognized fair housing centers should be judged by HUDto be meeting their responsibilities to further fair housing under bothTitle VIII and the Act. The Department agrees that grantees may take actionsaffirmatively to further fair housing through contracting with such agencies,and has specifically included such contracting as a method of addressingconditions limiting fair housing choice under andSection; 570.904(c)(2)(iii).Grantees should note, however, that HUD's review of grantees' performancein fulfilling their fair housing certifications will focus on action undertaken_whethertaken by the grantee itself or by agencies with which the grantee contracts.Section 570.904(d) addresses a grantee's performance specifically relatedto <T3>actions to use minority and women's business enterprises (MBE/WBE)</T3>.The Department received a number of comments on this section: One commenter alleged that the rule fails to recognize State laws thatrequire competitive bidding on contracts involving amounts above a specified,threshold figure, and that it is wrong to assume that special treatment(such as set-asides) can be used to achieve a grantee's goal. A number of respondents recommended that the threshold level, at andSection;570.904(d)(1)(i), for considering funds awarded through individual contractsand subcontracts should be reduced from $10,000, if not eliminated.Two commenters asserted that the performance criterion at Section570.904(d)that contemplates a continuing rise in MBE/WBE participation is unrealistic.The logical extension, as one commenter stated, would be that 100 percentof all contracts are eventually expected to be awarded to MBE/WBEs. A frequently expressed concern of commenters related to the use of themetropolitan area as the basis for calculating the grantee performancestandards. Some were concerned about the availability of data at the metropolitanarea level. Others recommended that the review criteria be determined fromdata at the jurisdictional, or even the target area level, on the groundsthat use of metropolitan area data would dilute the need for performance,especially in entitlement cities. Several commenters object to the use of data that would derive a measurefrom all MBE/WBE's instead of just those engaged in businesses relatedto housing and community development. One commenter contended that a cutback in CDBG program funds would makean increase in MBE/WBE participation, under the proposed requirement, impossible.One commenter expressed concern about fluctuation in MBE/WBE data and questionedits reliability for purposes of this requirement. A commenter expressed hope that the Department would require that community-widegoals be set, not just for Federally-assisted community development programs,because many communities use a centralized procurement system over whichthe community development office has no direct control. A number of commenters recommended that a fixed percentage of MBE/WBE participationshould be employed in lieu of the proposed ratio. Finally, one commenter expressed concern that ``overachievers'' (granteeswhich, in one program year, achieve MBE/WBE results much higher than wouldbe required by the proposed review standard) would be penalized if theycould not do well in subsequent program years because of fluctuations inthe level of contracting activity from year to year. Based on these comments, and comments from DOJ, this section has been substantiallyrevised. Basically, the Department will determine whether the recipienthas taken actions required by 24 CFR 85.36(e), and the effectiveness ofthose actions in accomplishing the objectives of andSection; 85.35(e) andthe relevant Excutive Orders. Nothing in this regulation requires a recipientto attain or maintain any particular statistical level of participationor any particular proportionality in contract awards based on race, ethnicity,or gender of their contractors. <ITAG tagnum="84">IX. Findings </ITAG>A Finding of No Significant Impact with respect to the environment hasbeen made in accordance with HUD regulations at 24 CFR Part 50, which implementsection 102(2)(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969. TheFinding No Significant Impact is available for public inspection duringregular business hours in the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk at the aboveaddress. This rule does not constitute a ``major rule'' as that term is definedin section 1(b) of Executive Order 12291 on Federal Regulations. Analysisof the rule indicates that it does not: (1) Have an annual effect on theeconomy of $100 million or more; (2) cause a major increase in costs orprices for consumers, individual industries, Federal, State or local governmentagencies, or geographic regions; or (3) have a significant adverse effecton competition, employment, investment, productivity, innovation, or onthe ability of the United States-based enterprises to compete with foreign-basedenterprises in domestic or export markets. Under the provisions of 5 U.S.C. 605(b) (the Regulatory Flexibility Act),the undersigned has certified that this rule does not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities because it doesnot affect the amount of funds provided in the CDBG program, but rathermodifies and updates program administrative and procedural requirementsto comport with recently enacted legislation. This rule was listed as item number 996 in the Department's SemiannualAgenda of Regulations published on April 25, 1988 (53 FR 13854) at pages13884-85 under Executive Order 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act.The programs affected by this rule and their program numbers in the Catalogof Federal Domestic Assistance are as follows:<ITAG tagnum="15">14.218, Community Development Grant Block Entitlement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">14.219, Community Development Grant Block Small Cities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">14.221, Urban Development Action Grant </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">14.225, Secretary's Discretionary Fund/Territories Program</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">14.227, Secretary's Discretionary Fund/Community Development TechnicalAssistance Grants</ITAG>The collection of information requirements contained in this rule havebeen submitted to OMB for review under section 3504(h) of the PaperworkReduction Act of 1980. Sections 570.301, 570.302, 570.306, 570.506, and570.507 of this rule have been determined by the Department to containcollection of information requirements. Information on these requirementsis provided as follows: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C/><T4>Community Development Block Grant Program, OMB Approval Numbers</T4><H1>Description of information collection</H1><H1>Number of respondents</H1><H1>Number of responses per respondent</H1><H1>Total annual responses</H1><H1>Hours per response</H1><H1>Total hours </H1><H1>Regulatory reference (section)</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Final statement (2506-0077)<D>825</D><D>1</D><D>825</D><D>39</D><D>32,175</D><D>570.301-570.305</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Housing Assistance Plan, HUD-7091.1, HUD-7091.2 (2506-0077)<D>825</D><D>1</D><D>825</D><D>42</D><D>34,650</D><D>570.306</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Grantee Performance Report, HUD-4949.1, thru 4949.7 (2506-0077)<D>825</D><D>1</D><D>825</D><D>200</D><D>165,000</D><D>570.507</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Relocation, displacement acquisition<D>825</D><D>1</D><D>825</D><D>5</D><D>4,125</D><D>570.606</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Equal Employment Opportunity, HUD/EEO-4 (2529-0008)<D>825</D><D>1</D><D>825</D><D>1.25</D><D>1,031</D><D>570.507</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Minority business enterprise (2506-0066)<D>825</D><D>1</D><D>825</D><D>3.4</D><D>2,800</D><D>570.507</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">General record keeping<D>825</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>120</D><D>99,000</D><D>570.506</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total burden hours</ITAG><D/><D/><D/><D/><D>338,781</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 24 CFR Part 570</ITAG>Community development block grants, Grant programs: housing and communitydevelopment, Loan programs: housing and community development, Low- andmoderate-income housing, New communities, Pockets of poverty, Small cities.Accordingly, the Department amends 24 CFR Part 570 as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 570_COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT BLOCK GRANTS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 570 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Title I, Housing and Community Development Act of 1974(42 U.S.C. 5301-20); and Sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>2. Subpart A of Part 570 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General Provisions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.1 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.2 Primary objective.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.3 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.4 Allocation of funds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.5 Waivers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart A_General Provisions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.</ITAG>(a) This part describes policies and procedures applicable to the followingprograms authorized under Title I of the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1974, as amended:(1) Entitlement grants program (Subpart D);(2) Small Cities program: HUD administered CDBG nonentitlement funds (SubpartF);(3) State program: State-administered CDBG nonentitlement funds (SubpartI);(4) Secretary's Fund program (Subpart E);(5) Urban Development Action Grant program (Subpart G); and(6) Loan Guarantees (Subpart M).(b) Subparts A, C, J, K, and O apply to all programs in paragraph (a) exceptas modified or limited under the provisions of these subparts or the applicableprogram regulations. In the application of the subparts to the Secretary'sFund program or the Urban Development Action Grant program, the referenceto funds in the form of grants in the term ``CDBG funds,'' as defined inandSection;570.3(e), shall mean the grant funds under those programs. Thesubparts do not apply to the State program (Subpart I) except to the extentexpressly referred to.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary objective.</ITAG>The primary objective of Title I of the Housing and Community DevelopmentAct of 1974, as amended, and of the community development program of eachgrantee under the Title is the development of viable urban communities,by providing decent housing and a suitable living environment and expandingeconomic opportunities, principally for persons of low and moderate income.Consistent with this primary objective, not less than 60 percent of CDBGfunds received by the grantee under Subparts D, F, and M shall be usedin accordance with the applicable requirements of those subparts for activitiesthat benefit persons of low and moderate income.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>(a) ``Act'' means Title I of the Housing and Community Development Actof 1974 as amended (42 U.S.C. 5301 <T3>et seq.</T3>).(b) ``Age of housing'' means the number of existing year-round housingunits constructed in 1939 or earlier, based on data compiled by the UnitedStates Bureau of the Census referable to the same point or period of timeavailable from the latest decennial census.(c) ``Applicant'' means a State, unit of general local government, or anIndian tribe which makes application pursuant to the provisions of SubpartE, F, G or M.(d) ``Buildings for the general conduct of government'' means city halls,county administrative buildings, State capitol or office buildings or otherfacilities in which the legislative, judicial or general administrativeaffairs of the government are conducted. Such term does not include suchfacilities as neighborhood service centers or special purpose buildingslocated in low and moderate income areas that house various nonlegislativefunctions or services provided by government at decentralized locations.(e) ``CDBG funds'' means Community Development Block Grant funds, includingfunds received in the form of grants under Subpart D or F, loans guaranteedunder Subpart M, urban renewal surplus grant funds under Subpart N, andprogram income defined in andSection;570.500(a).(f) ``Chief Executive Officer'' of a State or unit of general local governmentmeans the elected official or the legally designated official, who hasthe primary responsibility for the conduct of that entity's governmentalaffairs. Examples of the ``chief executive officer'' of a unit of generallocal government are: the elected mayor of a municipality; the electedcounty executive of a county; the chairperson of a county commission orboard in a county that has no elected county executive; and the officialdesignated pursuant to law by the governing body of a unit of general localgovernment.(g)(1) ``City'' means, for purposes of Entitlement Community DevelopmentBlock Grant and Urban Development Action Grant eligibility:(i) Any unit of general local government which is classified as a municipalityby the United States Bureau of the Census or (ii) any other unit of general local government which is a town or townshipand which, in the determination of the Secretary: (A) Possesses powers and performs functions comparable to those associatedwith municipalities;(B) Is closely settled (except that the Secretary may reduce or waive thisrequirement on a case by case basis for the purposes of the Action Grantprogram); and (C) Contains within its boundaries no incorporated places as defined bythe United States Bureau of the Census which have not entered into cooperationagreements with such town or township for a period covering at least 3years to undertake or assist in the undertaking of essential communitydevelopment and housing assistance activities. The determination of eligibilityof a town or township to qualify as a city will be based on informationavailable from the United States Bureau of the Census and information providedby the town or township and its included units of general local government.(2) For purposes of Urban Development Action Grant eligibility only, ``city''means Guam, the Virgin Islands, American Samoa, the Commonwealth of theNorthern Mariana Islands, the counties of Kauai, Maui, and Hawaii in theState of Hawaii, and Indian tribes which are eligible recipients underthe State and Local Government Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972 and locatedon reservations or on former Indian reservations in Oklahoma as determinedby the Secretary of the Interior or in Alaskan Native Villages.(h) ``Discretionary grant'' means a grant made from the Secretary's Fundin accordance with Subpart E.(i) ``Entitlement amount'' means the amount of funds which a metropolitancity is entitled to receive under the Entitlement grant program, as determinedby formula set forth in section 106 of the Act.(j) ``Extent of growth lag'' means the number of persons who would havebeen residents in a metropolitan city or urban county, in excess of thecurrent population of such metropolitan city or urban county, if such metropolitancity or urban county had a population growth rate between 1970 and thedate of the most recent population count available from the United StatesBureau of the Census referable to the same point or period in time equalto the population growth rate for such period of all metropolitan cities.(k) ``Extent of housing overcrowding'' means the number of housing unitswith 1.01 or more persons per room based on data compiled and publishedby the United States Bureau of the Census available from the latest censusreferable to the same point or period in time.(1) ``Extent of poverty'' means the number of persons whose incomes arebelow the poverty level based on data compiled and published by the UnitedStates Bureau of the Census available from the latest census referableto the same point or period in time and the latest reports from the Officeof Management and Budget. For purposes of this part, the Secretary hasdetermined that it is neither feasible nor appropriate to make adjustmentsat this time in the computations of ``extent of poverty'' for regionalor area variations in income and cost of living.(m) ``Family'' means all persons living in the same household who are relatedby birth, marriage or adoption.(n) ``Household'' means all the persons who occupy a housing unit. Theoccupants may be a single family, one person living alone, two or morefamilies living together, or any other group of related or unrelated personswho share living arrangements.(o) ``HUD'' means the Department of Housing and Urban Development.(p) ``Indian tribe'' means any Indian tribe, band, group, and nation, includingAlaska Indians, Aleuts, and Eskimos and any Alaska Native Village, of theUnited States which is considered an eligible recipient under the IndianSelf-Determination and Education Assistance Act (Pub. L. 93-638) or underthe State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972 (Pub. L. 92-512).(q) ``Low and moderate income household'' or ``lower income household''means a household having an income equal to or less than the Section 8lower income limits established by HUD. The method for determining incomeunder the Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments program need not be usedfor this purpose.(r) ``Low and moderate income person'' or ``lower income person'' meansa member of a family having an income equal to or less than the Section8 lower income limit established by HUD. Unrelated individuals shall beconsidered as one person families for this purpose. The method for determiningincome under the Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments program need notbe used for this purpose.(s) ``Low income household'' means a household having an income equal toor less than the Section 8 very low income limit established by HUD. Themethod for determining income under the Section 8 Housing Assistance Paymentsprogram need not be used for this purpose. (t) ``Low income person'' means a member of a family having an income equalto or less than the Section 8 very low income limit established by HUD.Unrelated individuals shall be considered as one person families for thispurpose. The method for determining income under the section 8 HousingAssistance Payments program need not be used for this purpose.(u) ``Metropolitan area'' means a metropolitan statistical area, as establishedby the Office of Management and Budget.(v) ``Metropolitan city'' means:(1) A city within a metropolitan area which is the central city of sucharea, as defined and used by the Office of Management and Budget, or(2) Any other city, within a metropolitan area, which has a populationof fifty thousand or more.(3)(i) Each city losing its classification as a metropolitan city by reasonof a decrease in population or revisions in the designation of metropolitanareas or central cities, or any city classified as or deemed by law tobe a metropolitan city for purposes of assistance under any section ofthe act for fiscal year 1983 or any subsequent fiscal year shall retainsuch qualification for purposes of receiving such assistance through September30, 1989.(ii) Any unit of general local government that becomes eligible to be classifiedas a metropolitan city, and was not classified as a metropolitan city inthe immediately preceding fiscal year, may, upon submission of writtennotification to the Secretary, defer its classification as a metropolitancity for all purposes under the Act, if it elects to have its populationincluded in an urban county.(iii) Notwithstanding paragraph (v)(3)(i) of this definition, a city mayelect not to retain its classification as a metropolitan city for fiscalyear 1988 or 1989.(iv) Any city classified as a metropolitan city pursuant to paragraph (v)(1), (2) or (3)(i) of this definition, and that no longer qualifies asa metropolitan city under paragraph (v) (1), (2) or (3)(i) of this definitionin a fiscal year beginning after fiscal year 1989, shall retain its classificationas a metropolitan city for such fiscal year and the succeeding fiscal year,except that in such succeeding fiscal year the amount of the grant to suchcity shall be 50 percent of the amount calculated under section 106(b)of the Act; and the remaining 50 percent shall be added to the amount allocatedunder section 106(d) of the Act to the State in which the city is locatedand the city shall be eligible in such succeeding fiscal year to receivea distribution from the State allocation under section 106(d) of the Act.(w) ``Moderate income household'' means a household having an income equalto or less than the Section 8 lower income limit and greater than the section8 very low income limit, established by HUD. The method for determiningincome under the section 8 Housing Assistance Payments program need notbe used for this purpose.(x) ``Moderate income person'' means a member of a family having an incomeequal to or less than the Section 8 lower income limit and greater thanthe section 8 very low income limit, established by HUD. Unrelated individualsshall be considered as one person families for this purpose. The methodfor determining income under the section 8 Housing Assistance Paymentsprogram need not be used for this purpose.(y) ``Nonentitlement amount'' means the amount of funds which is allocatedfor use in a State's nonentitlement areas as determined by formula setforth in section 106 of the Act.(z) ``Nonentitlement area'' means an area which is not a metropolitan cityand not included as part of an urban county.(aa) ``Population'' means the total resident population based on data compiledand published by the United States Bureau of the Census available fromthe latest census or which has been upgraded by the Bureau to reflect thechanges resulting from the Boundary and Annexation Survey, new incorporationsand consolidations of governments pursuant to andSection; 570.4, and whichreflects, where applicable, changes resulting from the Bureau's latestpopulation determination through its estimating technique using naturalchanges (birth and death) and net migration, and is referable to the samepoint or period in time.(bb) ``Secretary'' means the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development.(cc) ``State'' means any State of the United States, or an instrumentalitythereof approved by the Governor; and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.(dd) ``Unit of general local government'' means any city, county, town,township, parish, village or other general purpose political subdivisionof a State; Guam, the Northern Mariana Islands, the Virgin Islands, andAmerican Samoa or a general purpose political subdivision thereof; a combinationof such political subdivisions recognized by the Secretary; the Districtof Columbia; and the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands. Such termalso includes a State or a local public body or agency (as defined in section711 of the Housing and Urban Development Act of 1970), a community association,or other entity, which is approved by the Secretary for the purpose ofproviding public facilities or services to a new community as part of aprogram meeting the eligibility standards of section 712 of the Housingand Urban Development Act of 1970 or title IV of the Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act of 1968.(ee)(1)The term ``urban county'' means any county within a metropolitanarea which_(i) Is authorized under State law to undertake essential community developmentand housing assistance activities in its unincorporated areas, if any,which are not units of general local government; and (ii) Has a population of 200,000 or more (excluding the population of metropolitancities therein) and has a combined population of 100,000 or more (excludingthe population of metropolitan cities therein) in such unincorporated areasand in its included units of general local government (and in the caseof counties having a combined population of less than 200,000, the areasand units of general local government must include the areas and unitsof general local government which in the aggregate have the preponderanceof the persons of low and moderate income who reside in the county excludingmetropolitan cities therein) in which it has authority to undertake essentialcommunity development and housing assistance activities and which do notelect to have their population excluded, or with which it has entered intocooperation agreements to undertake or to assist in the undertaking ofessential community development and housing assistance activities. (2) The term ``urban county'' also includes any other county eligible undersection 102(a)(6) of the Act. (3) Any county classified as an urban county pursuant to paragraph (ee)(1) or (2) of this definition, and that no longer qualifies as an urbancounty under paragraph (ee) (1) or (2) of this definition in a fiscal yearbeginning after fiscal year 1989, shall retain its classification as anurban county for such fiscal year and the succeeding fiscal year, exceptthat in such succeeding fiscal year the amount of the grant to such anurban county shall be 50 percent of the amount calculated under section106(b) of the Act; and the remaining 50 percent shall be added to the amountallocated under section 106(d) of the Act to the State in which the urbancounty is located and the urban county shall be eligible in such succeedingfiscal year to receive a distribution from the State allocation under section106(d) of the Act. (4) In determining whether a county's combined population contains therequired percentage of low and moderate income persons, the Departmentwill identify the number of persons that resided in applicable areas andunits of general local government based on data from the most recent decennialcensus, and using income limits that would have applied for the year inwhich that census was taken. (ff) ``Urban Development Action Grant'' (UDAG) means a grant made by theSecretary pursuant to section 119 of the Act and Subpart G of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allocation of funds. </ITAG>(a) The determination of eligibility of units of general local governmentto receive entitlement grants, the entitlement amounts, the allocationof appropriated funds to States for use in nonentitlement areas, the reallocationof funds, and the allocation of appropriated funds for discretionary grantsunder the Secretary's Fund shall be governed by the policies and proceduresdescribed in section 106 and 107 of the Act. (b) The definitions in andSection; 570.3 shall govern in applying the policiesand procedures described in sections 106 and 107 of the Act. (c) In determining eligibility for entitlement and in allocating fundsunder section 106 of the Act for any Federal fiscal year, HUD will recognizecorporate status and geographical boundaries and the status of metropolitanareas and central cities effective as of July 1 preceding such FederalFiscal Year, subject to the following limitations: (1) With respect to corporate status as certified by the applicable Stateand available for processing by the Census Bureau as of such date; (2) With respect to boundary changes or annexations, as are used by theCensus Bureau in preparing population estimates for all general purposegovernmental units and are available for processing by the Census Bureauas of such date, except that any such boundary changes or annexations whichresult in the population of a unit of general local government reachingor exceeding 50,000 shall be recognized for this purpose whether or notsuch changes are used by the Census Bureau in preparing such populationestimates; and (3) With respect to the status of Metropolitan Statistical Areas and centralcities, as officially designated by the Office of Management and Budgetas of such date. (d) In determining whether a county qualifies as an urban county, and incomputing entitlement amounts for urban counties, the demographic valuesof population, poverty, housing overcrowding, and age of housing of anyIndian tribes located within the county shall be excluded. In allocatingamounts to States for use in nonentitlement areas, the demographic valuesof population, poverty, housing overcrowding and age of housing of allIndian tribes located in all nonentitled areas shall be excluded. It isrecognized that all such data on Indian tribes are not generally availablefrom the United States Bureau of the Census and that missing portions ofdata will have to be estimated. In accomplishing any such estimates theSecretary may use such other related information available from reputablesources as may seem appropriate, regardless of the data's point or periodof time and shall use the best judgement possible in adjusting such datato reflect the same point or period of time as the overall data from whichthe Indian tribes are being deducted, so that such deduction shall notcreate an imbalance with those overall data. (e) Amounts remaining after closeout of a grant which are required to bereturned to HUD under the provisions of andSection; 570.509, Grant closeoutprocedures, shall be considered as funds available for reallocation unlessthe appropriation under which the funds were provided to the Departmenthas lapsed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Waivers.  </ITAG>The Secretary may waive any requirement of this part not required by lawwhenever it is determined that undue hardship will result from applyingthe requirement and where application of the requirement would adverselyaffect the purposes of the Act.a. Subpart C of Part 570 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Eligible Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.200 General policies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.201 Basic eligible activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.202 Eligible rehabilitation and preservation activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.203 Special economic development activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.204 Special activities by subrecipients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.205 Eligible planning, urban environmental design and policy-planning-management-capacitybuilding activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.206 Program administrative costs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.207 Ineligible activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.208 Criteria for national objectives.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Eligible Activities</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General policies.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Determination of eligibility.</T3> An activity may be assisted in wholeor in part with CDBG funds only if all of the following requirements aremet:(1) <T3>Compliance with section 105 of the Act.</T3> Each activity must meetthe eligibility requirements of section 105 of the Act as further definedin this subpart.(2) <T3>Compliance with national objectives.</T3> Grant recipients under theEntitlement and HUD-administered Small Cities programs must certify thattheir projected use of funds has been developed so as to give maximum feasiblepriority to activities which will carry out one of the national objectivesof benefit to low and moderate income families or aid in the preventionor elimination of slums or blight; the projected use of funds may alsoinclude activities which the recipient certifies are designed to meet othercommunity development needs having a particular urgency because existingconditions pose a serious and immediate threat to the health or welfareof the community where other financial resources are not available to meetsuch needs. Consistent with the foregoing, each recipient under the Entitlementand HUD-administered Small Cities programs must ensure, and maintain evidence,that each of its activities assisted with CDBG funds meets one of the threenational objectives as contained in its certification. Criteria for determiningwhether an activity addresses one or more of these objectives are containedat andSection; 570.208.(3) <T3>Compliance with the primary objective.</T3> The Act establishes asits primary objective the development of viable urban communities, by providingdecent housing and a suitable living environment and expanding economicopportunities, principally for persons of low and moderate income. Consistentwith this objective, Entitlement and HUD-administered Small Cities recipientsmust ensure that, over a period of time specified in their certificationnot to exceed three years, not less than 60 percent of the aggregate ofCDBG fund expenditures shall be for activities meeting the criteria underandSection; 570.208(a) for benefiting low and moderate income persons. Indetermining the percentage of funds expended for such activities:(i) Cost of administration and planning eligible under andSection; 570.205and andSection; 570.206 will be assumed to benefit low and moderate incomepersons in the same proportion as the remainder of the CDBG funds and,accordingly shall be excluded from the calculation;(ii) Funds deducted by HUD for repayment of urban renewal temporary loanspursuant to andSection; 570.802(b) shall be excluded;(iii) Funds expended for the repayment of loans guaranteed under the provisionsof Subpart M shall also be excluded;(iv) Funds expended for the acquisition, new construction or rehabilitationof property for housing that qualifies under andSection; 570.208(a)(3) shallbe counted for this purpose but shall be limited to an amount determinedby multiplying the total cost (including CDBG and non-CDBG costs) of theacquisition, construction or rehabilitation by the percent of units insuch housing to be occupied by low and moderate income persons.(v) Funds expended for any other activities qualifying under andSection;570.208(a) shall be counted for this purpose in their entirety.(4) <T3>Compliance with environmental review procedures.</T3> The environmentalreview procedures set forth at 24 CFR Part 58 must be completed for eachactivity (or project as defined in 24 CFR Part 58), as applicable.(5) <T3>Cost principles.</T3> Costs incurred, whether charged on a direct oran indirect basis, must be in conformance with OMB Circulars A-87, ``CostPrinciples Applicable to Grants and Contracts with State and Local Governments,''A-122, ``Cost Principles for Non-profit Organizations,'' or A-21, ``CostPrinciples for Educational Institutions,''\1\<NOTE/> as applicable. All items of cost listed in Attachment B ofthese Circulars which require prior Federal agency approval are allowablewithout prior approval of HUD to the extent they comply with the generalpolicies and principles stated in Attachment A of such circulars and areotherwise eligible under this subpart. However, pre-agreement costs arelimited to those costs described in andSection; 570.200(h).<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\These circulars are available from the Entitlement CitiesDivision of HUD, 451 Seventh Street, Washington, DC. 20410.(b) <T3>Special policies governing facilities.</T3> The following special policiesapply to:(1) <T3>Facilities containing both eligible and ineligible uses.</T3> A publicfacility otherwise eligible for assistance under the CDBG program may beprovided with CDBG funds even if it is part of a multiple use buildingcontaining ineligible uses, if:(i) The facility which is otherwise eligible and proposed for assistancewill occupy a designated and discrete area within the larger facility;and(ii) The recipient can determine the costs attributable to the facilityproposed for assistance as separate and distinct from the overall costsof the multiple-use building and/or facility.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Allowable costs are limited to those attributable to the eligibleportion of the building or facility.(2) <T3>Fees for use of facilities. </T3>Reasonable fees may be charged forthe use of the facilities assisted with CDBG funds, but charges such asexcessive membership fees, which will have the effect of precluding lowand moderate income persons from using the facilities, are not permitted.(c) <T3>Special assessments under the CDBG program. </T3>The following policiesrelate to special assessments under the CDBG program:(1) <T3>Definition of special assessment. </T3>The term ``special assessment''means the recovery of the capital costs of a public improvement, such asstreets, water or sewer lines, curbs, and gutters, through a fee or chargelevied or filed as a lien against a parcel of real estate as a direct resultof benefit derived from the installation of a public improvement, or aone-time charge made as a condition of access to a public improvement.This term does not relate to taxes, or the establishment of the value ofreal estate for the purpose of levying real estate, property, or ad valoremtaxes, and does not include periodic charges based on the use of a publicimprovement, such as water or sewer user charges, even if such chargesinclude the recovery of all or some portion of the capital costs of thepublic improvement.(2) <T3>Special assessments to recover capital costs. </T3>Where CDBG fundsare used to pay all or part of the cost of a public improvement, specialassessments may be imposed as follows:(i) Special assessments to recover the CDBG funds may be made only againstproperties owned and occupied by persons not of low and moderate income.Such assessments constitute program income.(ii) Special assessments to recover the non-CDBG portion may be made providedthat CDBG funds are used to pay the special assessment in behalf of allproperties owned and occupied by low and moderate income persons; exceptthat CDBG funds need not be used to pay the special assessments in behalfof properties owned and occupied by moderate income persons if the grantrecipient certifies that it does not have sufficient CDBG funds to paythe assessments in behalf of all of the low and moderate income owner-occupantpersons. Funds collected through such special assessments are not programincome.(3) <T3>Public improvements not initially assisted with CDBG funds. </T3>Thepayment of special assessments with CDBG funds constitutes CDBG assistanceto the public improvement. Therefore, CDBG funds may be used to pay specialassessments provided:(i) The installation of the public improvements was carried out in compliancewith requirements applicable to activities assisted under this part includingenvironmental, citizen participation and Davis-Bacon requirements;(ii) The installation of the public improvement meets a criterion for nationalobjectives in andSection; 570.208(a)(1), (b), or (c); and(iii) The requirements of andSection; 570.200(c)(2)(ii) are met.(d) <T3>Consultant activities. </T3>Consulting services are eligible for assistanceunder this part for professional assistance in program planning, developmentof community development objectives, and other general professional guidancerelating to program execution. The use of consultants is governed by thefollowing:(1) <T3>Employer-employee type of relationship. </T3>No person providing consultantservices in an employer-employee type of relationship shall receive morethan a reasonable rate of compensation for personal services paid withCDBG funds. In no event, however, shall such compensation exceed the maximumdaily rate of compensation for a GS-18 as established by Federal law. Suchservices shall be evidenced by written agreements between the parties whichdetail the responsibilities, standards, and compensation.(2) <T3>Independent contractor relationship. </T3>Consultant services providedunder an independent contractor relationship are governed by the procurementrequirements in 24 CFR 85.36 and are not subject to the GS-18 limitation.(e) <T3>Recipient determinations required as a condition of eligibility. </T3>Inseveral instances under this subpart, the eligibility of an activity dependson a special local determination. Recipients shall maintain documentationof all such determinations. A written determination is required for anyactivity carried out under the authority of andSection;andSection; 570.201(f),570.202(b)(3), 570.203(b), 570.204, and 570.206(f). A written determinationis also required for certain relocation costs under andSection; 570.201(i).(f) <T3>Means of carrying out eligible activities</T3>.(1) Activities eligible under this subpart, other than those authorizedunder andSection; 570.204(a), may be undertaken, subject to local law:(i) By the recipient through:(A) Its employees, or(B) Procurement contracts governed by the requirements of 24 CFR 85.36;or(ii) Through agreements with subrecipients, as defined at andSection; 570.500(c);or(iii) By one or more public agencies, including existing local public agencies,that are designated by the chief executive officer of the recipient.(2) Activities made eligible under andSection; 570.204(a) may only be undertakenby subrecipients specified in that section.(g) <T3>Limitation on planning and administrative costs. </T3>No more than20 percent of the sum of any grant plus program income received duringthe program year (or the grant period for grants under Subpart F) shallbe expended for planning and program administrative costs, as defined inandSection;andSection; 570.205 and 570.206 respectively. Recipients of entitlementgrants under Subpart D will be considered to be in conformance with thislimitation if expenditures for planning and administration during the mostrecently completed program year did not exceed 20 percent of the sum ofthe entitlement grant made for that program year and the program incomereceived during that program year.(h) <T3>Reimbursement for pre-agreement costs. </T3>Prior to the effectivedate of the grant agreement, a recipient may obligate and spend local fundsfor the purpose of environmental assessments required by 24 CFR Part 58,for the planning and capacity building purposes authorized by andSection;570.205(b), for engineering and design costs associated with an activityeligible under andSection; 570.201 through andSection; 570.204, for the provisionof information and other resources to residents pursuant to andSection; 570.206(b),for relocation activities carried out pursuant to andSection; 570.606, andfor costs of complying with procedural requirements for acquisition underandSection; 570.606 but not for the cost of the real property itself. Afterthe effective date of the grant agreement, the recipient may be reimbursedwith funds from its grant to cover those costs, provided such locally fundedactivities were undertaken in compliance with the requirements of thispart and 24 CFR Part 58.(i) <T3>Urban Development Action Grant. </T3>Grant assistance may be providedwith Urban Development Action Grant funds, subject to the provisions ofSubpart G, for:(1) Activities eligible for assistance under this subpart; and(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of andSection; 570.207, such other activitiesas the Secretary may determine to be consistent with the purposes of theUrban Development Action Grant program.(j) <T3>Constitutional prohibition. </T3>In accordance with First AmendmentChurch/State Principles, as a general rule, CDBG assistance may not beused for religious activities or provided to primarily religious entitiesfor any activities, including secular activities. The following restrictionsand limitations therefore apply to the use of CDBG funds.(1) CDBG funds may not be used for the acquisition of property or the constructionor rehabilitation (including historic preservation and removal of architecturalbarriers) of structures to be used for religious purposes or which willotherwise promote religious interests. This limitation includes the acquisitionof property for ownership by primarily religious entities and the constructionor rehabilitation (including historic preservation and removal of architecturalbarriers) of structures owned by such entities (except as permitted underparagraph (j)(2) of this section with respect to rehabilitation and underparagraph (j)(4) of this section with respect to repairs undertaken inconnection with public services) regardless of the use to be made of theproperty or structure. Property owned by primarily religious entities maybe acquired with CDBG funds at no more than fair market value for a non-religioususe.(2) CDBG funds may be used to rehabilitate buildings owned by primarilyreligious entities to be used for a wholly secular purpose under the followingconditions:(i) The building (or portion thereof) that is to be improved with the CDBGassistance has been leased to an existing or newly established wholly secularentity (which may be an entity established by the religious entity);(ii) The CDBG assistance is provided to the lessee (and not the lessor)to make the improvements;(iii) The leased premises will be used exclusively for secular purposesavailable to persons regardless of religion;(iv) The lease payments do not exceed the fair market rent of the premisesas they were before the improvements are made;(v) The portion of the cost of any improvements that also serve a non-leasedpart of the building will be allocated to and paid for by the lessor;(vi) The lessor enters into a binding agreement that unless the lessee,or a qualified successor lessee, retains the use of the leased premisesfor a wholly secular purpose for at least the useful life of the improvements,the lessor will pay to the lessee an amount equal to the residual valueof the improvements;(vii) The lessee must remit the amount received from the lessor under paragraph(2)(vi) of this section to the recipient or subrecipient from which theCDBG funds were derived.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The lessee can also enter into a management contract authorizing thelessor religious entity to use the building for its intended secular purpose,e.g., homeless shelter, provision of public services. In such case, thereligious entity must agree in the management contract to carry out thesecular purpose in a manner free from religious influences in accordancewith the principles set forth in paragraph (j)(3)x of this section.(3) As a general rule, CDBG funds may be used for eligible public servicesto be provided through a primarily religious entity, where the religiousentity enters into an agreement with the recipient or subrecipient fromwhich the CDBG funds are derived that, in connection with the provisionof such services: (i) It will not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employmenton the basis of religion and will not limit employment or give preferencein employment to persons on the basis of religion; (ii) It will not discriminate against any person applying for such publicservices on the basis of religion and will not limit such services or givepreference to persons on the basis of religion; (iii) It will provide no religious instruction or counseling, conduct noreligious worship or services, engage in no religious proselytizing, andexert no other religious influence in the provision of such public services;(iv) The portion of a facility used to provide the public services shallcontain no religious symbols or decorations, other than those permanentlyaffixed to or part of the structure. (4) Where the public services provided under paragraph (j)(3) of this sectionare carried out on property owned by the primarily religious entity, CDBGfunds may also be used for minor repairs to such property which are directlyrelated to carrying out the public services where the cost constitutesin dollar terms only an incidental portion of the CDBG expenditure forthe public services. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.201 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Basic eligible activities. </ITAG>CDBG funds may be used for the following activities: (a) <T3>Acquisition. </T3>Acquisition in whole or in part by the recipient,or other public or private nonprofit entity, by purchase, long-term lease,donation, or otherwise, of real property (including air rights, water rights,rights-of-way, easements, and other interests therein) for any public purpose,subject to the limitations of andSection;570.207. (b) <T3>Disposition. </T3>Disposition, through sale, lease, donation, or otherwise,of any real property acquired with CDBG funds or its retention for publicpurposes, including reasonable costs of temporarily managing such propertyor property acquired under urban renewal, provided that the proceeds fromany such disposition shall be program income subject to the requirementsset forth in andSection;570.504. (c) <T3>Public facilities and improvements. </T3>Acquisition, construction,reconstruction, rehabilitation or installation of public facilities andimprovements, except as provided in andSection;570.207(a), carried out bythe recipient or other public or private nonprofit entities. In undertakingsuch activities, design features and improvements which promote energyefficiency may be included. Such activities may also include the executionof architectural design features, and similar treatments intended to enhancethe aesthetic quality of facilities and improvements receiving CDBG assistance,such as decorative pavements, railings, sculptures, pools of water andfountains, and other works of art. Facilities designed for use in providingshelter for persons having special needs are considered public facilitiesand not subject to the prohibition of new housing construction describedin andSection;570.207(b)(3). Such facilities include shelters for the homeless;convalescent homes; hospitals, nursing homes; battered spouse shelters;halfway houses for run-away children, drug offenders or parolees; grouphomes for mentally retarded persons and temporary housing for disastervictims. In certain cases, nonprofit entities and subrecipients includingthose specified in andSection;570.204 may acquire title to public facilities.When such facilities are owned by nonprofit entities or subrecipients,they shall be operated so as to be open for use by the general public duringall normal hours of operation. Public facilities and improvements eligiblefor assistance under this paragraph are subject to the policies in andSection;570.200(b).(d) <T3>Clearance activities. </T3>Clearance, demolition, and removal of buildingsand improvements, including movement of structures to other sites. Demolitionof HUD-assisted housing units may be undertaken only with the prior approvalof HUD. (e) <T3>Public services. </T3>Provision of public services (including labor,supplies, and materials) which are directed toward improving the community'spublic services and facilities, including but not limited to those concernedwith employment, crime prevention, child care, health, drug abuse, education,fair housing counseling, energy conservation, welfare, or recreationalneeds. In order to be eligible for CDBG assistance, public services mustmeet each of the following criteria:   (1) A public service must be either a new service, or a quantifiable increasein the level of a service above that which has been provided by or in behalfof the unit of general local government (through funds raised by such unit,or received by such unit from the State in which it is located) in thetwelve calendar months prior to the submission of the statement. (An exceptionto this requirement may be made if HUD determines that the decrease inthe level of a service was the result of events not within the controlof the unit of general local government.)(2) The amount of CDBG funds used for public services shall not exceed15 percent of each grant except as provided in paragraph (e)(3) of thissection. For entitlement grants under Subpart D, compliance is based onthe amount of CDBG funds obligated for public service activities in eachprogram year compared to 15 percent of the entitlement grant made for thatprogram year.(3) A recipient which obligated more CDBG funds for public services than15 percent of its grant funded from Federal fiscal year 1982 or 1983 appropriations(excluding any assistance received pursuant to Pub. L. 98-8), may obligatemore CDBG funds than 15 percent of its grant for public services so longas the amount obligated in any program year does not exceed the percentageor amount obligated in Federal fiscal year 1982 or 1983, whichever methodof calculation yields the higher amount.(f) <T3>Interim assistance.</T3>(1) The following activities may be undertaken on an interim basis in areasexhibiting objectively determinable signs of physical deterioration wherethe recipient has determined that immediate action is necessary to arrestthe deterioration and that permanent improvements will be carried out assoon as practicable:(i) The repairing of streets, sidewalks, parks, playgrounds, publicly ownedutilities, and public buildings; and(ii) The execution of special garbage, trash, and debris removal, includingneighborhood cleanup campaigns, but not the regular curbside collectionof garbage or trash in an area.(2) In order to alleviate emergency conditions threatening the public healthand safety in areas where the chief executive officer of the recipientdetermines that such an emergency condition exists and requires immediateresolution, CDBG funds may be used for:(i) The activities specified in paragraph (f)(1) of this section, exceptfor the repair of parks and playgrounds;(ii) The clearance of streets, including snow removal and similar activities,and(iii) The improvement of private properties.(3) All activities authorized under paragraph (f)(2) of this section arelimited to the extent necessary to alleviate emergency conditions.(g) <T3>Payment of non-Federal share.</T3> Payment of the non-Federal sharerequired in connection with a Federal grant-in-aid program undertaken aspart of CDBG activities, provided, that such payment shall be limited toactivities otherwise eligible and in compliance with applicable requirementsunder this subpart.(h) <T3>Urban renewal completion.</T3> Payment of the cost of completing anurban renewal project funded under Title I of the Housing Act of 1949 asamended. Further information regarding the eligibility of such costs isset forth in andSection; 570.801.(i) <T3>Relocation.</T3> Relocation payments and other assistance for permanentlyand temporarily relocated individuals, families, businesses, nonprofitorganizations, and farm operations where assistance is:(1) Required under the provisions of andSection; 570.606 (a), (b) or (c);or(2) Determined by the recipient to be appropriate under the provisionsof andSection; 570.606(d).(j) <T3>Loss of rental income.</T3> Payments to housing owners for losses ofrental income incurred in holding, for temporary periods, housing unitsto be used for the relocation of individuals and families displaced byprogram activities assisted under this part.(k) <T3>Removal of architectural barriers.</T3> Special projects directed tothe removal of material and architectural barriers which restrict the mobilityand accessibility of elderly or handicapped persons to publicly owned andprivately owned buildings, facilities, and improvements.(l) <T3>Privately owned utilities.</T3> CDBG funds may be used to acquire,construct, reconstruct, rehabilitate, or install the distribution linesand facilities of privately owned utilities, including the placing undergroundof new or existing distribution facilities and lines.(m) <T3>Construction of housing.</T3> CDBG funds may be used for the constructionof housing assisted under section 17 of the United States Housing Act of1937.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible rehabilitation and preservation activities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Types of buildings and improvements eligible for rehabilitation assistance.</T3>CDBG funds may be used to finance the rehabilitation of:(1) Privately owned buildings and improvements for residential purposes;(2) Low-income public housing and other publicly owned residential buildingsand improvements;(3) Publicly or privately owned commercial or industrial buildings, exceptthat the rehabilitation of such buildings owned by a private for-profitbusiness is limited to improvements to the exterior of the building andthe correction of code violations (further improvements to such buildingsmay be undertaken pursuant to andSection;570.203(b)); and(4) Manufactured housing when such housing constitutes part of the community'spermanent housing stock.(b) <T3>Types of assistance.</T3> CDBG funds may be used to finance the followingtypes of rehabilitation activities, and related costs, either singly, orin combination, through the use of grants, loans, loan guarantees, interestsupplements, or other means for buildings and improvements described inparagraph (a) of this section, except that rehabilitation of commercialor industrial buildings is limited as described in paragraph (a)(3) ofthis section.(1) Assistance to private individuals and entities, including profit makingand nonprofit organizations, to acquire for the purpose of rehabilitation,and to rehabilitate properties, for use or resale for residential purposes;(2) Labor, materials, and other costs of rehabilitation of properties,including repair directed toward an accumulation of deferred maintenance,replacement of principal fixtures and components of existing structures,installation of security devices, including smoke detectors and dead boltlocks, and renovation through alterations, additions to, or enhancementof existing structures, which may be undertaken singly, or in combination;(3) Loans for refinancing existing indebtedness secured by a property beingrehabilitated with CDBG funds if such financing is determined by the recipientto be necessary or appropriate to achieve the locality's community developmentobjectives;(4) Improvements to increase the efficient use of energy in structuresthrough such means as installation of storm windows and doors, siding,wall and attic insulation, and conversion, modification, or replacementof heating and cooling equipment, including the use of solar energy equipment;(5) Improvements to increase the efficient use of water through such meansas water savings faucets and shower heads and repair of water leaks;(6) Connection of residential structures to water distribution lines oflocal sewer collection lines;(7) For rehabilitation carried out with CDBG funds, costs of:(i) Initial homeowner warranty premiums;(ii) Hazard insurance premiums, except where assistance is provided inthe form of a grant; and(iii) Flood insurance premiums for properties covered by the Flood DisasterProtection Act of 1973, pursuant to andSection;570.605.(iv) Procedures concerning inspection and testing for and abatement oflead-based paint, pursuant to andSection;570.608.(8) Costs of acquiring tools to be lent to owners, tenants, and otherswho will use such tools to carry out rehabilitation;(9) Rehabilitation services, such as rehabilitation counseling, energyauditing, preparation of work specifications, loan processing, inspections,and other services related to assisting owners, tenants, contractors, andother entities, participating or seeking to participate in rehabilitationactivities authorized under this section, under section 312 of the HousingAct of 1964, as amended, under section 810 of the Act, or under section17 of the United States Housing Act of 1937; and(10) Assistance for the rehabilitation of housing under section 17 of theUnited States Housing Act of 1937.(c) <T3>Code enforcement.</T3> Code enforcement in deteriorating or deterioratedareas where such enforcement together with public improvements, rehabilitation,and services to be provided, may be expected to arrest the decline of thearea.(d) <T3>Historic preservation.</T3> CDBG funds may be used for the rehabilitation,preservation or restoration of historic properties, whether publicly orprivately owned. Historic properties are those sites or structures thatare either listed in or eligible to be listed in the National Registerof Historic Places, listed in a State of local inventory of historic places,or designated as a State or local landmark or historic district by appropriatelaw or ordinance. Historic preservation, however, is not authorized forbuildings for the general conduct of government.(e) <T3>Renovation of closed buildings.</T3> CDBG funds may be used to renovateclosed buildings, such as closed school buildings, for use as an eligiblepublic facility or to rehabilitate such buildings for housing.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special economic development activities.</ITAG>A recipient may use CDBG funds for special economic development activitiesin addition to other activities authorized in this subpart which may becarried out as part of an economic development project. Special activitiesauthorized under this section do not include assistance for the constructionof new housing. Special economic development activities include:(a) The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation or installationof commercial or industrial buildings, structures, and other real propertyequipment and improvements, including railroad spurs or similar extensions.Such activities may be carried out by the recipient or public or privatenonprofit subrecipients.(b) The provision of assistance to a private for-profit business, including,but not limited to, grants, loans, loan guarantees, interest supplements,technical assistance, and other forms of support, for any activity wherethe assistance is necessary or appropriate to carry out an economic developmentproject, excluding those described as ineligible in andSection; 570.207(a).In order to ensure that any such assistance does not unduly enrich thefor-profit business, the recipient shall conduct an analysis to determinethat the amount of any financial assistance to be provided is not excessive,taking into account the actual needs of the business in making the projectfinancially feasible and the extent of public benefit expected to be derivedfrom the economic development project. The recipient shall document theanalysis as well as any factors it considered in making its determinationthat the assistance is necessary or appropriate to carry out the project.The requirement for making such a determination applies whether the businessis to receive assistance from the recipient or through a subrecipient.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.204 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special activities by certain subrecipients.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Eligible activities.</T3> The recipient may provide CDBG funds (e.g.,grant or loan) to any of the three types of subrecipients specified inparagraph (c) of this section to carry out a neighborhood revitalization,community economic development, or energy conservation project. Such aproject may include activities listed as eligible under this subpart, andactivities not otherwise listed as eligible under this subpart, exceptthose described as ineligible in andSection; 570.207(a), when the recipientdetermines that such activities are necessary or appropriate to achieveits community development objectives. Notwithstanding that such recipientsmay carry out activities as part of such project that are not otherwiseeligible under this subpart, this provision does not authorize:(1) Provision of public services that do not meet the requirements of andSection;570.201(e) (1) and (2);(2) Provision of assistance to a for-profit business that does not complywith the requirements of andSection; 570.203(b); or(3) Carrying out activities that would otherwise be eligible under andSection;andSection;570.205 or 570.206 but that would result in the recipient exceeding thelimitation in andSection; 570.200(g).(b) <T3>Recipient responsibilities.</T3> Recipients are responsible for ensuringthat CDBG funds are used by the subrecipients in a manner consistent withthe requirements of this part and other applicable Federal, State, or locallaw. Recipients are also responsible for carrying out the environmentalreview and clearance responsibilities.(c) <T3>Eligible subrecipients. </T3>The following are subrecipients authorizedto receive assistance under this section.(1) <T3>Neighborhood-based nonprofit organizations.</T3> A neighborhood-basednonprofit organization is an association or corporation, duly organizedto promote and undertake community development activities on a not-for-profitbasis within a neighborhood. An organization is considered to be neighborhood-basedif the majority of either its membership, clientele, or governing bodyare residents of the neighborhood where activities assisted with CDBG fundsare to be carried out. A neighborhood is defined as:(i) A geographic location within the jurisdiction of a unit of generallocal government (but not the entire jurisdiction) designated in comprehensiveplans, ordinances, or other local documents as a neighborhood, village,or similar geographical designation;(ii) The entire jurisdiction of a unit of general local government whichis under 25,000 population; or(iii) A neighborhood, village, or similar geographical designation in aNew Community as defined in andSection; 570.403(a)(1).(2) <T3>Section 301(d) Small Business Investment Companies.</T3> A Section301(d) Small Business Investment Company is an entity organized pursuantto section 301(d) of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 (15 U.S.C.681(d)), including those which are profit making.(3) <T3>Local development corporations.</T3> A local development corporationis:(i) An entity organized pursuant to Title VII of the Headstart, EconomicOpportunity, and Community Partnership Act of 1974 (42 U.S.C. 2981) orthe Community Economic Development Act of 1981 (42 U.S.C. 9801 <T3>et seq.</T3>);(ii) An entity eligible for assistance under section 502 or 503 of theSmall Business Investment Act of 1958 (15 U.S.C. 696);(iii) Other entities incorporated under State or local law whose membershipis representative of the area of operation of the entity (including nonresidentowners of businesses in the area) and which are similar in purpose, function,and scope to those specified in paragraph (c)(3) (i) or (ii) of this section; or(iv) A State development entity eligible for assistance under section 501of the Small Business Investment Act of 1958 (15 U.S.C. 695).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.205 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible planning, urban environmental design and policy-planning-management-capacitybuilding activities.</ITAG>(a) Planning activities which consist of all costs of data gathering, studies,analysis, and preparation of plans and the identification of actions thatwill implement such plans, including, but not limited to:(1) Comprehensive plans;(2) Community development plans;(3) Functional plans, in areas such as:(i) Housing, including the development of a housing assistance plan;(ii) Land use and urban environmental design;(iii) Economic development;(iv) Open space and recreation;(v) Energy use and conservation;(vi) Floodplain and wetlands management in accordance with the requirementsof Executive Orders 11988 and 11990;(vii) Transportation;(viii) Utilities; and(ix) Historic preservation.(4) Other plans and studies such as:(i) Small area and neighborhood plans;(ii) Capital improvements programs;(iii) Individual project plans (but excluding engineering and design costsrelated to a specific activity which are eligible as part of the cost ofsuch activity under andSection;andSection; 570.201-570.204);(iv) The reasonable costs of general environmental, urban environmentaldesign and historic preservation studies. However, costs necessary to complywith 24 CFR Part 58, including project specific environmental assessmentsand clearances for activities eligible for assistance under this part,are eligible as part of the cost of such activities under andSection;andSection;570.201-570.204. Costs for such specific assessments and clearances mayalso be incurred under this paragraph but would then be considered planningcosts for the purposes of andSection; 570.200(g);(v) Strategies and action programs to implement plans, including the developmentof codes, ordinances and regulations;(vi) Support of clearinghouse functions, such as those specified in ExecutiveOrder 12372; and(vii) Analysis of impediments to fair housing choice.(6) Policy_planning_management_capacity building activities which willenable the recipient to:(1) Determine its needs;(2) Set long-term goals and short-term objectives, including those relatedto urban environmental design;(3) Devise programs and activities to meet these goals and objectives;(4) Evaluate the progress of such programs and activities in accomplishingthese goals and objectives; and(5) Carry out management, coordination and monitoring of activities necessaryfor effective planning implementation, but excluding the costs necessaryto implement such plans.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.206 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Program administration costs.</ITAG>Payment of reasonable administrative costs and carrying charges relatedto the planning and execution of community development activities assistedin whole or in part with funds provided under this part and, where applicable,housing activities (described in paragraph (g) of this section) coveredin the recipient's housing assistance plan. This does not include staffand overhead costs directly related to carrying out activities eligibleunder andSection; 570.201 through andSection; 570.204, since those costs areeligible as part of such activities.(a) <T3>General management, oversight and coordination.</T3> Reasonable costsof overall program management, coordination, monitoring, and evaluation.Such costs include, but are not necessarily limited to, necessary expendituresfor the following:(1) Salaries, wages, and related costs of the recipient's staff, the staffof local public agencies, or other staff engaged in program administration.In charging costs to this category the recipient may either include theentire salary, wages, and related costs allocable to the program of eachperson whose <T3>primary</T3> responsibilities with regard to the program involve programadministration assignments, or the pro rata share of the salary, wages,and related costs of each person whose job includes <T3>any</T3> program administration assignments. The recipient may useonly one of these methods during the program year (or the grant periodfor grants under Subpart F). Program administration includes the followingtypes of assignments:(i) Providing local officials and citizens with information about the program;(ii) Preparing program budgets and schedules, and amendments thereto;(iii) Developing systems for assuring compliance with program requirements;(iv) Developing interagency agreements and agreements with subrecipientsand contractors to carry out program activities;(v) Monitoring program activities for progress and compliance with programrequirements; (vi) Preparing reports and other documents related to the program for submissionto HUD;(vii) Coordinating the resolution of audit and monitoring findings;(viii) Evaluating program results against stated objectives; and(ix) Managing or supervising persons whose primary responsibilities withregard to the program include such assignments as those described in paragraph(a)(1) (i) through (viii) of this section.(2) Travel costs incurred for official business in carrying out the program;(3) Administrative services performed under third party contracts or agreements,including such services as general legal services, accounting services,and audit services; and(4) Other costs for goods and services required for administration of theprogram, including such goods and services as rental or purchase of equipment,insurance, utilities, office supplies, and rental and maintenance (butnot purchase) of office space.(b) <T3>Public information.</T3> The provisions of information and other resourcesto residents and citizen organizations participating in the planning, implementation,or assessment of activities being assisted with CDBG funds.(c) <T3>Fair housing activities. </T3>Provision of fair housing services designedto further the fair housing objectives of Title VIII of the Civil RightsAct of 1968 by making persons of all races, colors, religions, sexes, andnational origins aware of the range of housing opportunities availableto them; other fair housing enforcement, education, and outreach activities;and other activities designed to further the housing objective of avoidingundue concentrations of assisted persons in areas containing a high propositionof lower-income persons.(d) [Reserved](e) <T3>Indirect Costs. </T3>Indirect costs may be charged to the CDBG programunder a cost allocation plan prepared in accordance with OMB CircularsA-21, A-87, or A-122 as applicable.(f) <T3>Submission of applications for Federal programs. </T3>Preparation ofdocuments required for submission to HUD to receive funds under the CDBGand UDAG programs, except as limited under Subpart F at andSection; 570.433(a)(3).In addition, CDBG funds may be used to prepare applications for other Federalprograms where the recipient determines that such activities are necessaryor appropriate to achieve its community development objectives.(g) <T3>Administrative expenses to facilitate housing. </T3>CDBG funds maybe used for necessary administrative expenses in planning or obtainingfinancing for housing as follows: for entitlement recipients, assistanceauthorized by this paragraph is limited to units which are identified inthe recipient's HUD approved housing assistance plan; for HUD-administeredsmall cities recipients, assistance authorized by the paragraph is limitedto facilitating the purchase or occupancy of existing units which are tobe occupied by lower income households, or the construction of rental orowner units where at least 20 percent of the units in each project willbe occupied at affordable rents/costs by lower income persons. Examplesof eligible actions are as follows:(1) The cost of conducting preliminary surveys and analysis of market needs;(2) Site and utility plans, narrative descriptions of the proposed construction,preliminary cost estimates, urban design documentation, and ``sketch drawings,''but excluding architectural, engineering, and other details ordinarilyrequired for construction purposes, such as structural, electrical, plumbing,and mechanical details;(3) Reasonable costs associated with development of applications for mortgageand insured loan commitments, including commitment fees, and of applicationsand proposals under the Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments program pursuantto 24 CFR Parts 880-883;(4) Fees associated with processing of applications for mortgage or insuredloan commitments under programs including those administered by HUD, FarmersHome Administration (FmHA), Federal National Mortgage Association (FNMA),and the Government National Mortgage Association (GNMA);(5) The cost of issuance and administration of mortgage revenue bonds usedto finance the acquisition, rehabilitation or construction of housing,but excluding costs associated with the payment or guarantee of the principalor interest on such bonds; and(6) Special outreach activities which result in greater landlord participationin Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments Program-Existing Housing or similarprograms for lower income persons.(h) <T3>Section 17 of the United States Housing Act of 1937. </T3>Reasonablecosts equivalent to those described in paragraphs (a), (b), (e) and (f)of this section for overall program management of the Rental Rehabilitationand Housing Development programs authorized under section 17 of the UnitedStates Housing Act of 1937, whether or not such activities are otherwiseassisted with funds provided under this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.207 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">ineligible activities.</ITAG>The general rule is that any activity that is not authorized under theprovisions of andSection;andSection; 570.201-570.206 is ineligible to be assistedwith CDBG funds. This section identifies specific activities that are ineligibleand provides guidance in determining the eligibility of other activitiesfrequently associated with housing and community development.(a) The following activities may not be assisted with CDBG funds:(1) <T3>Buildings or portions thereof, used for the general conduct of government</T3>as defined at andSection; 570.3(d) cannot be assisted with CDBG funds.This does not include, however, the removal of architectural barriers underandSection; 570.201(k) involving any such building. Also, where acquisitionof real property includes an existing improvement which is to be used inthe provision of a building for the general conduct of government, theportion of the acquisition cost attributable to the land is eligible, providedsuch acquisition meets a national objective described in andSection; 570.208.(2) <T3>General government expenses. </T3>Except as otherwise specificallyauthorized in this subpart or under OMB Circular A-87, expenses requiredto carry out the regular responsibilities of the unit of general localgovernment are not eligible for assistance under this part.(3) <T3>Political activities. </T3>CDBG funds shall not be used to financethe use of facilities or equipment for political purposes or to engagein other partisan political activities, such as candidate forums, votertransportation, or voter registration. However, a facility originally assistedwith CDBG funds may be used on an incidental basis to hold political meetings,candidate forums, or voter registration campaigns, provided that all partiesand organizations have access to the facility on an equal basis, and areassessed equal rent or use charges, if any.(b) The following activities may not be assisted with CDBG funds unlessauthorized under provisions of andSection; 570.203 or as otherwise specificallynoted herein, or when carried out by a subrecipient under the provisionsof andSection; 570.204.(1) <T3>Purchase of equipment. </T3>The purchase of equipment with CDBG fundsis generally ineligible.(i) <T3>Construction equipment. </T3>The purchase of construction equipmentis ineligible, but compensation for the use of such equipment through leasing,depreciation, or use allowances pursuant to OMB Circulars A-21, A-87 orA-122 as applicable for an otherwise eligible activity is an eligible useof CDBG funds. However, the purchase of construction equipment for useas part of a solid waste disposal facility is eligible under andSection;570.201(c).(ii) <T3>Fire protection equipment. </T3>Fire protection equipment is consideredfor this purpose to be an integral part of a public facility and thus,purchase of such equipment would be eligible under andSection; 570.201(c).(iii) <T3>Furnishings and personal property. </T3>The purchase of equipment,fixtures, motor vehicles, furnishings, or other personal property not anintegral structural fixture is generally ineligible. CDBG funds may beused, however, to purchase or to pay depreciation or use allowances (inaccordance with OMB Circulars A-21, A-87 or A-122, as applicable) for suchitems when necessary for use by a recipient or its subrecipients in theadministration of activities assisted with CDBG funds, or when eligibleas fire fighting equipment, or when such items constitute all or part ofa public service pursuant to andSection; 570.201(e).(2) <T3>Operating and maintenance expenses. </T3>The general rule is that anyexpense associated with repairing, operating or maintaining public facilities,improvements and services is ineligible. Specific exceptions to this generalrule are operating and maintenance expenses associated with public serviceactivities, interim assistance, and office space for program staff employedin carrying out the CDBG program. For example, the use of CDBG funds topay the allocable costs of operating and maintaining a facility used inproviding a public service would be eligible under andSection; 570.201(e),even if no other costs of providing such a service are assisted with suchfunds. Examples of ineligible operating and maintenance expenses are:(i) Maintenance and repair of streets, parks, playgrounds, water and sewerfacilities, neighborhood facilities, senior centers, centers for the handicapped,parking and similar public facilities. Examples of maintenance and repairactivities for which CDBG funds may not be used include the filling ofpot holes in streets, repairing of cracks in sidewalks, the mowing of recreationalareas, and the replacement of expended street light bulbs; and(ii) Payment of salaries for staff, utility costs and similar expensesnecessary for the operation of public work and facilities.(3) <T3>New housing construction. </T3>For the purpose of this paragraph, activitiesin support of the development of low or moderate income housing includingclearance, site assemblage, provision of site improvements and provisionof public improvements and certain housing pre-construction costs set forthin andSection; 570.206(g), are not considered as activities to subsidizeor assist new residential construction. CDBG funds may not be used forthe construction of new permanent residential structures or for any programto subsidize or assist such new construction, except:(i) As provided under the last resort housing provisions set forth in 24CFR Part 42;(ii) As authorized under andSection; 570.201(m); or(iii) When carried out by a subrecipient pursuant to andSection; 570.204(a);(4) <T3>Income payments. </T3>The general rule is that CDBG funds shall notbe used for income payments for housing or any other purpose. Examplesof ineligible income payments include: payments for income maintenance,housing allowances, down payments, and mortgage subsidies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.208 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for national objectives.</ITAG>The following criteria shall be used to determine whether a CDBG-assistedactivity complies with one or more of the national objectives as requiredunder andSection; 570.200(a)(2):(a) <T3>Activities benefiting low and moderate income persons. </T3>Activitiesmeeting the criteria in paragraph (a) (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this sectionas applicable, will be considered to benefit low and moderate income personsunless there is substantial evidence to the contrary. In assessing anysuch evidence, the full range of direct effects of the assisted activitywill be considered. (The recipient shall appropriately ensure that activitiesthat meet these criteria do not benefit moderate income persons to theexclusion of low income persons.)(1) <T3>Area benefit activities. </T3>(i) An activity, the benefits of whichare available to all the residents in a particular area, where at least51 percent of the residents are low and moderate income persons. Such anarea need not be coterminous with census tracts or other officially recognizedboundaries but must be the entire area served by the activity. An activitythat serves an area that is not primarily residential in character shallnot qualify under this criterion.(ii) For metropolitan cities and urban counties, an activity that wouldotherwise qualify under andSection;570.208(a)(1)(i) except that the areaserved contains less than 51 percent low and moderate income residentswill also be considered to meet the objective of benefiting low and moderateincome persons where the proportion of low and moderate income personsin the area is within the highest quartile of all areas in the recipient'sjurisdiction in terms of the degree of concentration of such persons. Inapplying this exception, HUD will determine the lowest proportion a recipientmay use to qualify an area for this purpose as follows:(A) All census block groups in the recipient's jurisdiction shall be rankordered from the block group of highest proportion of low and moderateincome persons to the block group with the lowest. For urban counties,the rank ordering shall cover the entire area constituting the urban countyand shall not be done separately for each participating unit of generallocal government.(B) In any case where the total number of a recipient's block groups doesnot divide evenly by four, the block group which would be fractionallydivided between the highest and second quartiles shall be considered tobe part of the highest quartile.(C) The proportion of low and moderate income persons in the last censusblock group in the highest quartile shall be identified. Any service arealocated within the recipient's jurisdiction and having a proportion oflow and moderate income persons at or above this level shall be consideredto be within the highest quartile.(D) If block group data are not available for the entire jurisdiction,other data acceptable to the Secretary may be used in the above calculations.(iii) For purposes of determining qualification under this criterion, activitiesof the same type that serve different areas will be considered separatelyon the basis of their individual service area.(iv) In determining whether there is a sufficiently large percentage oflow and moderate income persons residing in the area served by an activityto qualify under paragraph (a)(1) (i) or (ii) of this section, the mostrecently available decennial census information shall be used to the fullestextent feasible, together with the Section 8 income limits that would haveapplied at the time the income information was collected by the CensusBureau. Recipients that believe that the census data does not reflect currentrelative income levels in an area, or where census boundaries do not coincidesufficiently well with the service area of an activity, may conduct (orhave conducted) a current survey of the residents of the area to determinethe percent of such persons that are low and moderate income. HUD willaccept information obtained through such surveys, to be used in lieu ofthe decennial census data, where it determines that the survey was conductedin such a manner that the results meet standards of statistical reliabilitythat are comparable to that of the decennial census data for areas of similarsize. Where there is substantial evidence that provides a clear basis tobelieve that the use of the decennial census data would substantially overstatethe proportion of persons residing there that are low and moderate income,HUD may require that the recipient rebut such evidence in order to demonstratecompliance with section 105(c)(2) of the Act.(2) <T3>Limited clientele activities. </T3>(i) An activity which benefits alimited clientele, at least 51 percent of whom are low or moderate incomepersons. (The following kinds of activities may not qualify under thisparagraph: activities, the benefits of which are available to all the residentsof an area; activities involving the acquisition, construction or rehabilitationof property for housing; or activities where the benefit to low and moderateincome persons to be considered is the creation or retention of jobs.)To qualify under this paragraph, the activity must meet one of the followingtests:(A) Benefit a clientele who are generally presumed to be principally lowand moderate income persons. The following groups are presumed by HUD tomeet this criterion: abused children, battered spouses, elderly persons,handicapped persons, homeless persons, illiterate persons and migrant farmworkers; or(B) Require information on family size and income so that it is evidentthat at least 51 percent of the clientele are persons whose family incomedoes not exceed the low and moderate income limit; or(C) Have income eligibility requirements which limit the activity exclusivelyto low and moderate income persons; or(D) Be of such nature and be in such location that it may be concludedthat the activity's clientele will primarily be low and moderate incomepersons.(ii) A special project directed to removal of material and architecturalbarriers which restrict the mobility and accessibility of elderly or handicappedpersons to publicly owned and privately owned non-residential buildings,facilities and improvements and the common areas of residential structurescontaining more than one dwelling unit. (3) <T3>Housing activities. </T3>An eligible activity carried out for the purposeof providing or improving permanent residential structures which, uponcompletion, will be occupied by low and moderate income households. Thiswould include, but not necessarily be limited to, the acquisition or rehabilitationof property, conversion of non-residential structures, and new housingconstruction. If the structure contains two dwelling units, at least onemust be so occupied, and if the structure contains more than two dwellingunits, at least 51 percent of the units must be so occupied. Where twoor more rental buildings being assisted are or will be located on the sameor contiguous properties, and the buildings will be under common ownershipand management, the grouped buildings may be considered for this purposeas a single structure. For rental housing, occupancy by low and moderateincome households must be at affordable rents to qualify under this criterion.The recipient shall adopt and make public its standards for determining``affordable rents'' for this purpose. The following shall also qualifyunder this criterion: (i) When less than 51 percent of the units in a structure will be occupiedby low and moderate income households, CDBG assistance may be providedin the following limited circumstances: (A) The assistance is for an eligible activity to reduce the developmentcost of the new construction of a multifamily, non-elderly housing project;(B) Not less than 20 percent of the units will be occupied by low and moderateincome households at affordable rents; and (C) The proportion of the total cost of developing the project to be borneby CDBG funds is no greater than the proportion of units in the projectthat will be occupied by low and moderate income households. (ii) When CDBG funds are used to assist rehabilitation eligible under andSection;570.202(b) (9) or (10) in direct support of the recipient's Rental Rehabilitationprogram authorized under 24 CFR Part 511, such funds shall be consideredto benefit low and moderate income persons where not less than 51 percentof the units assisted, or to be assisted, by the recipient's Rental Rehabilitationprogram overall are for low and moderate income persons. (4) <T3>Job creation or retention activities. </T3>An activity designed tocreate or retain permanent jobs where at least 51 percent of the jobs,computed on a full time equivalent basis, involve the employment of lowand moderate persons. As a general rule, each assisted business shall beconsidered to be a separate activity for purposes of determining whetherthe activity qualifies under this paragraph. However, in certain casessuch as where CDBG funds are used to acquire, develop or improve a realproperty (e.g., a business incubator or an industrial park) the requirementmay be met by measuring jobs in the aggregate for all the businesses whichlocate on the property, provided such businesses are not otherwise assistedby CDBG funds. Additionally, where CDBG funds are used to pay for the staffand overhead costs of a andSection; 570.204 subrecipient making loans tobusinesses from non-CDBG funds, this requirement may be met by aggregatingthe jobs created by all of the businesses receiving loans during any oneyear period. For an activity that creates jobs, the recipient must documentthat at least 51 percent of the jobs will be held by, or will be availableto, low and moderate income persons. For an activity that retains jobs,the recipient must document that the jobs would actually be lost withoutthe CDBG assistance and that either or both of the following conditionsapply with respect to at least 51 percent of the jobs at the time the CDBGassistance is provided: The job is known to be held by a low or moderateincome person; or the job can reasonably be expected to turn over withinthe following two years and that steps will be taken to ensure that itwill be filled by, or made available to, a low or moderate income personupon turnover. Jobs will be considered to be available to low and moderateincome persons for these purposes only if: (i) Special skills that can only be acquired with substantial trainingor work experience or education beyond high school are not a prerequisiteto fill such jobs, or the business agrees to hire unqualified persons andprovide training; and (ii) The recipient and the assisted business take actions to ensure thatlow and moderate income persons receive first consideration for fillingsuch jobs.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Expenditures for activities meeting the criteria for benefitinglow and moderate income persons shall be used in determining the extentto which the recipient's overall program benefits such persons. The calculationshall be made following the rules described at andSection; 570.200(a)(3).</ITAG>(b) <T3>Activities which aid in the prevention or elimination of slums or blight.</T3>Activities meeting one or more of the following criteria, in the absenceof substantial evidence to the contrary, will be considered to aid in theprevention or elimination of slums or blight: (1) <T3>Activities to address slums or blight on an area basis. </T3>An activitywill be considered to address prevention or elimination of slums or blightin an area if:(i) The area, delineated by the recipient, meets a definition of a slum,blighted, deteriorated or deteriorating area under State or local law;(ii) Throughout the area there is a substantial number of deterioratedor deteriorating buildings or the public improvements are in a generalstate of deterioration; (iii) Documentation is maintained by the recipient on the boundaries ofthe area and the condition which qualified the area at the time of itsdesignation; and (iv) The assisted activity addresses one or more of the conditions whichcontributed to the deterioration of the area. Rehabilitation of residentialbuildings carried out in an area meeting the above requirements will beconsidered to address the area's deterioration only where each such buildingrehabilitated is considered substandard under local definition before rehabilitation,and all deficiencies making a building substandard have been eliminatedif less critical work on the building is undertaken. At a minimum, thelocal definition for this purpose must be such that buildings that it wouldrender substandard would also fail to meet the housing quality standardsfor the Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments Program-Existing Housing(24 CFR 882.109). (2) <T3>Activities to address slums or blight on a spot basis. </T3>Acquisition,clearance, relocation, historic preservation and building rehabilitationactivities which eliminate specific conditions of blight or physical decayon a spot basis not located in a slum or blighted area will meet this objective.Under this criterion, rehabilitation is limited to the extent necessaryto eliminate specific conditions detrimental to public health and safety.(3) <T3>Activities to address slums or blight in an urban renewal area. </T3>Anactivity will be considered to address prevention or elimination of slumsor blight in an urban renewal area if the activity is: (i) Located within an urban renewal project area or Neighborhood DevelopmentProgram (NDP) action area; i.e., an area in which funded activities wereauthorized under an urban renewal Loan and Grant Agreement or an annualNDP Funding Agreement, pursuant to Title I of the Housing Act of 1949;and (ii) Necessary to complete the urban renewal plan, as then in effect, including<T3>initial </T3>land redevelopment permitted by the plan.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Note: </T4>Despite the restrictions in (b) (1) and (2) of this section,any rehabilitation activity which benefits low and moderate income personspursuant to paragraph (a)(3) of this section can be undertaken withoutregard to the area in which it is located or the extent or nature of rehabilitationassisted.</ITAG>(c) <T3>Activities designed to meet community development needs having a particularurgency. </T3>In the absence of substantial evidence to the contrary, anactivity will be considered to address this objective if the recipientcertifies that the activity is designed to alleviate existing conditionswhich pose a serious and immediate threat to the health or welfare of thecommunity which are of recent origin or which recently became urgent, thatthe recipient is unable to finance the activity on its own, and that othersources of funding are not available. A condition will generally be consideredto be of recent origin if it developed or became critical within 18 monthspreceding the certification by the recipient. (d) <T3>Additional criteria. </T3>(1) Where the assisted activity is acquisitionof real property, a preliminary determination of whether the activity addressesa national objective may be based on the planned use of the property afteracquisition. A final determination shall be based on the actual use ofthe property, excluding any short-term, temporary use. Where the acquisitionis for the purpose of clearance which will eliminate specific conditionsof blight or physical decay, the clearance activity shall be consideredthe actual use of the property. However, any subsequent use or dispositionof the cleared property shall be treated as a ``change of use'' under $570.505.(2) Where the assisted activity is relocation assistance that the recipientis required to provide, such relocation assistance shall be consideredto address the same national objective as is addressed by the displacingactivity. Where the relocation assistance is voluntary on the part of thegrantee the recipient may qualify the assistance either on the basis ofthe national objective addressed by the displacing activity or on the basisthat the recipients of the relocation assistance are low and moderate incomepersons. (3) In any case where the activity undertaken for the purpose of creatingor retaining jobs is a public improvement and the area served is primarilyresidential, the activity must meet the requirements of paragraph (a)(1)of this section as well as those of paragraph (a)(4) of this section inorder to qualify as benefiting low and moderate income persons. (4) CDBG funds expended for planning and administrative costs under andSection;570.205 and andSection; 570.206 will be considered to address the nationalobjectives.4. Subpart D of Part 570 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="74">Subpart D_Entitlement Grants </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.300 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.301 Presubmission requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.302 Submission requirements. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.303 Certifications. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.304 Making of grants. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.305 Amendments. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.306 Housing assistance plan. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.307 Urban counties. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.308 Joint requests. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Entitlement Grants </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.300</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>This subpart describes the policies and procedures governing the makingof community development block grants to entitlement communities. The policiesand procedures set forth in Subparts A, C, J, K, and O of this part alsoapply to entitlement grantees. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.301</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Presubmission requirements. </ITAG>Prior to the submission to HUD for its annual grant, the grantee must:(a) Develop a proposed statement of community development objectives andprojected use of funds, including the following items: (1) The community development objectives the grantee proposes to pursue.(2) The community development activities the grantee proposes to carryout with anticipated CDBG funds, including all funds identified in paragraph(b)(1)(i) of this section, to address its identified community developmentobjectives. Each such activity must: (i) Meet the applicable requirements of 24 CFR 570 Subpart C; and (ii) Be described in sufficient detail, including location, to allow citizensto determine the degree to which they may be affected. (b) In a manner which provides for the timely citizen examination, appraisal,and comment on its statements, meet the following citizen participationrequirements: (1) Furnish citizens with information concerning: (i) The amount of CDBG funds expected to be available (including the annualgrant, program income expected to be recieved during the program year togetherwith program income received during the preceding program year and thathas not yet been programmed for use), and surplus from urban renewal settlementfor community development and housing activities; (ii) The range of activities that may be undertaken with those funds pursuantto the criteria in 24 CFR 570 Subpart C; (iii) The estimated amount of those funds proposed to be used for activitiesthat will benefit low and moderate income persons; (iv) The proposed CDBG activities likely to result in displacement andthe grantee's plans (consistent with the grantee's Housing Assistance Planand policies developed pursuant to andSection; 570.606(b)) for minimizingsuch displacement of persons as a result of its proposed activities; and(v) The types and levels of assistance the grantee will make available(or to require others to make available) to persons displaced by CDBG fundedactivities, even if the grantee expects no such displacement to occur.(2) Hold at least one public hearing to obtain the views of citizens onthe grantee's housing and community development needs (grantees may electto hold additional hearings and to cover other subjects through such publichearings, such as obtaining views on specific community development orhousing activities). (3) Publish community-wide its proposed statement of community developmentobjectives and projected use of funds so as to afford affected citizensan opportunity to examine the statement's contents, and to provide commentson the proposed statement and on the grantee's community development performance.(c) Prepare its final statement of community development objectives andprojected use of funds. Once the grantee has completed the citizen participationrequirements in paragraph (b) of this section, the grantee must considerany such comments and views received and if the grantee deems appropriatemodify the proposed statement. The grantee shall make the final statementavailable to the public. The final statement may include activities whichdo not either benefit low and moderate income persons or prevent or eliminateslums and blight only if the grantee identifies such activities in thefinal statement and certifies that such activities are designed to meetother community development needs having a particular urgency because existingconditions pose a serious and immediate threat to the health or welfareof the community, and other financial resources are not available. (d) Submit and receive approval of its housing assistance plan in accordancewith andSection; 570.306.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by Office of Management and Budget under Control No. 2506-0077)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.302</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission requirements. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Content. </T3>In order to receive its annual CDBG entitlement grant,a grantee must submit the following: (1) Standard Form 424; (2) A copy of the grantee's final statement of community development objectivesand projected use of funds, covering the same items as listed in andSection;570.301(a); and (3) Certifications satisfactory to the Secretary covering all of the itemslisted in andSection; 570.303. (b) <T3>Timing of submissions.</T3> (1) In order to facilitate continuity inits program, the grantee should submit its final statement to HUD at least30 days prior to the start of its community development program year, butin no event will HUD accept a submission for a grant earlier than December1 or later than the first working day in September of the Federal fiscalyear for which the grant funds are appropriated. (2) A program year shall run for a twelve month period. A grantee may,however, either shorten or lengthen its program year, provided HUD receiveswritten notice of a lengthened program year at least two months prior tothe date the program year would have ended if it had not been lengthened,or HUD receives notice of a shortened program year at least two monthsprior to the end of the shortened program year.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under Control No.2506-0077) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.303</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Certifications. </ITAG>The grantee shall submit certifications that: (a) It possesses legal authority to make a grant submission and to executea community development and housing program; (b) Its governing body has duly adopted or passed as an official act aresolution, motion or similar action authorizing the person identifiedas the official representative of the grantee to submit the final statementand amendments thereto and all understandings and assurances containedtherein, and directing and authorizing the person identified as the officialrepresentative of the grantee to act in connection with the submissionof the final statement and to provide such additional information as maybe required. (c) Prior to submission of its final statement to HUD, the grantee has:(1) Met the citizen participation requirements of section 104(a)(3) ofthe Act; and (2) Prepared its final statement of community development objectives andprojected use of funds in accordance with andSection; 570.301(c) and madethe final statement available to the public. (d) The grantee will affirmatively further fair housing, and the grantwill be conducted and administered in compliance with: (1) Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Pub. L. 88-352, 42 U.S.C.2000d <T3>et seq.</T3>); and (2) Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (Pub. L. 90-284, 42 U.S.C.3601 <T3>et seq.</T3>). (e) It has developed its final statement of projected use of funds so asto give maximum feasible priority to activities which benefit low and moderateincome families or aid in the prevention or elimination of slums or blight.[The final statement of projected use of funds may also include activitieswhich the grantee certifies pursuant to andSection; 570.301(c) are designedto meet other community development needs having a particular urgency.](f) In the aggregate, at least 60 percent of all CDBG funds, as definedat andSection; 570.3(e), to be expended during the one, two or three consecutiveprogram years specified by the grantee will be for activities which benefitlow and moderate income persons, as described in criteria at 24 CFR 570.208(a).(g) Its notification, inspection, testing and abatement procedures concerninglead-based paint will comply with andSection; 570.608. (h) It will comply with the acquisition and relocation requirements ofthe Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition PoliciesAct of 1970 as required under andSection; 570.606(a) and HUD implementingregulations at 24 CFR Part 42; the requirements in andSection; 570.606(b)governing the residential antidisplacement and relocation assistance planunder section 104(d) of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974(the Act) (including a certification that the grantee is following sucha plan); the relocation requirements of andSection; 570.606(c) governingdisplacement subject to section 104(k) of the Act; and the relocation requirementsof andSection; 570.606(d) governing optional relocation assistance undersection 105(1)(11) of the Act. (i) It has developed a community development plan, which at a minimum,covers the same one, two or three program years pursuant to paragraph (f)of this section. At a minimum the community development plan must: (1) Identify the grantee's community development needs and housing needs;and (2) Specify both short-term and long-term community development objectives,consistent with the grantee's final statement, that have been developedin accordance with the primary objective of the Act and the requirementsof this part.(j) It will comply with the requirements of andSection; 570.200(c)(2) withregard to the use of special assessments to recover the capital costs ofactivities assisted with CDBG funds. (k) (Where applicable, the grantee may also include the following additionalcertification.) It lacks sufficient resources from funds provided underthis subpart or program income to allow it to comply with the provisionsof andSection; 570.200(c)(2), and it must therefore assess properties ownedand occupied by moderate income persons, to recover the non-CDBG fundedportion of the capital cost without paying such assessments in their behalffrom CDBG funds. (l) It is following a current housing assistance plan which has been approvedby HUD pursuant to andSection; 570.306. (m) It will comply with the other provisions of the Act and with otherapplicable laws. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.304</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Making of grants. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Acceptance of final statement and certifications. </T3>The final statementand certifications will be accepted by the responsible HUD field officeunless it is determined that one or more of the following requirementshave not been met. (1) <T3>Completeness. </T3>The submission shall include all of the componentsrequired in andSection; 570.302(a). (2) <T3>Timeliness. </T3>The submission must be received within the time periodestablished in andSection; 570.302(b)(1). (3) <T3>Certifications. </T3>The certifications made by the grantee will besatisfactory to the Secretary if made in conformance with andSection; 570.303,unless the Secretary has determined pursuant to Subpart O that the granteehas not complied with the requirements of this part or has failed to carryout its housing assistance plan in a timely manner, or determined thatthere is evidence, not directly involving the grantee's past performanceunder this program, which tends to challenge in a substantial manner thegrantee's certification of future performance. If the Secretary makes anysuch determination, however, further assurances may be required to be submittedby the grantee as the Secretary may deem warranted or necessary to findthe grantee's certification satisfactory. (b) <T3>Grant agreement. </T3>The grant will be made by means of a grant agreementexecuted by both HUD and the grantee. (c) <T3>Grant amount. </T3>The Secretary will make a grant in the full entitlementamount, generally within the last 30 days of the grantee's current programyear, unless: (1) The final statement or certifications are not received by the firstworking day in September or are not acceptable under paragraphs (a) (1)and (3) of this section in which case the grantee will forfeit the entireentitlement amount; or (2) The grantee's performance does not meet the performance requirementsor criteria prescribed in Subpart O and the grant amount is reduced. (d) <T3>Conditional grant. </T3>The Secretary may make a conditional grantin which case the obligation and use of grant funds for activities maybe restricted. Conditional grants may be made where there is substantialevidence that there has been, or there will be, a failure to meet the performancerequirements or criteria described in Subpart O. In such case, the conditionalgrant will be made by means of a grant agreement, executed by HUD, whichincludes the terms of the condition specifying the reason for the conditionalgrant, the actions necessary to remove the condition and the deadline fortaking those actions. The grantee shall execute and return such an agreementto HUD within 60 days of the date of its transmittal. Failure of the granteeto execute and return the grant agreement within 60 days may be deemedby HUD to constitute rejection of the grant by the grantee and shall because for HUD to determine that the funds provided in the grant agreementare available for reallocation in accordance with section 106(c) of theAct. Failure to satisfy the condition may result in a reduction in theentitlement amount pursuant to andSection; 570.911. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.305</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Amendments. </ITAG>(a) The grantee shall amend its final statement whenever it decides notto carry out an activity described in the final statement, to carry outan activity not previously described, or to substantially change the purpose,scope, location, or beneficiaries of an activity. Within 120 days of theeffective date of this rule or, for a new grantee, prior to submissionof its final statement, the grantee shall develop and make public its criteriafor what constitutes a substantial change for this purpose. (b) Prior to amending its final statement, the grantee shall provide citizenswith reasonable notice of, and opportunity to comment on, such proposedchanges in its use of funds. The grantee shall consider any such commentsand, if the grantee deems appropriate, modify the changes. The granteeshall make available to the public, and shall submit to HUD, a descriptionof any changes adopted. A letter transmitting such description to HUD shallbe signed by the official representative of the grantee. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.306</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Housing assistance plan. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose. </T3>In its housing assistance plan (HAP), each metropolitancity and urban county surveys its housing conditions, assesses the housingassistance needs of its low and moderate income households, specifies goalsfor the number of dwelling units and low and moderate income householdsto be assisted, and indicates the general locations of proposed assistedhousing for low and moderate income persons. (b) <T3>Use. </T3>A grantee's HAP is a basis upon which HUD approves or disapprovesassisted housing in the grantee's jurisdiction and against which HUD monitorsa grantee's provision of assisted housing.(c) <T3>Grantee's responsibility. </T3>Each grantee is responsible for implementingits HAP expeditiously. This includes the timely achievement of goals forassisted housing. Each grantee is expected to use all available resourcesand, when needed, to take all actions within its control to implement theapproved HAP. Performance under the HAP is one of the factors consideredin grantee performance reviews conducted as provided in Subpart O of thispart. Subpart O also provides further requirements relating to the responsibilityof the grantee in implementing its HAP. (d) <T3>General. </T3>(1) The HAP consists of the five components describedin paragraph (e) of this section. The HAP shall be submitted to HUD byan authorized representative of the grantee. (2) Each city or county which expects to receive an entitlement grant shallsubmit a HAP between September 1 and October 31 prior to its submissionof the final statement required by andSection; 570.302. The HAP will be consideredin effect from October 1 through September 30 for purposes of creditingperformance against the goals established regardless of the specific datethat HUD approves the HAP. A grantee which has a three year goal whichwill be in effect for the fiscal year in which the final statement is tobe submitted need only submit an annual goal and may reference (to theextent that  there have been no significant changes) the other requiredportions of the HAP. (3) Any newly entitled community which was not made aware of its entitlementstatus by August 31 shall be considered unable to comply with the October31 deadline and may submit an interim HAP in accordance with the requirementsof paragraph (e)(6) of this section in lieu of the requirements of paragraphs(e)(1) through (e)(5) of this section. (e) <T3>Housing conditions, needs, goals, and locations_</T3>(1) <T3>Conditions. </T3>The grantee shall describe the condition of the currenthousing stock in the community by providing a statistical profile (includingan identification of data sources and data time frames) by tenure type(renter and owner), which describes housing conditions by the number ofoccupied, vacant and abandoned dwelling units in standard and substandardcondition. The grantee shall develop its own definition of substandardhousing which, at a minimum, shall include units which do not meet thehousing quality standards of the Section 8 Housing Assistance PaymentsProgram_Existing Housing (24 CFR 882.109) and shall include such definitionin its submission. In addition, the grantee shall identify the number ofits occupied, vacant and abandoned substandard housing units which it considersto be suitable for rehabilitation, and include its definition of suitablefor rehabilitation in the HAP submission. (2) <T3>Needs. </T3>(i) The grantee shall assess the housing assistance needsof low and moderate income households currently residing in the communityby tenure and, for households requiring rental subsidies, by householdtype (elderly, small family and non-elderly individuals, and large family),including households expected to be involuntarily displaced by public andprivate action over the three year period of the HAP. The grantee shallalso assess the housing assistance needs of low and moderate income householdsthat could reasonably be expected to reside in the community. Such householdsare those that could be expected to reside in the community as a resultof existing and projected employment opportunities, and the estimate shallconsider changes in population known to have occurred since the last Census.For elderly households, the estimate of those that are expected to residein the community must be based on the number known to be seeking assistedhousing in the community or using the community's health services. In nocase shall the estimate of all households expected to reside be less thanzero. (ii) A narrative statement accompanying the needs shall indicate the compositionof the needs of low and moderate income persons including separate numericalestimates, by tenure and household type, for households to be involuntarilydisplaced, households expected to reside, and total minority households.This narrative statement shall also include the source and date of thedata used in developing the needs assessment. In addition, the narrativeshall include a description which summarizes any special housing conditionsand/or any special housing needs of particular groups of low and moderateincome households in the community. Such description shall include butneed not be limited to, discussion of the special housing needs and/orconditions of individual minority groups, impact of conversion of rentalhousing to condominium or cooperative ownership, handicapped persons, andsingle heads of household. All handicapped single person households (elderlyand nonelderly) as well as two person households which include one elderlyperson and one handicapped person, must be included in the elderly category,but separately identified in the narrative. All other nonelderly handicappedpersons must be included with small or large family households, accordingto the size of their households. (3) <T3>Three year goal. </T3>(i) The grantee shall specify a realistic threeyear goal by tenure type for goals which are designed to improve the conditionof the housing stock, and also by household type for the number of householdsto be assisted with rental subsidies. The three year goal must includeall assisted housing resources which can be expected to be available tothe grantee. In addition, the grantee shall identify the maximum numberof HUD assisted rental units it will accept during that three year periodof each housing type (i.e., new, rehabilitation, existing) in an amountat least equal to the total number of HUD assisted rental goals by householdtype. (ii) Goals relating to improving the condition of the housing stock shouldbe based on an evaluation of the data presented in the housing conditionsportion of the HAP as well as other current data available to the grantee.(iii) The goals relating to households to be assisted with rental subsidiesmust be proportional to need by household type, except that HUD may approveor require a different proportion in cases of: (A) Disproportionate provision of assisted housing under a previous HAP;(B) Significant displacement of a particular household type;(C) Adjustments for projects of feasible size; (D) Natural disasters; (E) Meeting the requirements of sections 105 (f) and (h) of the HousingAct of 1949, as amended (42 U.S.C. 1450 <T3>et seq.</T3>) or of andSection; 570.606(b)(1); (F) As provided under paragraph (e)(3)(vi) of this section. (iv) The majority of goals for the rehabilitation of dwelling units mustassist low and moderate income households. For this purpose, publicly assistedrehabilitation of a dwelling unit shall be deemed to assist a low and moderateincome household when the dwelling unit, after rehabilitation, is occupiedby a low and moderate income household. (v) Each grantee shall include a narrative describing those specific actionswhich the grantee will take to address any special housing conditions orneeds identified in andSection; 570.306(e)(2)(ii) above, as well as any actionsdetermined necessary to ensure the timely achievement of its three yeargoals (including a discussion of any expected or known impediments andplanned remedies); those specific actions that the grantee will take tominimize displacement of low income persons and of moderate income persons,specified separately; and those specific actions that the grantee willtake to preserve or expand the availability of housing for low income personsand for moderate income persons, specified separately, such as the preservationof single room occupancy housing and the development by public and privatenonprofit organizations of vacant properties that become available under<T3>in rem </T3>proceedings. (vi) Amendments to three-year goals occurring in the second or third yearof such goals may contain goals which are not proportional to need by householdtype under the following circumstances: (A) The amendment is for the sole purpose of accommodating an otherwiseacceptable proposal for housing assistance from HUD; (B) The likely level of resources available for the other household typesprecludes the commensurate increase of the goals for those categories;and (C) HUD determines that, with respect to meeting the three year goals forthe other household types, the grantee has taken all reasonable actionsnecessary to make use of available resources and has taken no actions designedto block the provision of housing assistance. (4) <T3>Annual goal. </T3>(i) The grantee shall specify an annual goal whichmust include all assisted housing resources which can be expected to beavailable to the grantee; be established considering feasible project size;and constitute reasonable progress towards meeting the three year goal.In addition, the grantee shall indicate its preference for the distributionof HUD's assisted rental housing by housing type (i.e., new, rehabilitation,existing). (ii) In its annual goal, the grantee shall also describe the specific actions(including any new problems encountered and planned remedies) it will takeduring the year to meet its annual goal and, as appropriate, its threeyear goal; those specific actions that the grantee will take to minimizedisplacement of low income persons and of moderate income persons, specifiedseparately; and those specific actions that the grantee will take to preserveor expand the availability of housing for low income persons and for moderateincome persons, specified separately, such as the preservation of singleroom occupancy housing and the development by public and private nonprofitorganizations of vacant properties that become available under <T3>in rem </T3>proceedings. The grantee must also include a descriptionof the provisions that it will make to assure that a majority of dwellingunits to receive rehabilitation subsidy will assist low and moderate incomehouseholds. (5) <T3>General locations. </T3>(i) A grantee having goals for new constructionor substantial rehabilitation shall identify general locations of proposedprojects with the objective of furthering community revitalization, promotinghousing opportunity, enabling persons that are to be involuntarily displacedto remain in their neighborhoods, avoiding undue concentrations of assistedhousing in areas containing high proportions of low and moderate incomepersons, and assuring the availability of public facilities and services.(ii) The grantee may, at its option, designate any of the general locationsidentified pursuant to paragraph (e)(5)(i) of this section as High Priorityareas. (Under provisions of HUD's assisted housing ranking procedures,a higher rating can be obtained under the ranking criteria with respectto responsiveness of proposed projects to preferences and priorities ofapplicable HAPs.)(iii) Each general location identified under paragraph (e)(5)(i) of thissection must contain at least one site which conforms to the Departmentalregulations and policies relating to the site and neighborhood standardsestablished for the appropriate HUD assisted housing program. (iv) Identification of the general locations must be accomplished by attachinga map to the HAP except that the HUD field office may accept a listingwhere it determines that the development of a map would present a hardshipfor the grantee. (6) <T3>Interim HAP. </T3>A newly entitled grantee which has not been notifiedby HUD in sufficient time to meet the October 31 HAP submittal deadline(see andSection; 570.306(d)(3)) shall submit an interim HAP at least 45 daysprior to the submission of its final statement. Such submission shall includea narrative description of the condition of the housing stock; a narrativeassessment of the housing assistance needs of low and moderate income households;a realistic annual goal indicating the number of dwelling units by housingtype, and low and moderate income households by household type, to be assistedduring the balance of the fiscal year; and a listing of general locationsof proposed new construction and substantially rehabilitated housing forlow and moderate income persons; and any other element specifically requiredunder section 104(c) of the Act. This HAP submission will be effectivethrough September 30 of the year in which it is submitted. (f) <T3>Amendments to the HAP. </T3>The grantee shall amend its HAP wheneverthere is a substantial change in its housing needs or the public resourcesavailable to address those needs and shall notify HUD within 45 days ofany changes it makes to its HAP. (g) <T3>HUD review of HAPs, interim HAPs, and amendments. </T3>HUD will reviewthese HAP submissions to assure that the requirements of this section havebeen met, and will approve them unless the grantee's stated conditionsand needs are plainly inconsistent with significant facts or data generallyavailable; the grantee's proposed goals and activities are plainly inappropriateto meeting those conditions or needs; or the HAP fails to comply with otherprovisions of this section. Within 30 days of the date that the submissionis received, HUD will notify the grantee in writing that the submissionhas been approved, disapproved, or that a final decision is still pending(in which case HUD may take no more than 30 additional days to decide whetherto approve or disapprove the submission). In the event that HUD has notnotified the grantee in writing within 30 days of receipt, the submissionshall be considered fully approved.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under Control No.2506-0077) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.307</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Urban counties. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Determination of qualification. </T3>The Secretary will determine thequalifications of counties to receive entitlements as urban counties uponreceipt of qualification documentation from counties at such time, andin such manner and form as prescribed by HUD. The Secretary shall determineeligibility and applicable portions of each eligible county for purposesof fund allocation under section 106 of the Act on the basis of informationavailable from the U.S. Bureau of the Census with respect to populationand other pertinent demographic characteristics, and based on informationprovided by the county and its included units of general local government.(b) <T3>Qualification as an urban county. </T3>(1) A county will qualify asan urban county if such county meets the definition at andSection; 570.3(ee).As necessitated by this definition, the Secretary shall determine whichcounties have authority to carry out essential community development andhousing assistance activities in their included units of general localgovernment without the consent of the local governing body and which countiesmust execute cooperation agreements with such units to include them inthe urban county for qualification and grant calculation purposes. (2) At the time of urban county qualification, HUD may refuse to recognizethe cooperation agreement of a unit of general local government in an urbancounty where, based on past performance and other available information,there is substantial evidence that such unit does not cooperate in theimplementation of the essential community development or housing assistanceactivities or where legal impediments to such implementation exist, orwhere participation by a unit of general local government in noncompliancewith the applicable law in Subpart K would constitute noncompliance bythe urban county. In such a case, the unit of general local governmentwill not be permitted to participate in the urban county, and its populationor other needs characteristics will not be considered in the determinationof whether the county qualifies as an urban county or in determining theamount of funds to which the urban county may be entitled. HUD will nottake this action unless the unit of general local government and the countyhave been given an opportunity to challenge HUD's determination and toinformally consult with HUD concerning the proposed action. (c) <T3>Essential activities. </T3>For purposes of this section, the term ``essentialcommunity development and housing assistance activities'' means communityrenewal and lower income housing activities, specifically urban renewaland publicly assisted housing. In determining whether a county has therequired powers, the Secretary will consider both its authority and, whereapplicable, the authority of its designated agency or agencies. (d) <T3>Period of qualification. </T3>(1) The qualification by HUD of an urbancounty shall remain effective for three successive Federal fiscal yearsregardless of changes in its population during that period, except as providedunder paragraph (f) of this section and except as provided under andSection;570.3(ee)(3) where the period of qualification shall be two successiveFederal fiscal years. (2) During the period of qualification, no included unit of general localgovernment may withdraw from nor be removed from the urban county for HUD'sgrant computation purposes. (3) If some portion of an urban county's unincorporated area becomes incorporatedduring the urban county qualification period, the newly incorporated unitof general local government shall not be excluded from the urban countynor shall it be eligible for a separate grant under Subpart D, F, or Iuntil the end of the urban county's current qualification period, unlessthe urban county fails to receive a grant for any year during that qualificationperiod. (e) <T3>Grant ineligibility of included units of general local government.</T3>(1) An included unit of general local government cannot become eligiblefor an entitlement grant as a metropolitan city during the period of qualificationof the urban county (even if it becomes a central  city of a metropolitanarea or its population surpasses 50,000 during that period). Rather, sucha unit of general local government shall continue to be included as partof the urban county for the remainder of the urban county's qualificationperiod, and no separate grant amount shall be calculated for the includedunit. (2) An included unit of general local government which is part of an urbancounty shall be ineligible to apply for grants under Subpart F, or to bea recipient of assistance under Subpart I, during the entire period ofurban county qualification. (f) <T3>Failure of an urban county to receive a grant. </T3>Failure of an urbancounty to receive a grant during any year shall terminate the existingqualification of that urban county, and that county shall requalify asan urban county before receiving an entitlement grant in any successiveFederal fiscal year. Such termination shall release units of general localgovernment included in the urban county, in subsequent years, from theprohibition to receive grants under paragraphs (d)(3), (e)(1) and (e)(2)of this section. For this purpose an urban county shall be deemed to havereceived a grant upon having satisfied the requirements of sections 104(a), (b), (c), and (d) of the Act, without regard to adjustments whichmay be made to this grant amount under section 104(e) or 111 of the Act.(g) <T3>Notifications of the opportunity to be excluded. </T3>Any county seekingto qualify for an entitlement grant as an urban county for any Federalfiscal year shall notify each unit of general local government which islocated, in whole or in part, within the county and which would otherwisebe included in the urban county, but which is eligible to elect to haveits population excluded from that of the urban county, that it has theopportunity to make such an election, and that such an election, or thefailure to make such an election, shall be effective for the period forwhich the county qualifies as an urban county. These notifications shallbe made by a date specified by HUD. A unit of general local governmentwhich elects to be excluded from participation as a part of the urban countyshall notify the county and HUD in writing by a date specified by HUD.Such a unit of government may subsequently elect to participate in theurban county for the remaining one or two year period by notifying HUDand the county, in writing, of such election by a date specified by HUD.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.308</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Joint requests. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Joint requests and cooperation agreements. </T3>(1) Any urban countyand any metropolitan city located, in whole or in part, within that countymay submit a joint request to HUD to approve the inclusion of the metropolitancity as a part of the urban county for purposes of planning and implementinga joint community development and housing program. Such a joint requestshall only be considered if submitted at the time the county is seekinga three year qualification or requalification as an urban county. Sucha joint request shall, upon approval by HUD, remain effective for the periodfor which the county is qualified as an urban county. An urban county maybe joined by more than one metropolitan city, but a metropolitan city locatedin more than one urban county may only be included in one urban countyfor any program year. A joint request shall be deemed approved by HUD unlessHUD notifies the city and the county of its disapproval and the reasonstherefore within 30 days of receipt of the request by HUD. (2) Each metropolitan city and urban county submitting a joint requestshall submit an executed cooperation agreement to undertake or to assistin the undertaking of essential community development and housing assistanceactivities, as defined in andSection; 570.307(c). (b) <T3>Joint grant amount. </T3>The grant amount for a joint recipient shallbe the sum of the amounts authorized for the individual entitlement grantees,as described in section 106 of the Act. The urban county shall be the grantrecipient. (c) <T3>Effect of inclusion. </T3>Upon urban county qualification and HUD approvalof the joint request and cooperation agreement, the metropolitan city shallbe considered a part of the urban county for purposes of program planningand implementation for the period of the urban county qualification, andshall be treated the same as any other unit of general local governmentwhich is part of the urban county. (d) <T3>Submission requirements. </T3>In requesting a grant under this part,the urban county shall make a single submission which meets the submissionrequirements of this subpart and covers all members of the joint recipient.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Grant Administration </ITAG>5. Section 570.506 of Subpart J is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.506</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Records to be maintained. </ITAG>Each recipient shall establish and maintain sufficient records to enablethe Secretary to determine whether the recipient has met the requirementsof this part. At a minimum, the following records are needed: (a) Records providing a full description of each activity assisted (orbeing assisted) with CDBG funds, including its location (if the activityhas a geographical locus), the amount of CDBG funds budgeted, obligatedand expended for the activity, and the provision in Subpart C under whichit is eligible. (b) Records demonstrating that each activity undertaken meets one of thecriteria set forth in andSection; 570.208. (Where information on income byfamily size is required, the recipient may substitute evidence establishingthat the person assisted qualifies under another program having incomequalification criteria at least as restrictive as that used in the definitionof ``low and moderate income person'' at andSection; 570.3; or the recipientmay substitute a copy of a verifiable certification from the assisted personthat his or her family income does not exceed the applicable income limitestablished in accordance with andSection; 570.3; or the recipient may substitutea notice that the assisted person is a referral from a state, county orlocal employment agency or other entity that agrees to refer individualsit determines to be low and moderate income persons based on HUD's criteriaand agrees to maintain documentation supporting these determinations.)Such records shall include the following information: (1) For each activity determined to benefit low and moderate income persons,the income limits applied and the point in time when the benefit was determined.(2) For each activity determined to benefit low and moderate income personsbased on the area served by the activity: (i) The boundaries of the service area; (ii) The income characteristics of households in the service area; and(iii) If the percent of low and moderate income persons in the servicearea is less than 51 percent, data showing that the area qualifies underthe exception criteria set forth at andSection; 570.208(a)(1)(ii); (3) For each activity determined to benefit low and moderate income personsbecause the activity involves a facility or service designed for use bya limited clientele consisting exclusively or predominantly of low andmoderate income persons: (i) Documentation establishing that the facility or service is designedfor and used by senior citizens, handicapped persons, battered spouses,abused children, the homeless, illiterate persons, or migrant farm workers,for which the regulations provide presumptive benefit to low and moderateincome persons; or (ii) Documentation describing how the nature and, if applicable, the locationof the facility or service establishes that it is used predominantly bylow and moderate income persons; or (iii) Data showing the size and annual income of the family of each personreceiving the benefit. (4) For each activity carried out for the purpose of providing or improvinghousing which is determined to benefit low and moderate income persons:(i) A copy of a written agreement with each landlord or developer receivingCDBG assistance indicating the total number of dwelling units in each multifamilystructure assisted and the number of those units which will be occupiedby low and moderate income households after assistance; (ii) The total cost of the activity, including both CDBG and non-CDBG funds.(iii) For each unit occupied by a low and moderate income household, thesize and income of the household;(iv) For rental housing only: (A) The rent charged (or to be charged) after assistance for each dwellingunit in each structure assisted; and (B) Such information as necessary to show the affordability of units occupied(or to be occupied) by low and moderate income households pursuant to criteriaestablished and made public by the recipient; (v) For each property acquired on which there are no structures, evidenceof commitments ensuring that the criteria in andSection; 570.208(a)(3) willbe met when the structures are built; and (vi) Where applicable, records demonstrating that the activity qualifiesunder the special conditions at andSection; 570.208(a)(3)(i). (5) For each activity determined to benefit low and moderate income personsbased on the creation of jobs, the recipient shall provide the documentationdescribed in either paragraph (b)(5) (i) or (ii) of this section. (i) Where the recipient chooses to document that at least 51 percent ofthe jobs will be available to low and moderate income persons, documentationfor each assisted business shall include: (A) A copy of a written agreement containing: (<T3>1</T3>) A commitment by the business that it will make at least 51percent of the jobs available to low and moderate income persons and willprovide training for any of those jobs requiring special skills or education;(<T3>2</T3>) A listing by job title of the permanent jobs to be createdindicating which jobs will be available to low and moderate income persons,which jobs require special skills or education, and which jobs are part-time,if any; and (<T3>3</T3>) A description of actions to be taken by the recipient and businessto ensure that low and moderate income persons receive first considerationfor those jobs; and (B) A listing by job title of the permanent jobs filled, and which jobsof those were available to low and moderate income persons, and a descriptionof how first consideration was given to such persons for those jobs. Thedescription shall include what hiring process was used; which low and moderateincome persons were interviewed for a particular job; and which low andmoderate income persons were hired. (ii) Where the recipient chooses to document that at least 51 percent ofthe jobs will be held by low and moderate income persons, documentationfor each assisted business shall include: (A) A copy of a written agreement containing: (<T3>1</T3>) A commitment by the business that at least 51 percent of thejobs, on a full-time equivalent basis, will be held by low and moderateincome persons; and (<T3>2</T3>) A listing by job title of the permanent jobs to be created,identifying which are part-time, if any; (B) A listing by job title of the permanent jobs filled and which jobswere initially held by low and moderate income persons; and (C) For each such low and moderate income person hired, the size and annualincome of the person's family prior to the person being hired for the job.(6) For each activity determined to benefit low and moderate income personsbased on the retention of jobs: (i) Evidence that in the absence of CDBG assistance jobs would be lost;(ii) For each business assisted, a listing by job title of permanent jobsretained, indicating which of those jobs are part-time and (where it isknown) which are held by low and moderate income persons at the time theCDBG assistance is provided. Where applicable, identification of any ofthe retained jobs (other than those known to be held by low and moderateincome persons) which are projected to become available to low and moderateincome persons through job turnover within two years of the time CDBG assistanceis provided. Information upon which the job turnover projections were basedshall also be included in the record; (iii) For each retained job claimed to be held by a low and moderate incomeperson, information on the size and annual income of the person's family;(iv) For jobs claimed to be available to low and moderate income personsbased on job turnover, a description covering the items required for ``availableto'' jobs in paragraph (b)(5) of this section; and (v) Where jobs were claimed to be available to low and moderate incomepersons through turnover, a listing of each job which has turned over todate, indicating which of those jobs were either taken by, or availableto, low and moderate income persons. For jobs made available, a descriptionof how first consideration was given to such persons for those jobs shallalso be included in the record.(7) For each activity determined to aid in the prevention or eliminationof slums or blight based on addressing one or more of the conditions whichqualified an area as a slum or blighted area: (i) The boundaries of the area; and (ii) A description of the conditions which qualified the area at the timeof its designation in sufficient detail to demonstrate how the area metthe criteria in andSection; 570.208(b)(1). (8) For each residential rehabilitation activity determined to aid in theprevention or elimination of slums or blight in a slum or blighted area:(i) The local definition of ``substandard''; (ii) A pre-rehabilitation inspection report describing the deficienciesin each structure to be rehabilitated; and (iii) Details and scope of CDBG assisted rehabilitation, by structure.(9) For each activity determined to aid in the prevention or eliminationof slums or blight based on the elimination of specific conditions of blightor physical decay not located in a slum or blighted area: (i) A description of the specific condition of blight or physical decaytreated; and (ii) For rehabilitation carried out under this category, a descriptionof the specific conditions detrimental to public health and safety whichwere identified and the details and scope of the CDBG assisted rehabilitationby structure. (10) For each activity determined to aid in the prevention or eliminationof slums or blight based on addressing slums or blight in an urban renewalarea, a copy of the Urban Renewal Plan, as in effect at the time the activityis carried out, including maps and supporting documentation. (11) For each activity determined to meet a community development needhaving a particular urgency: (i) Documentation concerning the nature and degree of seriousness of thecondition requiring assistance; (ii) Evidence that the recipient certified that the CDBG activity was designedto address the urgent need; (iii) Information on the timing of the development of the serious condition;and (iv) Evidence confirming that other financial resources to alleviate theneed were not available. (c) Records which demonstrate that the recipient has made the determinationsrequired as a condition of eligibility of certain activities, as prescribedin andSection;andSection; 570.201(f), 570.201(i), 570.202(b)(3), 570.203(b),570.204(a), and 570.206(f). (d) Records which demonstrate compliance with andSection; 570.505 regardingany change of use of real property acquired or improved with CDBG assistance.(e) Records which demonstrate compliance with the citizen participationrequirements prescribed in section 104(a)(3) of the Act, and in andSection;andSection;570.301(b) and 570.305 for entitlement recipients or andSection; 570.431for HUD-administered small cities recipients. (f) Records which demonstrate compliance with the requirements in andSection;570.606 regarding acquisition, displacement, relocation, and replacementhousing. (g) Fair housing and equal opportunity records containing: (1) Documentation of the actions the recipient has carried out with itshousing and community development and other resources to remedy or ameliorateany conditions limiting fair housing choice in the recipient's community,and documentation of any other official actions the recipient has takenwhich demonstrate its support for fair housing, such as development ofa fair housing analysis described in andSection; 570.904(c). (2) Data on the extent to which each racial and ethnic group and single-headedhouseholds (by gender of household head) have applied for, participatedin, or benefited from, any program or activity funded in whole or in partwith CDBG funds. Such information shall be used only as a basis for furtherinvestigation as to compliance with nondiscrimination requirements. Norecipient is required to attain or maintain any particular statisticalmeasure by race, ethnicity, or gender in covered programs. (3) Data on employment in each of the recipient's operating units fundedin whole or in part with CDBG funds, with such data maintained in the categoriesprescribed on the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission's EEO-4 form;and documentation of any actions undertaken to assure equal employmentopportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, national origin,sex or handicap in operating units funded in whole or in part under thispart. (4) Data indicating the race and ethnicity of households (and gender ofsingle heads of households) displaced as a result of CDBG funded activities,together with the address and census tract of the housing units to whicheach displaced household relocated. Such information shall be used onlyas a basis for further investigation as to compliance with nondiscriminationrequirements. No recipient is required to attain or maintain any particularstatistical measure by race, ethnicity, or gender in covered programs.(5) Documentation of actions undertaken to meet the requirements of andSection;570.607(b) which implements section 3 of the Housing Development Act of1968, as amended (12 U.S.C. 1701U) relative to the hiring and trainingof lower income residents and the use of local businesses.(6) Data indicating the racial/ethnic character of each business entityreceiving a contract or subcontract of $25,000 or more paid, or to be paid,with CDBG funds, data indicating which of those entities are women's businessenterprises as defined in Executive Order 12138, the amount of the contractor subcontract, and documentation of recipient's affirmative steps to assurethat minority business and women's business enterprises have an equal opportunityto obtain or compete for contracts and subcontracts as sources of supplies,equipment, construction and services. Such affirmative steps may include,but are not limited to, technical assistance open to all businesses butdesigned to enhance opportunities for these enterprises and special outreachefforts to inform them of contract opportunities. Such steps shall notinclude preferring any business in the award of any contract or subcontractsolely or in part on the basis of race or gender. (7) Documentation of the affirmative action measures the recipient hastaken to overcome prior discrimination, where the courts or HUD have foundthat the recipient has previously discriminated against persons on theground of race, color, national origin or sex in administering a programor activity funded in whole or in part with CDBG funds. (h) Financial records, in accordance with the applicable requirements listedin andSection; 570.502. (i) Agreements and other records related to lump sum disbursements to privatefinancial institutions for financing rehabilitation as prescribed in andSection;570.513; and (j) Records required to be maintained in accordance with other applicablelaws and regulations set forth in Subpart K of this part.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under Control No.2506-0077)</ITAG>6. Section 570.507 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.507</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Reports. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Performance and evaluation report_</T3>(1) <T3>Content. </T3>Each performance and evaluation report must contain completedcopies of all forms and narratives prescribed by the Secretary, includinga summary of the citizen comments received on the report, as prescribedin (a)(3) of this section. (2) <T3>Timing_</T3>(i) <T3>Entitlement grants. </T3>Each entitlement grant recipient shall submita performance and evaluation report: (A) No later than 90 days after the completion of the most recent programyear showing the status of all activities as of the end of the programyear; (B) No later than October 31 each year showing housing assistance performanceas of the end of the Federal fiscal year; and (C) No later than 90 days after the criteria for grant closeout, as describedin andSection; 570.509(a), have been met. (ii) <T3>HUD-administered small cities grants. </T3>Each small cities recipientshall submit a performance and evaluation report on each grant: (A) No later than 12 months after the date of the grant award and annuallythereafter on the date of the award until completion of the activitiesfunded under the grant; and (B) No later than 90 days after the criteria for grant closeout, as describedin andSection; 570.509(a), have been met. If HUD determines that the previousreport adequately describes project results, HUD will notify the recipientthat a final report is not necessary. (3) <T3>Citizen comments on the report. </T3>Each recipient shall make copiesof the performance and evaluation report available to its citizens in sufficienttime to permit the citizens to comment on the report prior to its submissionto HUD. Each recipient may determine the specific manner and times thereport will be made available to citizens consistent with the precedingsentence. (b) <T3>Equal employment opportunity reports. </T3>Recipients of entitlementgrants or HUD-administered small cities grants shall submit to HUD eachyear a report (HUD/EEO-4) on recipient employment containing data as ofJune 30. (c) <T3>Minority business enterprise reports. </T3>Recipients of entitlementgrants, HUD-administered small cities grants or Urban Development ActionGrants shall submit to HUD, by April 30, a report on contracts and subcontractactivity during the first half of the fiscal year and by October 31 a reporton such activity during the second half of the year. (d) <T3>Other reports. </T3>Recipients may be required to submit such otherreports and information as HUD determines are necessary to carry out itsresponsibilities under the Act or other applicable laws.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under Control Nos.2506-0077 for paragraph (a) and 2529-0008 for paragraph (b) and 2506-0066for paragraph (c))</ITAG>7. Subpart K of Part 570 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart K_Other Program Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.600 General. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.601 Public Law 88-352 and Public Law 90-284; affirmatively furtheringfair housing; and Executive Order 11063. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.602 Section 109 of the Act. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.603 Labor standards. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.604 Environmental standards. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.605 National Flood Insurance Program. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.606 Relocation, displacement and acquisition. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.607 Employment and contracting opportunities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.608 Lead-based paint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.609 Use of debarred, suspended, or ineligible contractors or subrecipients.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.610 Uniform administrative requirements and cost principles. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.611 Conflict of interest. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.612 Executive Order 12372. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart K_Other Program Requirements  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.600</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) Section 104(b) of the Act provides that any grant under section 106of the Act shall be made only if the grantee certifies to the satisfactionof the Secretary, among other things, that the grant ``will be conductedand administered in conformity with Pub. L. 88-352 and Pub. L. 90-284,''and, further, that the grantee ``will comply with the other provisionsof this title and with other applicable laws.'' Section 104(e)(1) of theAct requires that the Secretary determine with respect to grants made pursuantto section 106(b) (Entitlement Grants) and 106(d)(2)(B) (HUD-administeredSmall Cities Grants), at least on an annual basis, among other things,``whether the grantee has carried out [its] certifications in compliancewith the requirements and the primary objectives of this title and withother applicable laws * * *.'' Certain other statutes are expressly madeapplicable to activities assisted under the Act by the Act itself, whileother laws not referred to in the Act may be applicable to such activitiesby their own terms. Certain statutes or Executive Orders which may be applicableto activities assisted under the Act by their own terms are administeredor enforced by governmental departments or agencies other than the Secretaryor the Department. This Subpart K enumerates laws which the Secretary willtreat as applicable to grants made under section 106 of the Act, otherthan grants to States made pursuant to section 106(d) of the Act, for purposesof the determinations described above to be made by the Secretary undersection 104(e)(1) of the Act, including statutes expressly made applicableby the Act and certain other statutes and Executive Orders for which theSecretary has enforcement responsibility. The absence of mention hereinof any other statute for which the Secretary does not have direct enforcementresponsibility is not intended to be taken as an indication that, in theSecretary's opinion, such statute or Executive Order is not applicableto activities assisted under the Act. For laws which the Secretary willtreat as applicable to grants made to States under section 106(d) of theAct for purposes of the determination required to be made by the Secretarypursuant to section 104(e)(2) of the Act, see andSection; 570.496. (b) This subpart also sets forth certain additional program requirementswhich the Secretary has determined to be applicable to grants providedunder the Act as a matter of administrative discretion. (c) In addition to grants made pursuant to section 106(b) and 106(d)(2)(B)of the Act (Subparts D and F, respectively), the requirements of this SubpartK are applicable to grants made pursuant to sections 107 and 119 of theAct (Subparts E and G, respectively), and to loans guaranteed pursuantto Subpart M. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.601</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Public Law 88-352 and Public Law 90-284; affirmatively furtheringfair housing; Executive Order 11063. </ITAG>Section 104(b) of the Act provides that any grant under section 106 ofthe Act shall be made only if the grantee certifies to the satisfactionof the Secretary that the grant ``will be conducted and administered inconformity with Pub. L. 88-352 and Pub. L. 90-284 and the grantee willaffirmatively further fair housing.'' Similarly, section 107 provides thatno grant may be made under that section (Secretary's Discretionary Fund)or section 119 (UDAG) without satisfactory assurances that the grantee'sprogram will be conducted and administered in conformity with Pub. L. 88-352and Pub. L. 90-284. (a) ``Pub. L. 88-352'' refers to title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964(42 U.S.C. 2000d <T3>et seq.</T3>), which provides that no person in the United States shallon the ground of race, color, or national origin, be excluded from participationin, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discrimination underany program or activity receiving Federal financial assistance. Section602 of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 directs each Federal department andagency empowered to extend Federal financial assistance to any programor activity by way of grant to effectuate the foregoing prohibition byissuing rules, regulations. or orders of general applicability which shallbe consistent with achievement of the statute authorizing the financialassistance. HUD regulations implementing the requirements of Title VI withrespect to HUD programs are contained in 24 CFR Part 1. (b) ``Pub. L. 90-284'' refers to title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of1968 (42 U.S.C. 3601 <T3>et seq.</T3>), popularly known as the Fair Housing Act, which providesthat it is the policy of the United States to provide, within constitutionallimitations, for fair housing throughout the United States and prohibitsany person from discriminating in the sale or rental of housing, the financingof housing, or the provision of brokerage services, including otherwisemaking unavailable or denying a dwelling to any person, because of race,color, religion, sex, or national origin. Title VIII further requires theSecretary to administer the programs and activities relating to housingand urban development in a manner affirmatively to further the policiesof Title VIII. Pursuant to this statutory direction, the Secretary requiresthat grantees administer all programs and activities related to housingand community development in a manner to affirmatively further the policiesof Title VIII; furthermore, section 104(b)(2) of the Act requires thateach grantee receiving funds under section 106 of the Act (entitlementor small cities grantees) certify to the satisfaction of the Secretarythat it will affirmatively further fair housing. (c) Executive Order 11063, as amended by Executive Order 12259, directsthe Department to take all action necessary and appropriate to preventdiscrimination because of race, color, religion (creed), sex, or nationalorigin, in the sale, leasing, rental, or other disposition of residentialproperty and related facilities (including land to be developed for residentialuse), or in the use or occupancy thereof, if such property and relatedfacilities are, among other things, provided in whole or in part with theaid of loans, advances, grants, or contributions agreed to be made by theFederal Government. HUD regulations implementing Executive Order 11063are contained in 24 CFR Part 107. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.602</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Section 109 of the Act. </ITAG>(a) Section 109 of the Act requires that no person in the United Statesshall on the ground of race, color, national origin or sex, be excludedfrom participation in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to discriminationunder, any program or activity funded in whole or in part with communitydevelopment funds made available pursuant to the Act. For purposes of thissection ``program or activity'' is defined as any function conducted byan identifiable administrative unit of the recipient, or by any unit ofgovernment, subrecipient, or private contractor receiving community developmentfunds or loans from the recipient. ``Funded in whole or in part with communitydevelopment funds'' means that community development funds in any amountin the form of grants or proceeds from HUD guaranteed loans have been transferredby the recipient or a subrecipient to an identifiable administrative unitand disbursed in a program or activity. In subsection (b) of this section,``recipient'' means recipient as defined in 24 CFR 1.2(f). (b) Specific discriminatory actions prohibited and corrective actions.(1) A recipient may not, under any program or activity to which the regulationsof this part may apply, directly or through contractual or other arrangements,on the ground of race, color, national origin, or sex:(i) Deny any individual any facilities, services, financial aid or otherbenefits provided under the program or activity. (ii) Provide any facilities, services, financial aid or other benefitswhich are different, or are provided in a different form, from that providedto others under the program or activity. (iii) Subject an individual to segregated or separate treatment in anyfacility in, or in any matter of process related to receipt of any serviceor benefit under the program or activity. (iv) Restrict an individual in any way in access to, or in the enjoymentof, any advantage or privilege enjoyed by others in connection with facilities,services, financial aid or other benefits under the program or activity.(v) Treat an individual differently from others in determining whetherthe individual satisfies any admission, enrollment, eligibility, membership,or other requirement or condition which the individual must meet in orderto be provided any facilities, services or other benefit provided underthe program or activity. (vi) Deny an individual an opportunity to participate in a program or activityas an employee. (2) A recipient may not use criteria or methods of administration whichhave the effect of subjecting persons to discrimination on the basis ofrace, color, national origin, or sex, or have the effect of defeating orsubstantially impairing accomplishment of the objectives of the programor activity with respect to persons of a particular race, color, nationalorigin, or sex. (3) A recipient, in determining the site or location of housing or facilitiesprovided in whole or in part with funds under this part, may not make selectionsof such site or location which have the effect of excluding persons from,denying them the benefits of, or subjecting them to discrimination on theground of race, color, national origin, or sex; or which have the purposeor effect of defeating or substantially impairing the accomplishment ofthe objectives of the Act and of this section. (4)(i) In administering a program or activity funded in whole or in partwith CDBG funds regarding which the recipient has previously discriminatedagainst persons on the ground of race, color, national origin or sex, orif there is sufficient evidence to conclude that such discrimination existed,the recipient must take remedial affirmative action to overcome the effectsof prior discrimination. The word ``previously'' does not exclude currentdiscriminatory practices. (ii) In the absence of discrimination, a recipient, in administering aprogram or activity funded in whole or in part with funds made availableunder this part, may take any nondiscriminatory affirmative action necessaryto ensure that the program or activity is open to all without regard torace, color, national origin or sex. (iii) After a finding of noncompliance or after a recipient has a firmbasis to conclude that discrimination has occurred, a recipient shall notbe prohibited by this section from taking any action eligible under SubpartC to ameliorate an imbalance in services or facilities provided to anygeographic area or specific group of persons within its jurisdiction, wherethe purpose of such action is to remedy prior discriminatory practice orusage. (5) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, nothing containedherein shall be construed to prohibit any recipient from maintaining orconstructing separate living facilities or rest room facilities for thedifferent sexes. Furthermore, selectivity on the basis of sex is not prohibitedwhen institutional or custodial services can properly be performed onlyby a member of the same sex as the recipients of the services. (c) Section 109 of the Act further provides that any prohibition againstdiscrimination on the basis of age under the Age Discrimination Act of1975 (42 U.S.C. 6101 <T3>et seq.</T3>) or with respect to an otherwise qualified handicappedperson as provided in section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29U.S.C. 794) shall also apply to any program or activity funded in wholeor in part with funds made available pursuant to the Act. HUD regulationsimplementing the Age Discrimination Act are contained in 24 CFR Part 146and the regulations implementing section 504 are contained in 24 CFR Part8. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.603</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Labor standards. </ITAG>Section 110 of the Act requires that all laborers and mechanics employedby contractors or subcontractors on construction work financed in wholeor in part with assistance received under the Act shall be paid wages atrates not less than those prevailing on similar construction in the localityas determined by the Secretary of Labor in accordance with the Davis-BaconAct, as amended (40 U.S.C. 276a-276a-5). By reason of the foregoing requirement,the Contract Work Hours and Safety Standards Act (40 U.S.C. 327 <T3>et seq.</T3>) also applies. However, these requirements apply to therehabilitation of residential property only if such property contains notless than 8 units. With respect to the labor standards specified in thissection, the Secretary of Labor has the authority and functions set forthin Reorganization Plan Number 14 of 1950 (5 U.S.C. 1332-15) and section2 of the Act of June 13, 1934, as amended (40 U.S.C. 276c).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.604 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental standards. </ITAG>Section 104(g) expresses the intent that ``the policies of the NationalEnvironmental Policy Act of 1969 and other provisions of law which furtherthe purposes of such Act (as specified in regulations issued by the Secretary)* * * [be] most effectively implemented in connection with the expenditureof funds under'' the Act. Such other provisions of law which further thepurposes of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 are specifiedin regulations issued pursuant to section 104(g) of the Act and containedin 24 CFR Part 58. Section 104(g) also provides that, in lieu of the environmentalprotection procedures otherwise applicable, the Secretary may under regulationsprovide for the release of funds for particular projects to grantees whoassume all of the responsibilities for environmental review, decisionmaking,and action pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, andthe other provisions of law specified by the Secretary as described above,that would apply to the Secretary were he/she to undertake such projectsas Federal projects. Grantees assume such environmental review, decisionmaking,and action responsibilities by execution of grant agreements with the Secretary.The procedures for carrying out such environmental responsibilities arecontained in 24 CFR Part 58. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.605 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">National Flood Insurance Program. </ITAG>Section 202(a) of the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 (42 U.S.C.4106) provides that no Federal officer or agency shall approve any financialassistance for acquisition or construction purposes (as defined under section3(a) of said Act (42 U.S.C. 400(a)), one year after a community has beenformally notified of its identification as a community containing an areaof special flood hazard, for use in any area that has been identified bythe Director of the Federal Emergency Management Agency as an area havingspecial flood hazards unless the community in which such area is situatedis then participating in the National Flood Insurance Program. Notwithstandingthe date of HUD approval of the recipient's application (or, in the caseof grants made under Subpart D, the date of submission of the grantee'sfinal statement pursuant to andSection; 570.302), funds provided under thispart shall not be expended for acquisition or construction purposes inan area that has been identified by the Federal Emergency Management Agency(FEMA) as having special flood hazards unless the community in which thearea is situated is participating in the National Flood Insurance Programin accordance with 44 CFR Parts 59-79, or less than a year has passed sinceFEMA notification to the community regarding such hazards; and flood insuranceis obtained in accordance with section 102(a) of the Flood Disaster ProtectionAct of 1973 (42 U.S.C. 4001). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.606 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relocation, displacement and acquisition. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Uniform Relocation Act. </T3>(1) The Uniform Relocation Assistanceand Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (URA) (42 U.S.C. 4601)and HUD implementing regulations at 24 CFR Part 42 apply to the acquisitionof real property by a State agency for an activity assisted under thispart and to the displacement of any family, individual, business, nonprofitorganization or farm that results from such acquisition. The grantee'scertification of compliance with the URA is required in the grant agreement.(2) An acquisition and resulting displacement by a State agency is ``foran assisted activity'' if it occurs on or after the date of the initialsubmission of a final statement under 24 CFR 570.302(a)(2) (EntitlementGrants); the initial submission of an application to HUD by a unit of generallocal government under andSection;andSection; 570.426, 570.430, or 570.435(d)that is granted for the requested activity (HUD administered Small CitiesProgram); or the submission of an application to HUD by a city or urbancounty under andSection; 570.458 that is granted for the requested activity(UDAG). However, an acquisition or displacement that occurs on or afterthe described date is not subject to the URA if the grantee determinesthat the acquisition or displacement was not carried out for an assistedactivity, and the HUD Field Office concurs in that determination. An acquisitionor displacement that occurs before the described date is subject to theURA, if the grantee or the HUD Field Office determines that the acquisitionor displacement was carried out for the assisted activity. The granteemay, at any time, request a HUD determination whether an acquisition ordisplacement will be considered to be for an assisted activity and thussubject to these regulations. To be eligible for relocation assistance,however, a person must also meet the eligibility criteria in 24 CFR Part42. (b) <T3>Residential antidisplacement and relocation assistance plan. </T3>Undersection 104(d) of the Act, each grantee must adopt, make public and certifythat it is following a residential antidisplacement and relocation assistanceplan providing one-for-one replacement units (paragraph (b)(1) of thissection), and relocation assistance (paragraph (b)(2) of this section).The plan must also indicate the steps that will be taken consistent withother goals and objectives of this part to minimize the displacement ofpersons from their homes as a result of any activities assisted under thispart. (1) <T3>One-for-one replacement units. </T3>(i) All occupied and vacant occupiablelow/moderate-income dwelling units that are demolished or converted toa use other than as low/moderate-income dwelling units as a direct resultof an activity assisted under this part must be replaced by governmentalagencies or private developers with low/moderate-income dwelling units.Replacement low/moderate-income dwelling units may include public housing,or existing housing receiving Section 8 project-based assistance underthe United States Housing Act of 1937. The replacement low/moderate-incomedwelling units must be provided within three years of the commencementof the demolition or rehabilitation related to the conversion, and mustmeet the following requirements: (A) The units must be located within the grantee's jurisdiction. (B) The units must be sufficient in number and size to house at least thenumber of occupants that could have been housed in the units that are demolishedor converted. The number of occupants that may be housed in units shallbe determined in accordance with local housing occupancy codes. (C) The units must be provided in standard condition. Replacement low/moderate-incomedwelling units may include units that have been raised to standard fromsubstandard condition. (D) The units must be designed to remain low/moderate-income dwelling unitsfor at least 10 years from the date of initial occupancy. (ii) Before obligating or expending funds provided under this part forany activity that will directly result in the demolition of low/moderate-incomedwelling units or the conversion of low/moderate-income dwelling unitsto another use, the grantee must make public, and submit the followinginformation in writing to HUD:(A) A description of the proposed assisted activity; (B) The general location on a map and approximate number of dwelling unitsby size (number of bedrooms) that will be demolished or converted to ause other than for low/moderate-income dwelling units as a direct resultof the assisted activity; (C) A time schedule for the commencement and completion of the demolitionor conversion; (D) The general location on a map and approximate number of dwelling unitsby size (number of bedrooms) that will be provided as replacement dwellingunits; (E) The source of funding and a time schedule for the provision of replacementdwelling units; (F) The basis for concluding that each replacement dwelling unit will remaina low/moderate-income dwelling unit for at least 10 years from the dateof initial occupancy. (iii)(A) The requirements of paragraph (b)(1) of this section do not applyif the HUD Field Office determines, based upon objective data, that thereis an adequate supply of vacant low/moderate-income dwelling units in standardcondition available on a nondiscriminatory basis within the grantee's jurisdiction.In making this determination, the HUD Field Office will consider the housingvacancy rate for the jurisdiction, the number of vacant low/moderate-incomedwelling units in the jurisdiction (excluding units that will be demolishedor converted) and the number of eligible families on waiting lists forhousing assisted under the United States Housing Act of 1937 in the jurisdiction.(B) The HUD Field Office may consider the supply of vacant low/moderate-incomedwelling units in a standard condition available on a nondiscriminatorybasis in an area that is larger than the grantee's jurisdiction. Such additionaldwelling units shall be considered if the HUD Field Office determines thatthe units would be suitable to serve the needs of the low-and moderateincome households that could be served by the low/moderate-income dwellingunits that are to be demolished or converted to another use. The HUD FieldOffice must base this determination on geographic and demographic factors,such as location and access to places of employment and to other facilities.(C) The grantee must submit a request for a determination under paragraph(b)(1)(iii) of this section directly to the HUD Field Office. (2) <T3>Relocation assistance.</T3> (i) Each low- or moderate-income householdthat is displaced by demolition or by the conversion of a low/moderateincome dwelling unit to another use as a direct result of an activity assistedunder this part shall be provided with relocation assistance. The low-or moderate-income household may elect to receive relocation assistancedescribed at 24 CFR Part 42 (HUD's regulations implementing the URA), ormay elect to receive the following relocation assistance:(A) The relocation assistance described at 24 CFR Part 42, Subpart C (GeneralRelocation Requirements) and Subpart D (Payment for Moving and RelatedExpenses). Relocation notices must be issued consistent with, and in themanner prescribed under, 24 CFR 42.203. The definition of ``comparablereplacement dwelling'' used in 24 CFR Part 42 is modified as describedin paragraph (b)(3)(i) of this section. Displaced households provided withreplacement housing assistance under paragraph (b)(2)(i)(C) of this section,in the form of a certificate or housing voucher under Section 8 of theUnited States Housing Act of 1937, must be provided referrals to comparablereplacement dwelling units whose owners are willing to participate in thehousing voucher or certificate program. The grantee shall advise tenantsof their rights under the Federal Fair Housing Law (Title VIII) and ofreplacement housing opportunities in such a manner that, whenever feasible,they will have a choice between relocating within their neighborhoods andother neighborhoods consistent with the grantee's responsibility to affirmativelyfurther fair housing;(B) The reasonable and necessary cost of any security deposit requiredto rent the replacement dwelling unit, and credit checks required to rentor purchase the replacement dwelling unit; and (C) Replacement housing assistance. Households are eligible to receiveone of the following forms of replacement housing assistance:(1) Each household must be offered compensation designed to ensure that,for a five-year period, the displaced household will not bear, after relocation,a ratio of shelter costs to income that exceeds 30 percent. Such compensationshall be either:(<T3>i</T3>) A certificate or housing voucher for rental assistance providedthrough the local Public Housing Agency under Section 8 of the United StateHousing Act of 1937; or(<T3>ii</T3>) Cash rental assistance equal to 60 times the amount that isobtained by subtracting 30 percent of the displaced household's monthlygross income (with such adjustments as the grantee may deem appropriate)from the lesser of: the monthly cost of rent and utilities at a comparablereplacement dwelling unit or the monthly cost of rent and utilities atthe decent, safe and sanitary replacement dwelling to which the householdrelocates. The grantee may provide the cash payment in either a lump sumor in installments. The grantee may at its discretion offer the householda choice between the certificate/housing voucher or cash rental assistance.(<T3>2</T3>) If the household purchases an interest in a housing cooperativeor mutual housing association and occupies a decent, safe and sanitaryunit in the cooperative or association, the household may elect to receivea lump sum payment. This lump sum payment shall be equal to the capitalizedvalue of 60 monthly installments of the amount that is obtained by subtracting30 percent of the displaced household's monthly gross income (with suchadjustments as the grantee may deem appropriate) from the monthly costof rent and utilities at a comparable replacement dwelling unit. To computethe capitilized value, the installments shall be discounted at the rateof interest paid on passbook savings deposits by a federally-insured bankor savings and loan institution conducting business within the grantee'sjurisdiction. To the extent necessary to minimize hardship to the household,the grantee shall, subject to appropriate safeguards, issue a payment inadvance of the purchase of the interest in the housing cooperative or mutualhousing association.(ii) Eligibility for relocation assistance. (A) A low- or moderate-incomehousehold that is required to move as a direct result of demolition orconversion of a low/moderate income dwelling unit to another use, is eligiblefor relocation assistance under paragraph (b)(2) of this section if:(<T3>1</T3>) The household is required to move from the dwelling unit onor after the date that the owner submits a request to the grantee for financialassistance that is later approved for the requested activity. (This appliesto dwelling units owned by a person other than a Federal or State agency,as defined under the URA).(<T3>2</T3>) The household is required to move from the dwelling unit onor after the date of the initial submission of a final statement under24 CFR 570.302(a)(2) (Entitlement Grants); the initial submission of anapplication to HUD by a unit of general local government under andSection;andSection;570.426, 570.430, or 570.435(d) this is granted for the requested activity(HUD administered Small Cities Program); or the submission of an applicationto HUD by a city or urban county under andSection; 570.458 that is grantedfor the requested activity (UDAG). (This applies to dwelling units ownedby a Federal or State agency as defined under the URA.)(B) If the displacement occurs on or after the appropriate date describedin paragraph (b)(2)(ii)(A) of this section, the low- or moderate-incomehousehold is not eligible for relocation assistance if:(<T3>1</T3>) The household is evicted for cause;(<T3>2</T3>) The household moved into the property on or after the datedescribed in paragraph (b)(2)(ii)(A) of this section, after receiving writtennotice of the expected displacement; or(<T3>3</T3>) The grantee determines that the displacement was not a directresult of the assisted activity, and the HUD office concurs in that determination.(C) If the displacement occurs before the appropriate date described inparagraph (b)(2)(ii)(A) of this section, the low- or moderate-income householdis eligible for relocation assistance if the grantee or HUD determinesthat the displacement was a direct result of an activity assisted underthis part.(3) <T3>Definitions</T3>. For the purposes of paragraph (b) of this section:(i) ``Comparable replacement dwelling unit'' means a dwelling unit that:(A) Meets the criteria of 24 CFR 42.2(c) (1) through (4); and(B) Is available at a monthly cost for rent plus estimated average monthlyutility costs that does not exceed 30 percent of the household's averagegross monthly income (with such adjustments to income as the grantee maydeem appropriate) after taking into account any rental assistance the householdwould receive. Where a certificate or housing voucher is provided to ahousehold under paragraph (b)(2)(i)(C) (<T3>1</T3>)(<T3>i</T3>) of this section, the dwelling unit must be available to thehousehold at a monthly cost for rent and estimated average monthly utilitycost that does not exceed the Fair Market Rent or the payment standard,respectively.(ii) ``Decent, safe and sanitary dwelling'' means a decent, safe and sanitarydwelling as defined in 24 CFR 42.2(e).(iii) ``Low/moderate income dwelling unit'' means a dwelling unit witha market rental (including utility costs) that does not exceed the applicableFair Market Rent (FMR) for existing housing and moderate rehabilitationestablished under 24 CFR Part 888.(iv) ``Occupiable dwelling unit'' means a dwelling unit that is in a standardcondition, or is in a substandard condition, but is suitable for rehabilitation.(v) ``Standard condition'' and ``substandard condition suitable for rehabilitation.''If the grantee has a HUD-approved Housing Assistance Plan, the definitionsof ``standard condition'' and ``substandard condition suitable for rehabilitation''established in the plan will apply. If the grantee does not have a HUD-approvedHousing Assistance Plan, the grantee must establish and make public itsdefinition of these terms consistent with the requirements of andSection;570.306(e)(1).(4) <T3>Effective date</T3>. For all grants except those made under SubpartD of this part (Entitlement Grants), the provisions of paragraph (b) ofthis section are applicable to grants made on or after October 1, 1988.For grants made under Subpart D, these provisions will govern all activitiesfor which funds are first obligated by the grantee on or after the datethe first grant is made after September 30, 1988, without regard to thesource year of the funds used for the activity.(c) <T3>Section 104(k) relocation requirements</T3>. Section 104(k) of theAct requires that reasonable relocation assistance be provided to persons(families, individuals, businesses, nonprofit organizations, or farms)displaced (<T3>i.e.</T3>, moved permanently and involuntarily) as a result of theuse of assistance received under this part to acquire or substantiallyrehabilitate property. If such displacement is subject to paragraph (a)or (b) of this section, above, this paragraph does not apply. The granteemust develop, adopt and provide to persons to be displaced a written noticeof the relocation assistance for which they are eligible. The minimum requirementsfor such assistance under the UDAG Program are described at andSection; 570.457(b).Under CDBG programs, persons entitled to assistance under this paragraphmust be provided relocation assistance, including at a minimum: (1) Reasonable moving expenses;(2) Advisory services needed to help in relocating. The grantee shall advisetenants of their rights under the Federal Fair Housing Law (Title VIII)and of replacement housing opportunities in such a manner that, wheneverfeasible, they will have a choice between relocating within their neighborhoodsand other neighborhoods consistent with the grantee's responsibility toaffirmatively further fair housing; and(3) Financial assistance sufficient to enable any person displaced fromhis or her dwelling to lease and occupy a suitable, decent, safe and sanitaryreplacement dwelling where the cost of rent and utilities does not exceed30 percent of the household's gross income.(d) <T3>Optional relocation assistance</T3>. Under section 105(a)(11) of theAct, the grantee may provide relocation payments and other relocation assistancefor individuals, families, businesses, nonprofit organizations and farmsdisplaced by an activity not subject to paragraphs (a), (b) or (c) of thissection. The grantee may also provide relocation assistance to personscovered under paragraphs (a), (b) or (c) of this section beyond that required.Unless such assistance is provided pursuant to State or local law, thegrantee must provide the assistance only upon the basis of a written determinationthat the assistance is appropriate (see 24 CFR 570.201(i)) and must adopta written policy available to the public that describes the relocationassistance that the grantee has elected to provide and that provides forequal relocation assistance within each class of displacees.(e) <T3>Appeals</T3>. If a person disagrees with the grantee's determinationconcerning the person's eligibility for, or the amount of a relocationpayment under this section, the person may file a written appeal of thatdetermination with the grantee. The appeal procedures to be followed aredescribed in 24 CFR 42.10. A low- or moderate-income household that hasbeen displaced from a dwelling may file a written request for review ofthe grantee decision, to the HUD Field Office.(f) <T3>Responsibility of grantee</T3>. (1) The grantee is responsible forensuring compliance with the requirements of this section, notwithstandingany third party's contractual obligation to the grantee to comply withthe provisions of this part.(2) The cost of assistance required under this section may be paid fromlocal public funds, funds provided under this part, or funds availablefrom other sources.(3) The grantee must maintain records in sufficient detail to demonstratecompliance with the provisions of this section.(g) <T3>Displacement</T3>. For the purposes of this section, a ``displacedperson'' is a person that is required to move permanently and involuntarilyand includes a residential tenant who moves from the real property if:(1) The tenant has not been provided with a reasonable opportunity to leaseand occupy a suitable, decent, safe and sanitary dwelling in the same buildingor in a nearby building on the real property following the completion ofthe assisted activity at a monthly rent and estimated average cost forutilities that does not exceed the greater of:(i) 30 percent of the tenant household's average monthly gross income;or(ii) The tenant's monthly rent and average cost for utilities before:(A) The date that the owner submits a request to the grantee for financialassistance that is later approved for the requested activity. (This appliesto dwelling units owned by a person other than a Federal or State agency,as defined under the URA); or(B) The date of the initial submission of a final statement under andSection;570.302(a)(2) (Entitlement Grants); the initial submission of an applicationto HUD by a unit of general local government under andSection; 570.426, 570.430,or 570.435(d) that is granted for the requested activity (HUD administeredSmall Cities Program); or the submission of an application to HUD by acity or urban county under andSection; 570.458 that is granted for the requestedactivity (UDAG). (This applies to dwelling units owned by a Federal orState agency as defined under the URA); or(2) The tenant is required to move to another dwelling in the real propertybut is not reimbursed for all actual reasonable out-of-pocket costs incurredin connection with the move; or(3) The tenant is required to relocate temporarily and:(i) Is not reimbursed for all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurredin connection with the temporary relocation, including moving costs andany increased rent and utility costs; or(ii) Other conditions of the temporary relocation are not reasonable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.607 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Employment and contracting opportunities.</ITAG>(a) Grantees shall comply with Executive Order 11246, as amended by ExecutiveOrder 12086, and the regulations issued pursuant thereto (41 CFR Chapter60) which provide that no person shall be discriminated against on thebasis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin in all phases ofemployment during the performance of Federal or federally assisted constructioncontracts. As specified in Executive Order 11246 and the implementing regulations,contractors and subcontractors on Federal or federally assisted constructioncontracts shall take affirmative action to ensure fair treatment in employment,upgrading, demotion or transfer, recruitment or recruitment advertising,layoff or termination, rates of pay, or other forms of compensation andselection for training and apprenticeship.(b) Section 3 of the Housing and Urban Development Act of 1968 (12 U.S.C.1701u) requires, in conneciton with the planning and carrying out of anyproject assisted under the Act, that to the greatest extent feasible opportunitiesfor training and employment be given to low and moderate income personsresiding within the unit of local government or the metropolitan area (ornonmetropolitan county) as determined by the Secretary, in which the projectis located, and that contracts for work in connection with the projectbe awarded to eligible business concerns which are located in, or ownedin substantial part by persons residing in the same metropolitan area (ornonmetropolitan county) as the project. Grantees shall adopt appropriateprocedures and requirements to assure good faith efforts toward compliancewith the statutory directive. HUD regulations at 24 CFR Part 135 are notapplicable to activities assisted under this part but may be referred toas guidance indicative of the Secretary's view of the statutory objectivesin other contexts.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.608 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lead-based paint. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Prohibition against the use of lead-based paint. </T3>Section 401(b)of the Lead-Based Paint Poisoning Prevention Act (42 U.S.C. 4831(b)) directsthe Secretary to prohibit the use of lead-based paint in residential structuresconstructed or rehabilitated with Federal assistance. Such prohibitionsare contained in 24 CFR Part 35, Subpart B, and are applicable to residentialstructures constructed or rehabilitated with assistance provided underthis part. (b) <T3>Notification of hazards of lead-based paint poisoning. </T3>(1) TheSecretary has promulgated requirements regarding notification to purchasersand tenants of HUD-associated housing constructed prior to 1978 of thehazards of lead-based paint poisoning at 24 CFR Part 35, Subpart A. Thisparagraph is promulgated pursuant to the authorization granted in 24 CFR35.5(c) and supersedes, with respect to all housing to which it applies,the notification requirements prescribed by Subpart A of 24 CFR Part 35.(2) For properties constructed prior to 1978, applicants for rehabilitationassistance provided under this part and tenants or purchasers of propertiesowned by the grantee or its subrecipient and acquired or rehabilitatedwith assistance provided under this part shall be notified: (i) That the property may contain lead-based paint; (ii) Of the hazards of lead-based paint; (iii) Of the symptoms and treatment of lead-based poisoning; (iv) Of the precautions to be taken to avoid lead-based paint poisoning(including maintenance and removal techniques for eliminating such hazards);(v) Of the advisability and availability of blood lead level screeningfor children under seven years of age; and (vi) That in the event lead-based paint is found on the property, appropriateabatement procedures may be undertaken. (c) <T3>Elimination of lead-based paint hazards. </T3>The purpose of this paragraphis to implement the provisions of section 302 of the Lead-Based Paint PoisoningPrevention Act, 42 U.S.C. 4822, by establishing procedures to eliminateas far as practicable the hazards due to the presence of paint which maycontain lead and to which children under seven years of age may be exposedin existing housing which is rehabilitated with assistance provided underthis part. The Secretary has promulgated requirements regarding the eliminationof lead-based paint hazards in HUD-associated housing at 24 CFR Part 35,Subpart C. This paragraph is promulgated pursuant to the authorizationgranted in 24 CFR 35.24(b)(4) and supersedes, with respect to all housingto which it applies, the requirements prescribed by Subpart C of 24 CFRPart 35. These requirements shall be implemented not later than September21, 1987. (1) <T3>Applicability. </T3>This paragraph applies to the rehabilitation ofapplicable surfaces in existing housing which is assisted under this part.The following activities assisted under the Community Development BlockGrant program are not covered by this paragraph: (i) Emergency repairs (not including lead-based paint-related emergencyrepairs); (ii) Weatherization; (iii) Water or sewer hook-ups; (iv) Installation of security devices; (v) Facilitation of tax exempt bond issuances which provide funds for rehabilitation;(vi) Other similar types of single-purpose programs that do not includephysical repairs or remodeling of applicable surfaces (as defined in 24CFR 35.22) of residential structures; and (vii) Any non-single purpose rehabilitation that does not involve applicablesurfaces (as defined in 24 CFR 35.22) that does not exceed $3,000 per unit.(2) <T3>Definitions. </T3>``Applicable surface.'' All intact and nonintact interior and exteriorpainted surfaces of a residential structure. ``Chewable surface.'' All chewable protruding painted surfaces up to fivefeet from the floor or ground, which are readily accessible to childrenunder seven years of age, e.g., protruding corners, windowsills and frames,doors and frames, and other protruding woodwork. ``Defective paint surface. Paint on applicable surfaces that is cracking,scaling, chipping, peeling or loose. ``Elevated blood lead level or EBL.'' Excessive absorption of lead, thatis, a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood of 25 m/dl (microgramsof lead per deciliter of whole blood) or greater. ``Lead-based paint surface.'' A paint surface, whether or not defective,identified as having a lead content greater than or equal to 1 mg/cm2.(3) <T3>Inspection and Testing_</T3>(i) <T3>Defective paint surfaces. </T3>The grantee shall inspect for defectivepaint surfaces in all units constructed prior to 1978 which are occupiedby families with children under seven years of age and which are proposedfor rehabilitation assistance. The inspection shall occur at the same timethe property is being inspected for rehabilitation. Defective paint conditionswill be included in the work write-up for the remainder of the rehabilitationwork.  (ii) <T3>Chewable surfaces.</T3> The grantee shall be required to test the leadcontent of chewable surfaces if the family residing in a unit, constructedprior to 1978 and receiving rehabilitation assistance, includes a childunder seven years of age with an identified EBL condition. Lead contentshall be tested by using an X-ray fluorescence analyzer (XRF) or othermethod approved by HUD. Test readings of 1 mg/cm2 or higher using an XRFshall be considered positive for presence of lead-based paint. (iii) <T3>Abatement without testing.</T3> In lieu of the procedures set forthin paragraph (c)(3)(ii) of this section, in the case of a residential structureconstructed prior to 1978, the grantee may forgo testing and abate allapplicable surfaces in accordance with the methods set out in 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii).(4) <T3>Abatement Actions.</T3> (i) For inspections performed under andSection;570.608(c)(3)(i)and where defective paint surfaces are found, treatment shall be providedto defective areas. Treatment shall be performed before final inspectionand approval of the work. (ii) For testing performed under andSection;570.608(c)(3)(ii) and where interiorchewable surfaces are found to contain lead-based paint, all interior chewablesurfaces in any affected room shall be treated. Where exterior chewablesurfaces are found to contain lead-based paint, the entire exterior chewablesurface shall be treated. Treatment shall be performed before final inspectionand approval of the work. (iii) When weather prohibits repainting exterior surfaces before finalinspection, the grantee may permit the owner to abate the defective paintor chewable lead-based paint as required by this section and agree to repaintby a specified date. A separate inspection is required. (5) <T3>Abatement methods.</T3> At a minimum, treatment of the defective areasand chewable lead-based paint surfaces shall consist of covering or removalof the painted surface as described in 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii). (6) <T3>Funding for inspection, testing and abatement.</T3> Program requirementsand local program design will determine whether the cost of inspection,testing or abatement is to be borne by the owner/developer, the granteeor a combination of the owner/developer and the grantee. (7) <T3>Tenant protection.</T3> The owner/developer shall take appropriateaction to protect tenants from hazards associated with abatement procedures.Where necessary, these actions may include the temporary relocation oftenants during the abatement process. The owner/developer shall notifythe grantee of all such actions taken. (8) <T3>Records.</T3> The grantee shall keep a copy of each inspection and/ortest report for at least three years. (9) <T3>Monitoring and enforcement.</T3> HUD field office monitoring of rehabilitationprograms includes reviews for compliance with applicable program requirementsfor lead-based paint. The CPD Field Monitoring Handbook which currentlyincludes instructions for monitoring lead-based paint requirements willbe amended as appropriate. In cases of noncompliance, HUD may impose conditionsor sanctions on grantees to encourage prompt compliance. (10) <T3>Compliance with other program requirements, Federal, State and locallaws</T3>. (i) <T3>Other program requirements.</T3> To the extent that assistance fromany of the programs covered by this section is used in conjunction withother HUD program assistance which have lead-based paint requirements whichmay have more or less stringent requirements, the more stringent requirementswill prevail. (ii) <T3>HUD responsibility.</T3> If HUD determines that a State or local law,ordinance, code or regulation provides for lead-based paint testing orhazard abatement in a manner which provides a level of protection fromthe hazards of lead-based paint poisoning at least comparable to that providedby the requirements of this section and that adherence to the requirementsof this subpart would be duplicative or otherwise cause inefficiencies,HUD may modify or waive the requirements of this section in such manneras may be appropriate to promote efficiency while ensuring such comparablelevel of protection. (iii) <T3>Grantee responsibility.</T3> Nothing in this section is intended torelieve any grantee in the programs covered by this section of any responsibilityfor compliance with State or local laws, ordinances, codes or regulationsgoverning lead-based paint testing or hazard abatement. (iv) <T3>Disposal of lead-based paint debris.</T3> Lead-based paint and defectivepaint debris shall be disposed of in accordance with applicable Federal,State or local requirements. (See e.g., 40 CFR Parts 260 through 271.)<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.609 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Use of debarred, suspended or ineligible contractors or subrecipients.</ITAG>Assistance under this part shall not be used directly or indirectly toemploy, award contracts to, or otherwise engage the service of, or fundany contractor or subrecipient during any period of debarment, suspension,or placement in ineligibility status under the provisions of 24 CFR Part24. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.610 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Uniform administrative requirements. </ITAG>The recipient, its agencies or instrumentalities, and subrecipients shallcomply with the policies, guidelines, and requirements of 24 CFR Part 85and OMB Circulars A-87, A-110, A-122, and A-128 \2\<NOTE/> (implemented at 24 CFR Part 44), as applicable, as they relateto the acceptance and use of Federal funds under this part. The applicablesections of 24 CFR Part 85 and OMB Circular A-110 are set forth at andSection;570.502.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ See footnote 1 for andSection;570.200(a)(5).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.611 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conflict of interest. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Applicability.</T3> (1) In the procurement of supplies, equipment,construction, and services by recipients, and by subrecipients (includingthose specified at andSection;570.204(c)), the conflict of interest provisionsin 24 CFR 85.36 and OMB Circular A-110, respectively, shall apply. (2) In all cases not governed by 24 CFR 85.36 and OMB Circular A-110, theprovisions of this section shall apply. Such cases include the acquisitionand disposition of real property and the provision of assistance by therecipient, by its subrecipients, or to individuals, businesses or otherprivate entities under eligible activities which authorize such assistance(e.g., rehabilitation, preservation, and other improvements of privateproperties of facilities pursuant to andSection;570.202, or grants, loansand other assistance to businesses, individuals and other private entitiespursuant to andSection;570.203, andSection;570.204 or andSection;570.455). (b) <T3>Conflicts prohibited.</T3> Except for the use of CDBG funds to paysalaries and other related administrative or personnel costs, the generalrule is that no persons described in paragraph (c) of this section whoexercise or have exercised any functions or responsibilities with respectto CDBG activities assisted under this part or who are in a position toparticipate in a decisionmaking process or gain inside information withregard to such activities, may obtain a personal or financial interestor benefit from a CDBG assisted activity, or have an interest in any contract,subcontract or agreement with respect thereto, or the proceeds thereunder,either for themselves or those with whom they have family or business ties,during their tenure or for one year thereafter. For the UDAG program, theabove restrictions shall apply to all activities that are a part of theUDAG project, and shall cover any such interest or benefit during, or atany time after, such person's tenure. (c) <T3>Persons covered.</T3> The conflict of interest provisions of paragraph(b) of this section apply to any person who is an employee, agent, consultant,officer, or elected official or appointed official of the recipient, orof any designated public agencies, or subrecipients which are receivingfunds under this part. (d) <T3>Exceptions: threshold requirements.</T3> Upon the written request ofthe recipient, HUD may grant an exception to the provisions of paragraph(b) of this section on a case-by-case basis when it determines that suchan exception will serve to further the purposes of the Act and the effectiveand efficient administration of the recipient's program or project. Anexception may be considered only after the recipient has provided the following:(1) A disclosure of the nature of the conflict, accompanied by an assurancethat there has been public disclosure of the conflict and a descriptionof how the public disclosure was made; and (2) An opinion of the recipient's attorney that the interest for whichthe exception is sought would not violate State or local law. (e) <T3>Factors to be considered for exceptions.</T3> In determining whetherto grant a requested exception after the recipient has satisfactorily metthe requirements of paragraph (d) of this section, HUD shall consider thecumulative effect of the following factors, where applicable: (1) Whether the exception would provide a significant cost benefit or anessential degree of expertise to the program or project which would otherwisenot be available; (2) Whether an opportunity was provided for open competitive bidding ornegotiation; (3) Whether the person affected is a member of a group or class of low-or moderate-income persons intended to be the beneficiaries of the assistedactivity, and the exception will permit such person to receive generallythe same interests or benefits as are being made available or providedto the group or class; (4) Whether the affected person has withdrawn from his or her functionsor responsibilities, or the decisionmaking process with respect to thespecific assisted activity in question; (5) Whether the interest or benefit was present before the affected personwas in a position as described in paragraph (b) of this section; (6) Whether undue hardship will result either to the recipient or the personaffected when weighed against the public interest served by avoiding theprohibited conflict; and (7) Any other relevant considerations. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.612 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Executive Order 12372. </ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Executive Order 12372, Intergovernmental Review of FederalPrograms, and the Department's implementing regulations at 24 CFR Part52, allow each State to establish its own process for review and commenton proposed Federal financial assistance programs. (b) <T3>Applicability.</T3> Executive Order 12372 applies to the CDBG Entitlementprogram and the UDAG program. The Executive Order applies to all activitiesproposed to be assisted under UDAG, but it applies to the Entitlement programonly where a grantee proposes to use funds for the planning or construction(reconstruction or installation) of water or sewer facilities. Such facilitiesinclude storm sewers as well as all sanitary sewers, but do not includewater and sewer lines connecting a structure to the lines in the publicright-of-way or easement. It is the responsibility of the grantee to initiatethe Executive Order review process if it proposes to use its CDBG or UDAGfunds for activities subject to review. 8. Subpart M of Part 570 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart M_Loan Guarantees</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.700 Eligible applicants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.701 Eligible activities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.702 Application requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.703 Loan requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.704 Federal guarantee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.705 Applicability of rules and regulations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.706 Sanctions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart M_Loan Guarantees</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.700</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible applicants.</ITAG>(a) Units of general local government entitled to receive a grant undersection 106(b) of the Act (metropolitan cities and urban counties) mayapply for loan guarantee assistance under this subpart.(b) Public agencies may be designated by eligible units of general localgovernment to receive a loan guarantee on notes or other obligations issuedby the public agency in accordance with this subpart. In such case theapplicant unit of general local government shall be required to pledgeits current and future grants under the Act as security for the notes orother obligations issued by the public agency.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.701</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Eligible activities.</ITAG>Loan guarantee assistance under this subpart may be used for the followingactivities undertaken by the unit of general local government or its designatedpublic agency provided such activities meet the requirements of andSection;570.200. However, guaranteed loan funds may not be used to reimburse theprogram account or letter of credit for costs incurred by the unit of generallocal government or designated public agency and paid with other CDBG funds.(a) Acquisition of improved or unimproved real property in fee or by long-termlease, including acquisition for economic development purposes.(b) Rehabilitation of real property owned or acquired by the unit of generallocal government or its designated public agency.(c) Payment of interest on obligations guaranteed under this subpart.(d) Relocation payments and assistance for individuals, families, businesses,nonprofit organizations and farm operations displaced as a result of activitiesfinanced with loan guarantee assistance.(e) Clearance, demolition and removal, including movement of structuresto other sites, of buildings and improvements on real property acquiredor rehabilitated pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section.(f) Site preparation, including construction, reconstruction, or installationof public improvements, utilities, or facilities (other than buildings)related to the redevelopment or use of the real property acquired or rehabilitatedpursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section.(g) Payment of issuance, underwriting, servicing, and other costs associatedwith private sector financing of notes or other obligations guaranteedunder this subpart.(h) Housing rehabilitation eligible under andSection; 570.202.(i) Activities eligible under andSection; 570.203.(j) Community economic development projects eligible under andSection; 570.204.(k) Acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, or installationof public facilities (except for buildings for the general conduct of government),site improvements, and utilities, for an economic development purpose.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.702</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Presubmission requirements.</T3> (1) Prior to submission of an applicationfor loan guarantee assistance to HUD, the applicant must comply with thepresubmission requirements specified in andSection; 570.301 with respectto the activities proposed for loan guarantee assistance.(2) If an application for loan guarantee assistance is simultaneous withthe applicant's submission for its entitlement grant, the applicant mayuse the statement of community development objectives and projected useof funds prepared for its annual grant pursuant to andSection; 570.301 byincluding and identifying the activities to be undertaken with the guaranteedloan funds.(b) <T3>Submission requirements. </T3>An application for loan guarantee assistanceshall be submitted to the appropriate HUD field office and shall consistof the following:(1) A copy of the applicant's final statement of community developmentobjectives and projected use of guaranteed loan funds.(2) A description of how each of the activities to be carried out withthe guaranteed loan funds meets one of the criteria in andSection; 570.208.(3) A schedule for repayment of the loan which identifies the sources ofrepayment.(4) A certification providing assurance that the applicant possesses legalauthority to make the pledge of grants required under andSection; 570.703(b)(2).(5) A certification providing assurance that the applicant has made effortsto obtain financing for activities described in the application withoutthe use of the loan guarantee, the applicant will maintain documentationof such efforts for the term of the loan guarantee, and the applicant cannotcomplete such financing consistent with the timely execution of the programplans without such guarantee.(6) Certifications required pursuant to andSection; 570.303. For the purposesof this requirement, the terms ``grant'' and ``CDBG'' in such certificationsshall also mean guaranteed loan.(c) <T3>Economic feasibility and financial risk.</T3> The Secretary will makeno determination with respect to the economic feasibility of projects proposedto be funded with the proceeds of guaranteed loans; such determinationis the responsibility of the applicant. In determining whether a loan guaranteeconstitutes an acceptable financial risk, the Secretary will consider theapplicant's current and future entitlement block grants as the primarysource of loan repayment. Approval of a loan guarantee under this subpartis not to be construed, in any way, as indicating that HUD has agreed tothe feasibility of a project beyond recognition that pledged grant fundsshould be sufficient to retire the debt.(d) <T3>HUD review and approval of applications.</T3> (1) HUD will normallyaccept the grantee's certifications. The Secretary reserves the right,however, to consider relevant information which challenges the certificationsand to require additional information or assurances from the grantee aswarranted by such information.(2) The field office shall review the application for compliance with requirementsspecified in this subpart and forward the application together with itsrecommendation for approval or disapproval of the requested loan guaranteeto HUD Headquarters.(3) The Secretary may disapprove an application, or may approve loan guaranteeassistance for an amount less than requested, for any of the followingreasons:(i) The Secretary determines that the guarantee constitutes an unacceptablefinancial risk. Factors that will be considered in assessing financialrisk shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(A) The length of the proposed repayment period;(B) The ratio of expected annual debt service requirements to expectedannual grant amount;(C) The applicant's status as a metropolitan city or urban county duringthe proposed repayment period; and(D) The applicant's ability to furnish adequate security pursuant to andSection;570.703(b).(ii) The guarantee requested exceeds the maximum loan amount specifiedunder andSection; 570.703(a).(iii) Funds are not available in the amount requested.(iv) The applicant's performance does not meet the standards prescribedin Subpart O.(v) Activities to be undertaken with the guaranteed loan funds are notlisted as eligible under andSection; 570.701 (a) through (k).(vi) Activities to be undertaken with the guaranteed loan funds do notmeet the criteria in andSection; 570.208 for compliance with one of the nationalobjectives of the Act.(4) The Secretary will notify the applicant in writing that the loan guaranteerequest has either been approved, reduced or disapproved. If the requestis reduced or disapproved, the applicant shall be informed of the specificreasons for reduction or disapproval. If the request is approved, the Secretaryshall issue an offer of commitment to guarantee obligations of the applicantor the designated public agency subject to such conditions as the Secretarymay prescribe, including the conditions for release of funds describedin paragraph (e) of this section.(5) Amendments to the loan guarantee shall comply with the requirementsof andSection; 570.305. If the applicant wishes to carry out an activitynot previously described in its final statement or to substantially changethe purpose, scope, location or beneficiaries of an activity, the amendmentmust be approved by the Secretary.(e) <T3>Environmental review.</T3> The applicant shall comply with HUD environmentalreview procedures (24 CFR Part 58) for the release of funds for each projectcarried out with loan guarantee assistance. These procedures set forththe regulations, policies, responsibilities and procedures governing thecarrying out of environmental review responsibilities of applicants.(f) The applicant (or the designated public agency) shall comply with relocation,displacement and acquisition requirements in connection with activitiesfinanced in whole or in part with a loan guarantee under this subpart thatare identical to the acquisition and relocation requirements of the UniformRelocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970as described at andSection; 570.606(a) and HUD implementing regulations at24 CFR Part 42; the requirements in andSection; 570.606(b) governing theresidential antidisplacement and relocation assistance plan under section104(d) of the Act; the relocation requirements of andSection; 570.606(c)governing displacement subject to section 104(k) of the Act; and the relocationrequirements of andSection; 570.606(d) governing optional relocation assistanceunder section 105(a)(11) of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.703 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Loan requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Maximum loan amount.</T3> No guarantee or commitment to guarantee shallbe made with respect to any note or other obligation if the total outstandingnotes or obligations guaranteed under this subpart on behalf of the applicantand each public agency duly designated by the applicant would thereby exceedan amount equal to three times the amount of the entitlement grant madepursuant to andSection; 570.304 to the applicant.(b) <T3>Security requirements.</T3> To assure the repayment of notes or otherobligations and charges incurred under this subpart and as a conditionfor receiving loan guarantee assistance, the applicant (or the applicantand designated public agency, where appropriate) shall:(1) Enter into a contract with HUD, in a form acceptable to the Secretary,for repayment of notes or other obligations guaranteed hereunder;(2) Pledge all grants made or for which the applicant may become eligibleunder this part; and(3) Furnish, at the discretion of the Secretary, such other security asmay be deemed appropriate by the Secretary in making such guarantees, includingincrements in local tax receipts generated by the activities assisted underthis part or disposition proceeds from the sale of land or rehabilitatedproperty.(c) <T3>Use of grants for loan repayment.</T3> Notwithstanding any other provisionof this part:(1) Entitlement grants (including program income derived therefrom) areauthorized for use in the payment of principal and interest due (includingsuch servicing, underwriting, or other costs as may be authorized by theSecretary) on the notes or other obligations guaranteed pursuant to thissubpart.(2) The Secretary may apply grants pledged pursuant to paragraph (b)(2)of this section to any amounts due under the note or other obligation guaranteedpursuant to this subpart, or to the purchase of such obligation, in accordancewith the terms of the contract required by paragraph (b)(1) of this section.(d) <T3>Debt obligations.</T3> Notes or other obligations guaranteed underthis subpart shall be in the form and denominations prescribed by the Secretary.Such notes or other obligations may be issued and sold only under suchterms and conditions as may be prescribed by the Secretary.(e) <T3>Taxable obligations.</T3> Interest earned on obligations guaranteedunder this subpart shall be subject to Federal taxation as provided insection 108(j) of the Act. All applicants or designated public agenciesissuing guaranteed obligations must bear the full cost of interest.(f) <T3>Loan repayment period.</T3> As a general rule, the repayment periodfor a loan guaranteed under this subpart shall be limited to six years.However, a longer repayment period may be permitted in special cases whereit is deemed necessary to achieve the purposes of this part.(g) <T3>Issuance, underwriting, servicing, and other costs.</T3> Each applicantor its designated public agency issuing guaranteed obligations must paythe issuance, underwriting, servicing, and other costs associated withthe private sector financing of the guaranteed obligations. Such costsare payable out of the proceeds from the sale of the guaranteed obligations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.704 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Federal guarantee.</ITAG>The full faith and credit of the United States is pledged to the paymentof all guarantees made under this subpart. Any such guarantee made by theSecretary shall be conclusive evidence of the eligibility of the obligationsfor such guarantee with respect to principal and interest, and the validityof such guarantee so made shall be incontestable in the hands of a holderof the guaranteed obligations.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.705 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability of rules and regulations.</ITAG>The provisions of Subparts A, C, D, J, K and O applicable to Entitlementgrants shall apply to loan funds guaranteed under this subpart, exceptto the extent they are specifically modified or augmented by the provisionsof this subpart.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.706 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sanctions.</ITAG>The performance review procedures described in Subpart O for entitlementrecipients apply to this subpart. Performance deficiencies in the use ofloans guaranteed under this subpart or violations of the contract enteredinto pursuant to andSection; 570.703(b)(1) may result in the imposition ofa sanction authorized pursuant to andSection; 570.900(b)(7) against the pledgedentitlement grants. In addition, upon a finding by the Secretary that therecipient has failed to comply substantially with any provision of theAct with respect to either the pledged entitlement grants or the guaranteedloan funds, the Secretary may take action against the pledged grants asprovided in andSection; 570.913 and/or may take action as provided in thecontract.9. Subpart O of Part 570 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart O_Performance Reviews</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.900 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.901 Review for compliance with the primary and national objectivesand other program requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.902 Review to determine if CDBG funded activities are being carriedout in a timely manner.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.903 Review to determine if the housing assistance plan (HAP) isbeing carried out in a timely manner.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.904 Equal Opportunity and Fair Housing review criteria.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.905 Review of continuing capacity to carry out CDBG funded activitiesin a timely manner.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.906 Review of urban counties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.907-570.909 Reserved.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.910 Corrective and remedial actions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.911 Reduction, withdrawal, or adjustment of a grant or other appropriateaction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.912 Nondiscrimination compliance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">570.913 Other remedies for noncompliance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart O_Performance Reviews</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.900 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Performance review authorities_</T3>(1) <T3>Entitlement and HUD-administered Small Cities performance reviews.</T3>Section 104(e)(1) of the Act requires that the Secretary shall, atleast on an annual basis, make such reviews and audits as may be necessaryor appropriate to determine whether the recipient has carried out its activities,and where applicable, its housing assistance plan in a timely manner, whetherthe recipient has carried out those activities and its certifications inaccordance with the requirements and the primary objectives of the Actand with other applicable laws, and whether the recipient has a continuingcapacity to carry out those activities in a timely manner.(2) <T3>Urban Development Action Grant (UDAG) performance reviews. </T3>Section119(g) of the Act requires the Secretary, at least on an annual basis,to make such reviews and audits of recipients of Urban Development ActionGrants as necessary to determine whether the recipient's progress in carryingout the approved activities is substantially in accordance with the recipient'sapproved plans and timetables.(b) <T3>Performance review procedures. </T3>This paragraph describes the reviewprocedures the Department will use in conducting the performance reviewsrequired by sections 104(e) and 119(g) of the Act:(1) The Department will determine the performance of each entitlement andHUD-administered small cities recipient in accordance with section 104(e)(1)of the Act by reviewing for compliance with the requirements describedin andSection; 570.901 and by applying the performance criteria describedin andSection;andSection;570.902 and 570.903 relative to carrying out activitiesand, where applicable, the housing assistance plan in a timely manner.The review criteria in andSection; 570.904 will be used to assist in determiningif the recipient's program is being carried out in compliance with civilrights requirements.(2) The Department will review UDAG projects and activities to determinewhether such projects and activities are being carried out substantiallyin accordance with the recipient's approved plans and schedules. The Departmentwill also review to determine if the recipient has carried out its UDAGprogram in accordance with all other requirements of the Grant Agreementand with all applicable requirements of this part.(3) In conducting performance reviews, HUD will primarily rely on informationobtained from the recipient's performance report, records maintained, findingsfrom on-site monitoring, audit reports, and the status of the letter ofcredit. Where applicable, the Department may also consider relevant informationpertaining to a recipient's performance gained from other sources, includinglitigation, citizen comments and other information provided by the recipient.A recipient's failure to maintain records in the prescribed manner mayresult in a finding that the recipient has failed to meet the applicablerequirement to which the record pertains.(4) If HUD determines that a recipient has not met a civil rights reviewcriterion in andSection; 570.904, the recipient will be provided an opportunityto demonstrate that it has nonetheless met the applicable civil rightsrequirement.(5) If HUD finds that a recipient has failed to comply with a program requirementor has failed to meet a performance criterion in andSection; 570.902 or andSection;570.903, the recipient will be provided an opportunity to contest the finding.(6) If the recipient is unsuccessful in contesting the validity of a findingof noncompliance or a finding that the recipient has failed to carry outits activities or its housing assistance plan in a timely manner, HUD mayrequire the recipient to undertake appropriate corrective or remedial actionsas specified in andSection; 570.910. HUD will undertake the continuing capacityreview required by andSection; 570.905 prior to selecting the correctiveor remedial actions.(7) If the recipient fails to undertake appropriate corrective or remedialactions which resolve the deficiency to the satisfaction of the Secretary,the Secretary may impose a sanction pursuant to andSection;andSection; 570.911,570,912, or 570.913, as applicable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.901 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review for compliance with the primary and national objectives andother program requirements.</ITAG>HUD will review each entitlement and HUD-administered small cities recipient'sprogram to determine if the recipient has carried out its activities andcertifications in compliance with:(a) The requirement described at andSection; 570.200(a)(3) that, consistentwith the primary objective of the Act, not less than 60 percent of theaggregate amount of CDBG funds received by the recipient shall be usedover the period specified in its certification for activities that benefitlow and moderate income persons;(b) The requirement described at andSection; 570.200(a)(2) that each CDBGassisted activity meets the criteria for one or more of the national objectivesdescribed at andSection; 570.208;(c) All other activity eligibility requirements defined in Subpart C ofthis part;(d) For entitlement grants only, the presubmission requirements at andSection;570.301, the amendment requirements at andSection; 570.305 and the displacementpolicy requirements at andSection; 570.606;(e) For HUD-administered small cities grants only, the citizen participationrequirements at andSection; 570.431, the amendment requirements at andSection;570.434 and the displacement policy requirements of andSection; 570.606;(f) The grant administration requirements described in Subpart J;(g) Other applicable laws and program requirements described in SubpartK; and(h) Where applicable, the requirements pertaining to loan guarantees (SubpartM) and urban renewal completions (Subpart N).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.902 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review to determine if CDBG funded activities are being carried outin a timely manner.</ITAG>HUD will review the performance of each entitlement and HUD-administeredsmall cities recipient to determine whether each recipient is carryingout its CDBG assisted activities in a timely manner.(a) <T3>Entitlement recipients. </T3>(1) Before the funding of the next annualgrant and absent substantial evidence to the contrary, the Department willconsider an entitlement recipient to be carrying out its CDBG activitiesin a timely manner if, 60 days prior to the end of its current programyear:(i) The amount of entitlement grant funds available to the recipient undergrant agreements but undisbursed by the U.S. Treasury is less than 1.5times the entitlement grant amount for its current program year; and,(ii) In cases where the recipient has received at least two consecutiveentitlement grants, the amount of entitlement grant funds disbursed bythe U.S. Treasury to the recipient during the previous twelve month periodis equal to or greater than one-half of the entitlement grant amount forits current program year.(2) Where it is known that a recipient has an unusually large amount ofprogram income funds on hand (relative to the grant amount), HUD may determinethat the amount of such funds is sufficient to override the conclusionthat would otherwise be made based solely on the criteria in paragraph(a)(1) of this section.(3) HUD may also review an entitlement recipient's progress at other timesduring the year to determine whether the recipient's rate of fund expenditureis likely to fall outside of the criteria in paragraph (a)(1)(i) of thissection, in which case the Department will notify the recipient of a potentialproblem with the lack of timeliness in carrying out its activities.(b) <T3>HUD-administered Small Cities program. </T3>The Department will, absentsubstantial evidence to the contrary, consider that a HUD-administeredsmall cities recipient is carrying out its CDBG funded activities in atimely manner if the schedule for carrying out its activities as containedin the approved application, or subsequent amendment, is being substantiallymet.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.903 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review to determine if the housing assistance plan (HAP) is beingcarried out in a timely manner.</ITAG>(a) HUD will review an entitlement grant recipient's HAP performance priorto HUD's approval of each succeeding year's HAP and prior to acceptanceof a grant recipient's HAP certification in order to determine whetherthe recipient is achieving its specific HAP goals in a timely manner.(b) Absent substantial evidence to the contrary, HUD will consider thatan entitlement recipient is carrying out its approved HAP in a timely mannerif at the end of each of the first two years governed by the HAP, the recipienthas substantially met each annual goal for that year, and if at the endof the third year of the period governed by the HAP, a recipient has substantiallymet its three year goals. For the three year period, this standard alsorequires that the provision of rental subsidies has been made in reasonableproportion to the goal for each household type as identified in the HAP.(c) For a recipient whose HAP performance does not fall within the criteriain paragraph (b) of this section, a review shall be conducted which considersthe extent to which the recipient made use of housing assistance resourcesthat were available to meet the applicable HAP goals. Where such considerationof the use of available resources results in a determination that the recipienthas taken all reasonable actions to use available resources and has notimpeded the provision of housing assistance which would have been consistentwith the HAP goals, HUD may also consider, under such circumstances, thata recipient has carried out its HAP in a timely manner.(d) In measuring progress in achieving one-year goals, HUD will considerthe extent to which the recipient has made or received firm financial commitmentswhich have not subsequently been canceled for specific projects, householdsor units identified in the HAP by household and tenure type within a twoyear period. Progress in achieving the three-year goal will consider themovement of firm financial commitments to start of rehabilitation or construction,or in the case of the Section 8 Housing Assistance Payment Program_ExistingHousing (24 CFR Part 882) certificates or vouchers under section 8(o) ofthe United States Housing Act of 1937 to occupancy, within a reasonableperiod of time. Such reasonable period of time may be within the three-yearperiod covered by the applicable three-year goals, or, for firm financialcommitments received late in the three-year period, it may be a year ormore into the next three-year cycle.(e) If HUD determines that an entitlement grant recipient has not met thecriteria outlined in paragraph (b) or (c) of this section, the recipientwill be notified and provided a reasonable opportunity to demonstrate tothe satisfaction of the Secretary that the recipient has carried out itsHAP in a timely manner considering all relevant circumstances and the recipient'sactions and lack of actions affecting the provision of housing assistancewithin its jurisdiction. Failure to so demonstrate will be cause for HUDto find that the recipient has failed to carry out its HAP in a timelymanner. The response by the recipient should describe:(1) The factors which prevented it from meeting those HAP goals it failedto meet; and(2) The actions which were taken to facilitate achieving its HAP goals,including the following where applicable: (i) The removal of impediments under local ordinances and land use requirementsto the development of assisted housing;(ii) The formation of a local housing authority or execution of an agreementwith a housing authority having powers to provide assisted housing withinthe jurisdiction of the recipient, when necessary to carry out the HAP;(iii) The provision of sites, improvements to sites, and/or extensionsof utilities to sites for assisted housing new construction, provided thatsuch sites meet the applicable HUD site and neighborhood standards;(iv) Establishment of a housing rehabilitation program or increased useof an existing one where substantial need for rehabilitation is evident;and(v) Cooperation with a local housing authority or other proper administrativebody to facilitate operation of the Section 8 Housing Assistance PaymentProgram_Existing Housing (or a comparable rental assistance program) throughsuch means as landlord information programs and identification of availablerental unit inventories.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.904</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Equal Opportunity and Fair Housing Review Criteria.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General</T3>. (1) Where the criteria in this section are met, the Departmentwill presume that the recipient has carried out its CDBG-funded programin accordance with civil rights certifications and civil rights requirementsof the Act relating to equal employment opportunity, equal opportunityin services, benefits and participation, and is affirmatively furtheringfair housing unless:(i) There is evidence which shows, or from which it is reasonable to infer,that the recipient, motivated by considerations of race, color, religionwhere applicable, sex, national origin, age or handicap, has treated somepersons less favorably than others, or(ii) There is evidence that a policy, practice, standard or method of administration,although neutral on its face, operates to deny or affect adversely in asignificantly disparate way the provision of employment or services, benefitsor participation to persons of a particular race, color, religion whereapplicable, sex, national origin, age or handicap, or fair housing to personsof a particular race, color, religion, sex, or national origin, or(iii) Where the Secretary required a further assurance pursuant to andSection;570.304 in order to accept the recipient's prior civil rights certification,the recipient has failed to meet any such assurance. (2) In such instances, or where the review criteria in this section arenot met, the recipient will be afforded an opportunity to present evidencethat it has not failed to carry out the civil rights certifications andfair housing requirements of the Act. The Secretary's determination ofwhether there has been compliance with the applicable requirements willbe made based on a review of the recipient's performance, evidence submittedby the recipient, and all other available evidence. The Department mayalso initiate separate compliance reviews under title VI of the Civil RightsAct of 1964 or section 109 of the Act.(b) <T3>Review for equal opportunity</T3>. Section 570.601(a) sets forth thegeneral requirements for title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and andSection;570.602 sets forth the general requirements for section 109 of the Act.Together these provisions prohibit discrimination in any program or activityfunded in whole or in part with funds made available under this part.(1) <T3>Review for equal employment opportunity</T3>. The Department will presumethat a recipient's hiring and employment practices have been carried outin compliance with its equal opportunity certifications and requirementsof the Act. This presumption may be rebutted where, based on the totalityof circumstances, there has been a deprivation of employment, promotion,or training opportunities by a recipient to any person within the meaningof section 109. The extent to which persons of a particular race, gender,or ethnic background are represented in the workforce may in certain circumstancesbe considered, together with complaints, performance reviews, and otherinformation.(2) <T3>Review of equal opportunity in services, benefits and participation</T3>.The Department will presume a recipient is carrying out its programs andactivities in accordance with the civil rights certifications and requirementsof the Act. This presumption may be rebutted where, based on the totalityof circumstances, there has been a deprivation of services, benefits, orparticipation in any program or activity funded in whole or in part withblock grant funds by a recipient to any person within the meaning of section109. The extent to which persons of a particular race, gender, or ethnicbackground participate in a program or activity may in certain circumstancesbe considered, together with complaints, performance reviews, and otherinformation. (c) <T3>Fair housing review criteria</T3>. Section 570.601(b) sets forth thegeneral requirements for Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 andthe grantee's certification that it will affirmatively further fair housing.In reviewing a recipient's actions in carrying out its housing and communitydevelopment activities in a manner to affirmatively further fair housingin the private and public housing sectors, absent independent evidenceto the contrary, the Department will consider that a recipient has takensuch actions in accordance with its certification if the recipient meetsthe following review criteria:(1) The recipient has conducted an analysis to determine the impedimentsto fair housing choice in its housing and community development programand activities. The term ``fair housing choice'' means the ability of persons,regardless of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin, of similarincome levels to have available to them the same housing choices. Thisanalysis shall include a review for impediments to fair housing choicein the following areas:(i) The sale or rental of dwellings;(ii) The provision of housing brokerage services; (iii) The provision of financing assistance for dwellings;(iv) Public policies and actions affecting the approval of sites and otherbuilding requirements used in the approval process for the constructionof publicly assisted housing;(v) The administrative policies concerning community development and housingactivities, such as urban homesteading, multifamily rehabilitation, andactivities causing displacement, which affect opportunities of minorityhouseholds to select housing inside or outside areas of minority concentration;and(vi) Where there is a determination of unlawful segregation or other housingdiscrimination by a court or a finding of noncompliance by HUD regardingassisted housing within a recipient's jurisdiction, an analysis of theactions which could be taken by the recipient to help remedy the discriminatorycondition, including actions involving the expenditure of funds made availableunder this part.(2) Based upon the conclusions of the analysis in (1) above, the recipienthas taken lawful steps, consistent with this part, relating to housingand community development to overcome the effects of conditions that limitfair housing choice within the recipient's jurisdiction. Such actions mayinclude:(i) Enactment and enforcement of an ordinance providing for fair housingconsistent with the federal fair housing law;(ii) Support of the administration and enforement of state fair housinglaws providing for fair housing consistent with the federal fair housinglaw;(iii) Participation in voluntary partnerships developed with public andprivate organizations to promote the achievement of the goal of fair housingchoice (including implementation of a locally-developed and HUD-approvedNew Horizons comprehensive fair housing plan);(iv) Contracting with private organizations, including private fair housingorganizations, where such support will bring about actions consistent withtitles VI and VIII, to address the impediments identified in the analysisdescribed in paragraph (C)(1) of this section;(v) Activities which assist in remedying findings or determinations ofunlawful segregation or other discrimination involving assisted housingwithin the recipient's jurisdiction.(vi) Other actions consistent with law determined to be appropriate basedupon the conclusions of the analysis.(d) <T3>Actions to use minority and women's business firms.</T3> The Departmentwill review a recipient's performance to determine if it has administeredits activities funded with assistance under this part in a manner to encourageuse of minority and women's business enterprises described in ExecutiveOrders 11625, 12432 and 12138, and 24 CFR 85.36(e). In making this review,the Department will determine if the grantee has taken actions requiredunder andSection; 85.36(e) of this chapter, and will review the effectivenessof those actions in accomplishing the objectives of andSection; 85.36(e)of this chapter and the Executive Orders. No recipient is required by thispart to attain or maintain any particular statistical level of participationin its contracting activities by race, ethnicity, or gender of the contractor'sowners or managers.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.905 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of continuing capacity to carry out CDBG funded activitiesin a timely manner.</ITAG>If HUD determines that the recipient has not carried out its CDBG activitiesand certifications in accordance with the requirements and criteria describedin andSection;andSection; 570.901 or 570.902, HUD will undertake a furtherreview to determine whether or not the recipient has the continuing capacityto carry out its activities in a timely manner. In making the determination,the Department will consider the nature and extent of the recipient's performancedeficiencies, types of corrective actions the recipient has undertakenand the success or likely success of such actions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.906 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of urban counties.</ITAG>In reviewing the performance of an urban county, HUD will hold the countyaccountable for the actions or failures to act of any of the units of generallocal government participating in the urban county. Where the Departmentfinds that a participating unit of government has failed to cooperate withthe county to undertake or assist in undertaking an essential communitydevelopment or assisted housing activity and that such failure results,or is likely to result, in a failure of the urban county to meet any requirementof the program or other applicable laws, the Department may prohibit thecounty's use of funds made available under this part for that unit of government.HUD will also consider any such failure to cooperate in its review of afuture cooperation agreement between the county and such included unitof government described at andSection; 570.307(b)(2).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 570.907-570.909 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Reserved.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 570.910 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Corrective and remedial actions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Consistent with the procedures described in andSection;570.900(b), the Secretary may take one or more of the actions describedin paragraph (b) of this section. Such actions shall be designed to preventa continuation of the performance deficiency; mitigate, to the extent possible,the adverse effects or consequences of the deficiency; and prevent a recurrenceof the deficiency.(b) <T3>Actions authorized.</T3> The following lists the actions that HUD maytake in response to a deficiency identified during the review of a recipient'sperformance:(1) Issue a letter of warning advising the recipient of the deficiencyand putting the recipient on notice that additional action will be takenif the deficiency is not corrected or is repeated;(2) Recommend, or request the recipient to submit, proposals for correctiveactions, including the correction or removal of the causes of the deficiency,through such actions as:(i) Preparing and following a schedule of actions for carrying out theaffected CDBG activities, consisting of schedules, timetables and milestonesnecessary to implement the affected CDBG activities;(ii) Establishing and following a management plan which assigns responsibilitiesfor carrying out the actions identified in paragraph (b)(2)(i) of thissection;(iii) For entitlement recipients, canceling or revising affected activitieswhich are no longer feasible to implement due to the deficiency and reprogrammingfunds from such affected activities to other eligible activities (pursuantto the citizen participation requirements in Subpart D); or(iv) Other actions which will serve to prevent a continuation of the deficiency,mitigate (to the extent possible) the adverse effects or consequences ofthe deficiency, and prevent a recurrence of the deficiency;(3) Advise the recipient that a certification will no longer be acceptableand that additional assurances will be required;(4) Advise the recipient to suspend disbursement of funds for the deficientactivity;(5) Advise the recipient to reimburse its program account or letter ofcredit in any amounts improperly expended and reprogram the use of thefunds in accordance with applicable requirements;(6) Change the method of payment to the recipient from a letter of creditbasis to a reimbursement basis;(7) In the case of claims payable to HUD or the U.S. Treasury, institutecollection procedures pursuant to Subpart B of 24 CFR Part 17; and(8) In the case of an entitlement recipient, condition the use of fundsfrom a succeeding fiscal year's allocation upon appropriate correctiveaction by the recipient pursuant to andSection;570.304(d). The failure ofthe recipient to undertake the actions specified in the condition may resultin a reduction, pursuant to andSection;570.911, of the entitlement recipient'sannual grant by up to the amount conditionally granted.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.911 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Reduction, withdrawal, or adjustment of a grant or other appropriateaction.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Opportunity for an informal consultation. </T3>Prior to a reduction,withdrawal, or adjustment of a grant or other appropriate action, takenpursuant to paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of this section, the recipient shallbe notified of such proposed action and given an opportunity within a prescribedtime period for an informal consultation.(b) <T3>Entitlement grants. </T3>Consistent with the procedures described inandSection;570.900(b), the Secretary may make a reduction in the entitlementgrant amount either for the succeeding program year or, if the grant hadbeen conditioned, up to the amount that had been conditioned. The amountof the reduction shall be based on the severity of the deficiency and maybe for the entire grant amount.(c) <T3>HUD-administered small cities grants. </T3>Consistent with the proceduresdescribed in andSection;570.900(b), the Secretary may adjust, reduce or withdrawthe grant or take other actions as appropriate, except that funds alreadyexpended on eligible approved activities shall not be recaptured or deductedfrom future grants.(d) <T3>Urban Development Action Grants. </T3>Consistent with the proceduresdescribed in andSection;570.900(b), the Secretary may adjust, reduce or withdrawthe grant or take other actions as appropriate, except that funds alreadyexpended on eligible approved activities shall not be recaptured or deductedfrom future grants made to the recipient.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.912 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nondiscrimination compliance.</ITAG>(a) Whenever the Secretary determines that a unit of general local governmentwhich is a recipient of assistance under this part has failed to complywith andSection;570.602, the Secretary shall notify the governor of suchState or chief executive officer of such unit of general local governmentof the noncompliance and shall request the governor or the chief executiveofficer to secure compliance. If within a reasonable period of time, notto exceed sixty days, the governor or chief executive officer fails orrefuses to secure compliance, the Secretary is authorized to:(1) Refer the matter to the Attorney General with a recommendation thatan appropriate civil action be instituted;(2) Exerise the powers and functions provided by title VI of the CivilRights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. 2000d);(3) Exercise the powers and functions provided for in andSection;570.913;or(4) Take such other action as may be provided by law.(b) When a matter is referred to the Attorney General pursuant to paragraph(a)(1) of this section, or whenever the Secretary has reason to believethat a State or a unit of general local government is engaged in a patternor practice in violation of the provisions of andSection;570.602, the AttorneyGeneral may bring a civil action in any appropriate United States districtcourt for such relief as may be appropriate, including injunctive relief.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;570.913 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other remedies for noncompliance.</ITAG>(a) If the Secretary finds after reasonable notice and opportunity forhearing that a recipient has failed to comply substantially with any provisionof this Part, the Secretary, until he/she is satisfied that there is nolonger any such failure to comply, shall:(1) Terminate payments to the recipient;(2) Reduce payments to the recipient by an amount equal to the amount ofsuch payments which were not expended in accordance with this part; or(3) Limit the availability of payments to programs or activities not affectedby such failure to comply.<T3>Provided, however, </T3>that the Secretary may on due notice suspendpayments at any time after the issuance of a notice of opportunity forhearing pursuant to paragraph (c)(1) of this section, pending such hearingand a final decision, to the extent the Secretary determines such actionnecessary to preclude the further expenditure of funds for activities affectedby such failure to comply.(b) In lieu of, or in addition to, any action authorized by paragraph (a)of this section, the Secretary may, if he/she has reason to believe thata recipient has failed to comply substantially with any provision of thisPart;(1) Refer the matter to the Attorney General of the United States witha recommendation that an appropriate civil action be instituted; and(2) Upon such a referral, the Attorney General may bring a civil actionin any United States district court having venue thereof for such reliefas may be appropriate, including an action to recover the amount of theassistance furnished under this part which was not expended in accordancewith it, or for mandatory or injunctive relief;(c) Proceedings. When the Secretary proposes to take action pursuant tothis section, the respondent is the unit of general local government orState receiving assistance under this part. These procedures are to befollowed prior to imposition of a sanction described in paragraph (a) ofthis section:(1) <T3>Notice of opportunity for hearing:</T3> The Secretary shall notifythe respondent in writing of the proposed action and of the opportunityfor a hearing. The notice shall:(i) Specify, in a manner which is adequate to allow the respondent to prepareits response, allegations with respect to a failure to comply substantiallywith a provision of this part;(ii) State that the hearing procedures are governed by these rules;(iii) State that a hearing may be requested within 10 days from receiptof the notice and the name, address and telephone number of the personto whom any request for hearing is to be addressed:(iv) Specify the action which the Secretary proposes to take and that theauthority for this action is section 111(a) of the Act;(v) State that if the respondent fails to request a hearing within thetime specified a decision by default will be rendered against the respondent;and(vi) Be sent to the respondent by certified mail, return receipt requested.(2) <T3>Initiation of hearing.</T3> The respondent shall be allowed at least10 days from receipt of the notice within which to notify HUD of its requestfor a hearing. If no request is received within the time specified, theSecretary may proceed to make a finding on the issue of compliance withthis part and to take the proposed action.(3) <T3>Administrative Law Judge.</T3> Proceedings conducted under these rulesshall be presided over by an Administrative Law Judge (ALJ), appointedas provided by section 11 of the Administrative Procedures Act (5 U.S.C.3105). The case shall be referred to the ALJ by the Secretary at the timea hearing is requested. The ALJ shall promptly notify the parties of thetime and place at which the hearing will be held. The ALJ shall conducta fair and impartial hearing and take all action necessary to avoid delayin the disposition of proceedings and to maintain order. The ALJ shallhave all powers necessary to those ends, including but not limited to thepower to:(i) Administer oaths and affirmations;(ii) Issue subpoenas as authorized by law;(iii) Rule upon offers of proof and receive relevant evidence;(iv) Order or limit discovery prior to the hearing as the interests ofjustice may require;(v) Regulate the course of the hearing and the conduct of the parties andtheir counsel;(vi) Hold conferences for the settlement or simplification of the issuesby consent of the parties;(vii) Consider and rule upon all procedural and other motions appropriatein adjudicative proceedings; and(viii) Make and file initial determinations.(4) <T3>Ex parte communications.</T3> An ex parte communication is any communicationwith an ALJ, direct or indirect, oral or written, concerning the meritsor procedures of any pending proceeding which is made by a party in theabsence of any other party. Ex parte communications are prohibited exceptwhere the purpose and content of the communication have been disclosedin advance or simultaneously to all parties, or the communication is arequest for information concerning the status of the case. Any ALJ whoreceives an ex parte communication which the ALJ knows or has reason tobelieve is unauthorized shall promptly place the communication, or itssubstance, in all files and shall furnish copies to all parties. Unauthorizedex parte communications shall not be taken into consideration in decidingany matter in issue.(5) <T3>The hearing.</T3> All parties shall have the right to be representedat the hearing by counsel. The ALJ shall conduct the proceedings in anexpeditious manner while allowing the parties to present all oral and writtenevidence which tends to support their respective positions, but the ALJshall exclude irrelevant, immaterial or unduly repetitious evidence. TheDepartment has the burden of proof in showing by a preponderance of theevidence that the respondent failed to comply substantially with a provisionof this part. Each party shall be allowed to cross-examine adverse witnessesand to rebut and comment upon evidence presented by the other party. Hearingsshall be open to the public. So far as the orderly conduct of the hearingpermits, interested persons other than the parties may appear and participatein the hearing.(6) <T3>Transcripts.</T3> Hearing shall be recorded and transcribed only bya reporter under the supervision of the ALJ. The orginal transcript shallbe a part of the record and shall constitute the sole official transcript.Respondents and the public, at their own expense, may obtain copies ofthe transcript.(7) <T3>The ALJ's decision. </T3>At the conclusion of the hearing, the ALJshall give the parties a reasonable opportunity to submit proposed findingsand conclusions and supporting reasons therefor. Within 25 days after theconclusion of the hearing, the ALJ shall prepare a written decision whichincludes a statement of findings and conclusions, and the reasons or basistherefor, on all the material issues of fact, law or discretion presentedon the record and the appropriate sanction or denial thereof. The decisionshall be based on consideration of the whole record or those parts thereofcited by a party and supported by and in accordance with the reliable,probative, and substantial evidence. A copy of the decision shall be furnishedto the parties immediately by certified mail, return receipt requested,and shall include a notice that any requests for review by the Secretarymust be made in writing to the Secretary within 30 days of the receiptof the decision. (8) <T3>The record. </T3>The transcript of testimony and exhibits, togetherwith the decision of the ALJ and all papers and requests filed in the proceeding,constitutes the exclusive record for decision and, on payment of its reasonablecost, shall be made available to the parties. After reaching his/her initialdecision, the ALJ shall certify to the complete record and forward therecord to the Secretary. (9) <T3>Review by the Secretary. </T3>The decision by the ALJ shall constitutethe final decision of the Secretary unless, within 30 days after the receiptof the decision, either the respondent or the Assistant Secretary for CommunityPlanning and Development files an exception and request for review by theSecretary. The excepting party must transmit simultaneously to the Secretaryand the other party the request for review and the basis of the party'sexceptions to the findings of the ALJ. The other party shall be allowed30 days from receipt of the exception to provide the Secretary and theexcepting party with a written reply. The Secretary shall then review therecord of the case, including the exceptions and the reply. On the basisof such review, the Secretary shall issue a written determination, includinga statement of the reasons or basis therefor, affirming, modifying or revokingthe decision of the ALJ. The Secretary's decision shall be made and transmittedto the parties within 80 days after the decision of the ALJ was furnishedto the parties. (10) <T3>Judicial review. </T3>The respondent may seek judicial review of theSecretary's decision pursuant to section 111(c) of the Act. <ITAG tagnum="6">Jack R. Stokvis, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary for Community Planning and Development. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-20101 Filed 9-2-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4210-29-M    </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>